First Reverie.
Smoke, Flame and Ashes.
OVER A WOOD FIRE.
I have
got a quiet farmhouse in the country, a
very humble place to be sure, tenanted by a
worthy enough man, of the old New-England stamp,
where I sometimes go for a day or two in the winter,
to look over the farm-accounts, and to see how the
stock is thriving on the winter's keep.
One side the door, as you enter from the porch, is
a little parlor, scarce twelve feet by ten, with a cosy
looking fire-placea heavy oak floora couple of
arm chairs and a brown table with carved lions' feet.
Out of this room opens a little cabinet, only big
enough for a broad bachelor bedstead, where I sleep
upon feathers, and wake in the morning, with my eye
upon a saucy colored, lithographic print of some
fancy Bessy.
It happens to be the only house in the world, of
which I am
bona-fide
owner; and I take a vast deal
of comfort in treating it just as I choose. I manage
to break some article of furniture, almost every time
I pay it a visit; and if I cannot open the window
readily of a morning, to breathe the fresh air, I knock
out a pane or two of glass with my boot. I lean
against the walls in a very old arm-chair there is on
the premises, and scaree ever fail to worry such a
hole in the plastering, as would set me down for a
round charge for damages in town, or make a prim
housewife fret herself into a raging fever. I laugh
out loud with myself, in my big arm-chair, when I
think that I am neither afraid of one, nor the other.
As for the fire, I keep the little hearth so hot, as to
warm half the cellar below, and the whole space
between
the jams, roars for hours together, with white
flame. To be sure; the windows are not very tight,
between broken panes, and bad joints, so that the
fire, large as it is, is by no means an extravagant
comfort.
As night approaches, I have a huge pile of oak
and hickory placed beside the hearth; I put out the
tallow candle on the mantel, (using the family
snuffers
,
with one log broke,)then, drawing my chair
directly in front of the blazing wood, and setting one
foot on each of the old iron fire-dogs, (until they
grow too warm,) I dispose myself for an evening of
such sober, and thoughtful quietude, as I believe, on
my soul, that very few of my fellow-men have the
good fortune to enjoy.
My tenant meantime, in the other room, I can
hear now and then,though there is a thick stone
chimney, and broad entry between,multiplying
contrivances
with his wife, to put two babies to sleep.
This occupies them, I should say, usually an hour;
though my only measure of time, (for I never carry
a watch into the country,) is the blaze of my fire.
By ten, or thereabouts, my stock of wood is nearly
exhausted; I pile upon the hot coals what remains,
and sit watching how it kindles, and blazes, and goes
out,even like our joys!and then, slip by the light
of the embers into my bed, where I luxuriate in such
sound, and healthful slumber, as only such rattling
window frames, and country air, can supply.
But to return: the other eveningit happened to
be on my last visit to my farm-housewhen I had
exhausted all the ordinary rural topics of thought,
had formed all sorts of conjectures as to the income
of the year; had planned a new wall around one lot,
and the clearing up of another, now covered with
patriarchal wood; and wondered if the little ricketty
house would not be after all a snug enough box, to
live and to die inI fell on a sudden into such an
unprecedented line of thought, which took such deep
hold of my sympathiessometimes even starting
tearsthat I determined, the next day, to set as
much of it as I could recal, on paper.
Somethingit may have been the home-looking
blaze, (I am a bachelor ofsay six and twenty,) or
possibly a plaintive cry of the baby in my tenant's
room, had suggested to me the thought ofMarriage.
I piled upon the heated fire-dogs, the last arm-full
of my wood; and now, said I, bracing myself
courageously
between the arms of my chair,I'll not
flinch,I'll pursue the thought wherever it leads,
though it lead me to the d(I am apt to be hasty,)
at leastcontinued I, softening,until my fire is
out.
The wood was green, and at first showed no
disposition
to blaze. It smoked furiously. Smoke,
thought I, always goes before blaze; and so does
doubt go before decision: and my Reverie, from that
very starting point, slipped into this shape:
I.
SmokeSignifying Doubt.
A wife
?thought I;yes, a wife!
And why?
And pray, my dear sir, why notwhy? Why not
doubt; why not hesitate; why not tremble?
Does a man buy a ticket in a lotterya poor man,
whose whole earnings go in to secure the ticket,
without trembling, hesitating, and doubting?
Can a man stake his bachelor respectability, his
independence, and comfort, upon the die of absorbing,
unchanging, relentless marriage, without trembling at
the venture?
Shall a man who has been free to chase his fancies
over the wide-world, without lett or hindrance, shut
himself up to marriage-ship, within four walls called
Home, that are to claim him, his time, his trouble,
and his tears, thenceforward forever more, without
doubts thick, and thick-coming as Smoke?
Shall he who has been hitherto a mere observer of
other men's cares, and businessmoving off where
they made him sick of heart, approaching whenever
and wherever they made him gleefulshall he now
undertake administration of just such cares and
business
,
without qualms? Shall he, whose whole life has
been but a nimble succession of escapes from trifling
difficulties, now broach without doubtingsthat
Matrimony
,
where if difficulty beset him, there is no
escape? Shall this brain of mine, careless-working,
never tired with idleness, feeding on long vagaries,
and high, gigantic castles, dreaming out beatitudes
hour by hourturn itself at length to such dull
task-work
,
as thinking out a livelihood for wife and
children?
Where thenceforward will be those sunny dreams,
in which I have warmed my fancies, and my heart,
and lighted my eye with crystal? This very
marriage
,
which a brilliant working imagination has
invested
time and again with brightness, and delight,
can serve no longer as a mine for teeming fancy: all,
alas, will be gonereduced to the dull standard of
the actual! No more room for intrepid forays of
imaginationno more gorgeous realm-makingall
will be over!
Why not, I thought, go on dreaming?
Can any wife be prettier than an after dinner
fancy, idle and yet vivid, can paint for you? Can
any children make less noise, than the little
rosy-cheeked
ones, who have no existence, except in the
omnium gatherum
of your own brain? Can any
housewife be more unexceptionable, than she who
goes sweeping daintily the cobwebs that gather in
your dreams? Can any domestic larder be better
stocked, than the private larder of your head dozing
on a cushioned chair-back at Delmonico's? Can any
family purse be better filled than the exceeding
plump one, you dream of, after reading such pleasant
books as Munchausen, or Typee?
But if, after all, it must beduty, or what-not,
making provocationwhat then? And I clapped
my feet hard against the fire-dogs, and leaned back,
and turned my face to the ceiling, as much as to say;
And where on earth, then, shall a poor devil look
for a wife?
Somebody says, Lyttleton or Shaftesbury I think,
that marriages would be happier if they were all
arranged by the Lord Chancellor. Unfortunately,
we have no Lord Chancellor to make this
commutation
of our misery
Shall a man then scour the country on a mule's
back, like Honest Gil Blas of Santillane; or shall he
make application to some such intervening
providence
as Madame St. Marc, who, as I see by the
Presse, manages these matters to one's hand, for some
five per cent on the fortunes of the parties?
I have trouted, when the brook was so low, and
the sky so hot, that I might as well have thrown my
fly upon the turnpike; and I have hunted hare at
noon, and wood-cock in snow-time,never
despairing
,
scarce doubting; but for a poor hunter of his
kind, without traps or snares, or any aid of police or
constabulary, to traverse the world, where are
swarming
,
on a moderate computation, some three hundred
and odd millions of unmarried women, for a single
captureirremediable, unchangeableand yet a
capture
which by strange metonymy, not laid down in
the books, is very apt to turn captor into captive,
and make game of hunterall this, surely, surely
may make a man shrug with doubt!
Thenagain,there are the plaguey
wife's-relations
.
Who knows how many third, fourth, or fifth
cousins, will appear at careless complimentary
intervals
,
long after you had settled into the placid belief
that all congratulatory visits were at an end? How
many twisted headed brothers will be putting in heir
advice, as a friend to Peggy?
How many maiden aunts will come to spend a
month or two with their dear Peggy, and want to
know every tea-time, if she isn't a dear love of a
wife? Then, dear father-in-law, will beg, (taking
dear Peggy's hand in his,) to give a little wholesome
counsel; and will be very sure to advise just the
contrary
of what you had determined to undertake. And
dear mamma-in-law, must set her nose into Peggy's
cupboard, and insist upon having the key to your
own private locker in the wainscot.
Then, perhaps, there is a little bevy of dirty-nosed
nephews who come to spend the holydays, and eat up
your East India sweetmeats; and who are forever
tramping over your head, or raising the Old Harry
below, while you are busy with your clients. Last,
and worst, is some fidgety old uncle, forever too cold
or too hot, who vexes you with his patronizing airs,
and impudently kisses his little Peggy!
That could be borne, however: for perhaps
he has promised his fortune to Peggy. Peggy, then,
will be rich:(and the thought made me rub my
shins, which were now getting comfortably warm upon
the fire-dogs.) Then, she will be forever talking of
her
fortune; and pleasantly reminding you on
occasion
of a favorite purchase,how lucky that
she
had
the means; and dropping hints about economy; and
buying very extravagant Paisleys.
She will annoy you by looking over the stock-list
at breakfast time; and mention quite carelessly to
your clients, that she is interested in
such
, or such a
speculation.
She will be provokingly silent when you hint to a
tradesman, that you have not the money by you, for
his small bill;in short, she will tear the life out of
you, making you pay in righteous retribution of
annoyance, grief, vexation, shame, and sickness of
heart, for the superlative folly of marrying rich.
But if not rich, then poor. Bah! the thought
made me stir the coals; but there was still no blaze.
The paltry earnings you are able to wring out of
clients by the sweat of your brow, will now be all
our
income; you will be pestered for pin-money, and
pestered with your poor wife's-relations. Ten to one,
she will stickle about tasteSir Visto'sand
want to make this so pretty, and that so charming, if
she
only
had the means; and is sure Paul (a kiss)
can't deny his little Peggy such a trifling sum, and
all for the common benefit.
Then she, for one, means that
her
children shan't
go a begging for clothes,and another pull at the
purse. Trust a poor mother to dress her children in
finery!
Perhaps she is ugly;not noticeable at first; but
growing on her, and (what is worse) growing faster
2
on you. You wonder why you did'nt see that vulgar
nose long ago: and that lipit is very strange, you
think, that you ever thought it pretty. And then,
to come to breakfast, with her hair looking as it does,
and you, not so much as daring to sayPeggy,
do
brush your hair! Her foot toonot very bad when
decently
chausse
but now since she's married, she
does wear such infernal slippers! And yet for all
this, to be prigging up for an hour, when any of my
old chums come to dine with me!
Bless your kind hearts! my dear fellows, said I,
thrusting the tongs into the coals, and speaking out
loud, as if my voice could reach from Virginia to
Parisnot married yet!
Perhaps Peggy is pretty enoughonly shrewish.
No matter for cold coffee;you should have
been up before.
What sad, thin, poorly cooked chops, to eat with
your rolls!
She thinks they are very good, and wonders
how you can set such an example to your children.
The butter is nauseating.
She has no other, and hopes you'll not raise a
storm about butter a little turned.I think I see
myselfruminated Isitting meekly at table, scarce
daring to lift up my eyes, utterly fagged out with
some quarrel of yesterday, choking down detestably
sour muffins, that my wife thinks are delicious
slipping in dried mouthfuls of burnt ham off the side
of my fork tines,slipping off my chair side-ways at
the end, and slipping out with my hat between my
knees, to business, and never feeling myself a
competent
,
sound-minded man, till the oak door is between
me and Peggy!
Ha, ha,not yet! said I; and in so earnest a
tone, that my dog started to his feetcocked his eye
to have a good look into my facemet my smile of
triumph with an amiable wag of the tail, and curled
up again in the corner.
Again, Peggy is rich enough, well enough, mild
enough, only she doesn't care a fig for you. She has
married you because father, or grandfather thought
the match eligible, and because she didn't wish to
disoblige them. Besides, she didn't positively hate
you, and thought you were a respectable enough
person;she has told you so repeatedly at dinner.
She wonders you like to read poetry; she wishes, you
would buy her a good cook-book; and insists upon
your making your will at the birth of the first baby.
She thinks Captain So-and-So a splendid looking
fellow, and wishes you would trim up a little, were
it only for appearance' sake.
You need not hurry up from the office so early at
night:she, bless her dear heart!does not feel
lonely. You read to her a love tale; she interrupts
the pathetic parts with directions to her seamstress.
You read of marriages: she sighs, and asks if Captain
So and So has left town? She hates to be mewed up
in a cottage, or between brick walls; she does
so
love
the Springs!
But, again, Peggy loves you;at least she swears
it, with her hand on the Sorrows of Werter. She
has pin-money which she spends for the Literary
World, and the Friends in Council. She is not
bad-looking
,
save a bit too much of forehead; nor is she
sluttish, unless a
neglig
till three o'clock, and an ink
stain on the fore finger be sluttish;but then she is
such a sad blue!
You never fancied when you saw her buried in a
three volume novel, that it was anything more than a
girlish vagary; and when she quoted Latin, you
thought innocently, that she had a capital memory
for her samplers.
But to be bored eternally about Divine Dant and
funny Goldoni, is too bad. Your copy of Tasso, a
treasure print of 1680, is all bethumbed and
dogs-eared
,
and spotted with baby gruel. Even your
Senecaan Elzeviris all sweaty with handling.
She adores La Fontaine, reads Balzac with a kind of
artist-scowl, and will not let Greek alone.
You hint at broken rest and an aching head at
breakfast, and she will fling you a serap of Anthology
in lieu of the camphor bottleor chant the
aiai
aiai
, of tragic chorus.
The nurse is getting dinner; you are holding
the baby; Peggy is reading Bruyere.
The fire smoked thick as pitch, and puffed out
little clouds over the chimney piece. I gave the
fore-stick a kick, at thought of Peggy, baby, and
Bruyre.
Suddenly the flame flickered bluely athwart
the smokecaught at a twig belowrolled round the
mossy oak-sticktwined among the crackling
tree-limbs
mountedlit
up the whole body of smoke,
and blazed out cheerily and bright. Doubt vanished
with Smoke, and Hope began with Flame.
II.
BlazeSignifying Cheer.
I PUSHED my chair back; drew up another;
stretched out my feet cosily upon it, rested my
elbows on the chair arms, leaned my head on one hand
and looked straight into the leaping, and dancing
flame.
Love is a flameruminated I; and (glancing
round the room) how a flame brightens up a man's
habitation.
Carlo, said I, calling up my dog into the light,
good fellow, Carlo! and I patted him kindly, and
he wagged his tail, and laid his nose across my knee,
and looked wistfully up in my face; then strode
away,turned to look again, and lay down to sleep.
Pho, the brute! said I, it is not enough after
all, to like a dog.
If now in that chair yonder, not the one your
feet lie upon, but the other, beside youcloser yet
were seated a sweet-faced girl, with a pretty little
foot lying out upon the heartha bit of lace running
round the swelling throatthe hair parted to a charm
over a forehead fair as any of your dreams;and if
you could reach an arm around that chair back,
without fear of giving offence, and suffer your fingers
to play idly with those curls that escape down the
neck; and if you could clasp with your other hand
those little white, taper fingers of hers, which lie so
temptingly within reach,and so, talk softly and low
in presence of the blaze, while the hours slip without
knowledge, and the winter winds whistle uncared
for;if, in short, you were no bachelor, but the
husband of some such sweet image(dream, call it
rather,) would it not be far pleasanter than this cold
single night-sittingcounting the sticksreckoning
the length of the blaze, and the height of the falling
snow?
And if, some or all of those wild vagaries that
grow on your fancy at such an hour, you could whisper
into listening, because loving earsears not tired with
listening, because it is you who whisperears ever
indulgent because eager to praise;and if your
darkest fancies were lit up, not merely with bright
wood fire, but with a ringing laugh of that sweet face
turned up in fond rebukehow far better, than to be
waxing black, and sour, over pestilential humors
aloneyour very dog asleep!
And if when a glowing thought comes into your
brain, quick and sudden, you could tell it over as to
a second self, to that sweet creature, who is not
away, because she loves to be there; and if you could
watch the thought catching that girlish mind, illuming
that fair brow, sparkling in those pleasantest of eyes
how far better than to feel it slumbering, and going
out, heavy, lifeless, and dead, in your own selfish
fancy. And if a generous emotion steals over you
coming, you know not whither, would there not be a
richer charm in lavishing it in caress, or endearing
word, upon that fondest, and most dear one, than in
patting your glossy coated dog, or sinking lonely to
smiling slumbers?
How would not benevolence ripen with such monitor
to task it! How would not selfishness grow faint and
dull, leaning ever to that second self, which is the
loved one! How would not guile shiver, and grow
weak, before that girl-brow, and eye of innocence!
How would not all that boyhood prized of enthusiasm,
and quick blood, and life, renew itself in such
presence!
The fire was getting hotter, and I moved into the
middle of the room. The shadows the flames made,
were playing like fairy forms over floor, and wall,
and ceiling.
My fancy would surely quicken, thought I, if such
being were in attendance. Surely, imagination would
be stronger, and purer, if it could have the playful
fancies of dawning womanhood to delight it. All toil
would be torn from mind-labor, if but another heart
grew into this present soul, quickening it, warming it,
cheering it, bidding it ever,God speed!
Her
face would make a halo, rich as a rainbow,
atop of all such noisome things, as we lonely souls
call trouble. Her smile would illumine the blackest
of erowding cares; and darkness that now seats you
despondent, in your solitary chair for days together,
weaving bitter fancies, dreaming bitter dreams, would
grow light and thin, and spread, and float away,
chased by that beloved smile.
Your friendpoor fellow!dies:never mind,
that gentle clasp of
her
fingers, as she steals behind
you, telling you not to weepit is worth ten friends!
Your sister, sweet one, is deadburied. The
worms are busy with all her fairness. How it makes
you think earth nothing but a spot to dig graves
upon!
It is more:
she
, she says, will be a sister; and
the waving curls as she leans upon your shoulder,
touch your cheek, and your wet eye turns to meet
those other eyesGod has sent his angel, surely!
Your mother, alas for it, she is gone! Is there any
bitterness to a youth, alone, and homeless, like this?
But you are not homeless; you are not alone:
she
is there;her tears softening yours, her smile lighting
yours, her grief killing yours; and you live again, to
assuage that kind sorrow of hers.
Thenthose children, rosy, fair-haired; no, they
do not disturb you with their prattle nowthey are
yours! Toss away there on the green-swardnever
mind the hyacinths, the snowdrops, the violets, if so
be any are there; the perfume of their healthful lips
is worth all the flowers of the world. No need now
to gather wild bouquets to love, and cherish: flower,
tree, gun, are all dead things; things livelier hold
your soul.
And she, the mother, sweetest and fairest of all,
watching, tending, caressing, loving, till your own heart
grows pained with tenderest jealousy, and cures itself
with loving.
You have no need now of any cold lecture to teach
thankfulness: your heart is full of it. No need now,
as once, of bursting blossoms, of trees taking leaf, and
greenness, to turn thought kindly, and thankfully;
for ever, beside you, there is bloom, and ever beside
you there is fruit,for which eye, heart, and soul are
full of unknown, and unspoken, because unspeakable,
thank-offering.
And if sickness catches you, binds you, lays you
downno lonely moanings, and wicked curses at
careless stepping nurses.
The
step is noiseless, and
yet distinct beside you. The white curtains are
drawn, or withdrawn by the magic of that other
presence
;
and the soft, cool hand is upon your brow.
No cold comfortings of friend-watchers, merely
come in to steal a word away from that outer world
which is pulling at their skirts; but, ever, the sad,
shaded brow of her, whose lightest sorrow for your
sake is your greatest griof,if it were not a greater
joy.
The blaze was leaping light and high, and the wood
falling under the growing heat.
So, continued I, this heart would be at length
itself;striving with every thing gross, even now as
it clings to grossness. Love would make its strength
native and progressive. Earth's cares would fly.
Joys would double. Susceptibilities be quickened;
Love master self; and having made the mastery,
stretch onward, and upward toward Infinitude.
And, if the end came, and sickness brought that
followerGreat Followerwhich sooner or later is
sure to come after, then the heart, and the hand of
Love, ever near, are giving to your tired soul, daily
and hourly, lessons of that love which consoles, which
triumphs, which circleth all, and centereth in all
Love Infinite, and Divine!
Kind handsnone but
hers
will smooth the hair
upon your brow as the chill grows damp, and heavy
on it; and her fingersnone but herswill lie in
yours as the wasted flesh stiffens, and hardens for the
ground.
Her
tears,you could feel no others, if
oceans fellwill warm your drooping features once
more to life; once more your eye lighted in joyous
triumph, kindle in her smile, and then
The fire fell upon the hearth; the blaze gave a last
leapa flickerthen anothercaught a little
remaining
twigblazed upwaveredwent out.
There was nothing but a bed of glowing embers,
over which the white ashes gathered fast. I was
alone, with only my dog for company.
III.
AshesSignifying Desolation.
AFTER all, thought I, ashes follow blaze,
inevitably as Death follows Life. Misery
treads on the heels of Joy; Anguish rides swift after
Pleasure.
Come to me again, Carlo, said I, to my dog;
and I patted him fondly once more, but now only by
the light of the dying embers.
It is very little pleasure one takes in fondling brute
favorites; but it is a pleasure that when it passes,
leaves no void. It is only a little alleviating
redundance
in your solitary heart-life, which if lost, another
can be supplied.
But if your heart, not solitarynot quieting its
humors with mere love of chase, or dognot
repressing
year after year, its earnest yearnings after
something
better, and more spiritual,has fairly linked
itself by bonds strong as life, to another heartis the
casting off easy, then?
Is it then only a little heart-redundancy cut off,
which the next bright sunset will fill up?
And my fancy, as it had painted doubt under the
smoke, and cheer under warmth of the blaze, so now
it began under the faint light of the smouldering
embers, to picture heart-desolation.
What kind congratulatory letters, hosts of
them, coming from old and half-forgotten friends, now
that your happiness is a year, or two years old!
Beautiful.
Aye, to be sure beautiful!
Rich.
Pho, the dawdler! how little he knows of
heart-treasure
,
who speaks of wealth to a man who loves
his wife, as a wife should only be loved!
Young.
Young indeed; guileless as infancy; charming
as the morning.
Ah, these letters bear a sting: they bring to mind,
with new, and newer freshness, if it be possible, the
value of that, which you tremble lest you lose.
How anxiously you watch that stepif it lose not
its buoyancy; How you study the colour on that
check, if it grow not fainter; How you tremble at
the lustre in those eyes, if it be not the lustre of
Death; How you totter under the weight of that
muslin sleevea phantom weight! How you fear to
do it, and yet press forward, to note if that breathing
be quickened, as you ascend the home-heights, to look
off on sunset lighting the plain.
Is your sleep, quiet sleep, after that she has
whispered to you her fears, and in the same breath
soft as a sigh, sharp as an arrowbid you bear it
bravely?
Perhaps,the embers were now glowing fresher,
a little kindling, before the ashesshe triumphs over
disease.
But, Poverty, the world's almoner, has come to
you with ready, spare hand.
Alone, with your dog living on bones, and you, on
hopekindling each morning, dying slowly each
night,this could be borne. Philosophy would bring
home its stores to the lone-man. Money is not in his
hand, but Knowledge is in his brain! and from that
brain he draws out faster, as he draws slower from his
pocket. He remembers: and on remembrance he
can live for days, and weeks. The garret, if a garret
covers him, is rich in fancies. The rain if it pelts,
pelts only him used to rain-peltings. And his dog
crouches not in dread, but in companionship. His
crust he divides with him, and laughs. He crowns
himself with glorious memories of Cervantes, though
he begs: if he nights it under the stars, he dreams
heaven-sent dreams of the prisoned, and homeless
Gallileo.
He hums old sonnets, and snatches of poor Jonson's
plays. He chants Dryden's odes, and dwells on
Otway's rhyme. He reasons with Bolingbroke or
Diogenes, as the humor takes him; and laughs at the
world: for the world, thank Heaven, has left him
alone!
Keep your money, old misers, and your palaces,
old princes,the world is mine!
I care not, Fortune, what you me deny,
You cannot rob me of free nature's grace,
You cannot shut the windows of the sky;
You cannot bar my constant feet to trace
The woods and lawns, by living streams, at eve,
Let health, my nerves and finer fibres brace,
And I, their toys, to the great children, leave,
Of Fancy, Reason, Virtue, naught can me bereave!
Butif not alone?
If
she
is clinging to you for support, for consolation,
for home, for lifeshe, reared in luxury perhaps, is
faint for bread?
Then, the iron enters the soul; then the nights
darken under any sky light. Then the days grow
long, even in the solstice of winter.
She may not complain; what then?
Will your heart grow strong, if the strength of her
love can dam up the fountains of tears, and the tied
tongue not tell of bereavement? Will it solace you
to find her parting the poor treasure of food you have
stolen for her, with begging, foodless children?
But this ill, strong hands, and Heaven's help, will
put down. Wealth again; Flowers again; Patrimonial
acres again; Brightness again. But your little Bessy,
your favorite child is pining.
Would to God! you say in agony, that wealth
could bring fulness again into that blanched cheek,
or round those little thin lips once more; but it
cannot. Thinner and thinner they grow; plaintive
and more plaintive her sweet voice.
Dear Bessyand your tones tremble; you feel
that she is on the edge of the grave. Can you pluck
her back? Can endearments stay her? Business is
heavy, away from the loved child; home, you go, to
fondle while yet time is leftbut
this
time you are
too late. She is gone. She cannot hear you: she
cannot thank you for the violets you put within her
stiff white hand.
And thenthe grassy moundthe cold shadow of
head-stone!
The wind, growing with the night, is rattling at the
window panes, and whistles dismally. I wipe a tear,
and in the interval of my Reverie, thank God, that
I am no such mourner.
But gaiety, snail-footed, creeps back to the
household
.
All is bright again;
the violet bed 's not sweeter
Than the delicious breath marriage sends forth.
Her
lip is rich and full; her cheek delicate as a
flower. Her frailty doubles your love.
And the little one she claspsfrail tootoo frail;
the boy you had set your hopes and heart on. You
have watched him growing, ever prettier, ever
winning
more and more upon your soul. The love you
bore to him when he first lisped namesyour name
and hershas doubled in strength now that he asks
innocently to be taught of this, or that, and promises
you by that quick curiosity that flashes in his eye, a
mind full of intelligence.
And some hair-breadth escape by sea, or flood,
that he perhaps may have hadwhich unstrung your
soul to such tears, as you pray God may be spared
you againhas endeared the little fellow to your
heart, a thousand fold.
And, now, with his pale sister in the grave, all
that
love has come away from the mound, where
worms feast, and centers on the boy.
How you watch the storms lest they harm him!
How often you steal to his bed late at night, and lay
your hand lightly upon the brow, where the curls
cluster thick, rising and falling with the throbbing
temples, and watch, for minutes together, the little
lips half parted, and listenyour ear close to them
if the breathing be regular and sweet!
But the day comesthe night ratherwhen you
can catch no breathing.
Aye, put your hair away,compose yourself
listen
again.
No, there is nothing!
Put your hand now to his brow,damp indeed
but not with healthful night-sleep; it is not your
hand, no, do not deceive yourselfit is your loved
boy's forehead that is so cold; and your loved boy
will never speak to you againnever play againhe
is dead!
Oh, the tearsthe tears; what blessed things are
tears! Never fear now to let them fall on his
forehead
,
or his lip, lest you waken him!Clasp him
clasp him harderyou cannot hurt, you cannot
waken
him! Lay him down, gently or not, it is the
same; he is stiff; he is stark and cold.
But courage is elastic; it is our pride. It
recovers
itself easier, thought I, than these embers will
get into blaze again.
But courage, and patience, and faith, and hope
have their limit. Blessed be the man who escapes
such trial as will determine limit!
To a lone man it comes not near; for how can
trial take hold where there is nothing by which to
try?
A funeral? You reason with philosophy. A
grave yard? You read Hervey and muse upon the
wall. A friend dies? You sigh, you pat your dog,
it is over. Losses? You retrenchyou light
your pipeit is forgotten. Calumny? You laugh
you sleep.
But with that childless wife clinging to you in love
and sorrowwhat then?
Can you take down Seneca now, and coolly blow
the dust from the leaf-tops? Can you crimp your
lip with Voltaire? Can you smoke idly, your feet
dangling with the ivies, your thoughts all waving
fancies upon a church-yard walla wall that borders
the grave of your boy?
Can you amuse yourself by turning stinging
Martial
into rhyme? Can you pat your dog, and seeing
him wakeful and kind, say, it is enough? Can
you sneer at calumny, and sit by your fire dozing?
Blessed, thought I again, is the man who escapes
such trial as will measure the limit of patience and
the limit of courage!
But the trial comes:colder and colder were
growing the embers.
That wife, over whom your love broods, is fading.
Not beauty fading;that, now that your heart is
wrapped in her being, would be nothing.
She sees with quick eye your dawning
apprehension
,
and she tries hard to make that step of hers
elastic.
Your trials and your loves together have centered
your affections. They are not now as when you
were a lone man, wide spread and superficial. They
have caught from domestic attachments a finer tone
and touch. They cannot shoot out tendrils into
barren
world-soil and suck up thence strengthening
nutriment
.
They have grown under the forcing-glass
of home-roof, they will not now bear exposure.
You do not now look men in the face as if a
heart-bond
was linking youas if a community of feeling
lay between. There is a heart-bond that absorbs all
others; there is a community that monopolizes your
feeling. When the heart lay wide open, before it
had grown upon, and closed around particular
objects
,
it could take strength and cheer, from a
hundred
connections that now seem colder than ice.
And now those particular objectsalas for you!
are failing.
What anxiety pursues you! How you struggle to
fancythere is no danger; how she struggles to
persuade
youthere is no danger!
How it grates now on your earthe toil and
turmoil
of the city! It was music when you were
alone; it was pleasant even, when from the din you
were elaborating comforts for the cherished objects;
when you had such sweet escape as evening drew
on.
Now it maddens you to see the world careless
while you are steeped in care. They hustle you in
the street; they smile at you across the table; they
bow carelessly over the way; they do not know what
canker is at your heart.
The undertaker comes with his bill for the dead
boy's funeral. He knows your grief; he is
respectful
.
You bless him in your soul. You wish the
laughing street-goers were all undertakers.
Your eye follows the physician as he leaves your
house: is he wise, you ask yourself; is he prudent?
is he the best? Did he never failis he never
forgetful
?
And now the hand that touches yours, is it no
thinnerno whiter than yesterday? Sunny days
come when she revives; colour comes back; she
breathes freer; she picks flowers; she meets you
with a smile: hope lives again.
But the next day of storm she is fallen. She
cannot talk even; she presses your hand.
You hurry away from business before your
time. What matter for clientswho is to reap the
rewards? What matter for famewhose eye will it
brighten? What matter for richeswhose is the
inheritance?
You find her propped with pillows; she is looking
over a little picture-book bethumbed by the dear boy
she has lost. She hides it in her chair; she has pity
on you.
Another day of revival, when the spring sun
shines, and flowers open out of doors; she leans on
your arm, and strolls into the garden where the first
birds are singing. Listen to them with her;what
memories are in bird-songs! You need not shudder
at her tearsthey are tears of Thanksgiving. Press
the hand that lies light upon your arm, and you, too,
thank God, while yet you may!
You are early homemid-afternoon. Your step
is not light; it is heavy, terrible.
They have sent for you.
She is lying down; her eyes half closed; her
breathing long and interrupted.
She hears you; her eye opens; you put your
hand in hers; yours trembles;hers does not. Her
lips move; it is your name.
Be strong, she says, God will help you!'
She presses harder your hand:Adieu!
A long breathanother;you are alone again.
No tears now; poor man! You cannot find them!
Again home early. There is a smell of
varnish
in your house. A coffin is there; they have
clothed the body in decent grave clothes, and the
undertaker is screwing down the lid, slipping round
on tip-toe. Does he fear to waken her?
He asks you a simple question about the
inseription
upon the plate, rubbing it with his coat cuff.
You look him straight in the eye; you motion to the
door; you dare not speak.
He takes up his hat and glides out stealthful as a
cat.
The man has done his work well for all. It is a
nice coffina very nice coffin! Pass your hand over
ithow smooth!
Some sprigs of mignionette are lying carelessly in
a little gilt-edged saucer. She loved mignionette.
It is a good staunch table the coffin rests on;
it is your table; you are a housekeepera man of
family!
Aye, of family!keep down outery, or the nurse
will be in. Look over at the pinched features; is
this all that is left of her? And where is your heart
now? No, don't thrust your nails into your hands,
nor mangle your lip, nor grate your teeth together.
If you could only weep!
Another day. The coffin is gone out. The
stupid mourners have weptwhat idle tears! She,
with your crushed heart, has gone out!
Will you have pleasant evenings at your home
now.
Go into your parlor that your prim housekeeper
has made comfortable with clean hearth and blaze of
sticks.
Sit down in your chair; there is another
velvet-cushioned
one, over against yoursempty. You
press your fingers on your eye-balls, as if you
would press out something that hurt the brain; but
you cannot. Your head leans upon your hand; your
eyes rest upon the flashing blaze.
Ashes always come after blaze.
Go now into the room where she was sicksoftly,
lest the prim housekeeper come after.
They have put new dimity upon her chair; they
have hung new curtains over the bed. They have
removed from the stand its phials, and silver bell;
they have put a little vase of flowers in their place;
3
the perfume will not offend the sick sense now.
They have half opened the window, that the room so
long closed may have air. It will not be too cold.
She is not there.
Oh, God!thou who dost temper the wind to
the shorn lambbe kind!
The embers were dark; I stirred them; there
was no sign of life. My dog was asleep. The clock
in my tenant's chamber had struck one.
I dashed a tear or two from my eyes;how they
came there I know not. I half ejaculated a prayer
of thanks, that such desolation had not yet come nigh
me; and a prayer of hopethat it might never come.
In a half hour more, I was sleeping soundly. My
reverie was ended.
Second Reverie.
Sea Coal and Anthracite.
BY A CITY GRATE.
BLESSED be letters!they are the monitors,
they are also the comforters, and they are the
only true heart-talkers! Your speech and their
speeches, are conventional; they are moulded by
circumstance; they are suggested by the observation,
remark, and influence of the parties to whom the
speaking is addressed, or by whom it may be
overheard
.
Your truest thought is modified half through its
utterance by a look, a sign, a smile, or a sneer. It
is not individual; it is not integral: it is social and
mixed,half of you, and half of others. It bends, it
sways, it multiplies, it retires, and it advances, as the
talk of others presses, relaxes, or quickens.
But it is not so of Letters:there you are, with
only the soulless pen, and the snow-white, virgin
paper. Your soul is measuring itself by itself, and
saying its own sayings: there are no sneers to modify
its utterance,no scowl to scare,nothing is present,
but you, and your thought.
Utter it then freelywrite it downstamp it
burn it in the ink!There it is, a true soul-print!
Oh, the glory, the freedom, the passion of a letter!
It is worth all the lip-talk in the world. Do you say,
it is studied, made up, acted, rehearsed, contrived,
artistic?
Let me see it then; let me run it over; tell me
age, sex, circumstance, and I will tell you if it be
studied or real;if it be the merest lip-slang put
into words, or heart-talk blazing on the paper.
I have a little pacquet, not very large, tied up with
narrow crimson ribbon, now soiled with frequent
handling, which far into some winter's night, I take
down from its nook upon my shelf, and untie, and
open, and run over, with such sorrow, and such joy,
such tears and such smiles, as I am sure make me for
weeks after, a kinder, and holier man.
There are in this little pacquet, letters in the
familiar hand of a motherwhat gentle
admonition
;what
tender affection!God have mercy on
him who outlives the tears that such admonitions, and
such affection call up to the eye! There are others
in the budget, in the delicate, and unformed hand of
a loved, and lost sister;written when she, and you
were full of glee, and the best mirth of youthfulness;
does it harm you to recall that mirthfulness? or to
trace again, for the hundredth time, that scrawling
postscript at the bottom, with its
i's
so carefully
dotted, and its gigantic
t's
so carefully crossed, by the
childish hand of a little brother?
I have added latterly to that pacquet of letters; I
almost need a new and longer ribbon; the old one is
getting too short. Not a few of these new, and
cherished letters, a former Reverie
*
*
The first ReverieSmoke, Flame, and Ashes, was
published some months previous to this, in the Southern
Literary Messenger.
has brought to
me; not letters of cold praise, saying it was well
done, artfully executed, prettily imaginedno such
thing: but letters of sympathyof sympathy which
means sympathythe
and the
It would be cold, and dastardly work to copy
them; I am too selfish for that. It is enough to say
that they, the kind writers, have seen a heart in the
Reveriehave felt that it was real, true. They
know it; a secret influence has told it. What
matters it pray, if literally, there was no wife, and no
dead child, and no coffin in the house? Is not
feeling, feeling; and heart, heart? Are not these
fancies thronging on my brain, bringing tears to my
eyes, bringing joy to my soul, as living, as anything
human can be living? What if they have no material
typeno objective form? All that is crude,a
mere reduction of ideality to sense,a transformation
of the spiritual to the earthy,a levelling of soul to
matter.
Are we not creatures of thought and passion? Is
any thing about us more earnest than that same
thought and passion? Is there any thing more
real,more characteristic of that great and dim
destiny to which we are born, and which may be
written down in that terrible wordForever?
Let those who will then, sneer at what in their
wisdom they call untruthat what is false, because
it has no material presence: this does not create
falsity; would to Heaven that it did!
And yet, if there was actual, material truth
superadded to Reverie, would such objectors
sympathize
the more? No!a thousand times, no; the
heart that has no sympathy with thoughts and
feelings that scorch the soul, is dead alsowhatever
its mocking tears, and gestures may sayto a coffin,
or a grave!
Let them pass, and we will come back to these
cherished letters.
A mother, who has lost a child, has, she says, shed
a tearnot one, but manyover the dead boy's
coldness. And another, who has not lost, but who
trembles lest she lose, has found the words failing as
she read, and a dim, sorrow-borne mist, spreading
over the page.
Another, yet rejoicing in all those family ties, that
make life a charm, has listened nervously to careful
reading, until the husband is called home, and the
coffin is in the house.Stop!she says; and a
gush of tears tells the rest.
Yet the cold critic will sayit was artfully
done. A curse on him!it was not art: it was
nature.
Another, a young, fresh, healthful girl-mind, has
seen something in the love-picturealbeit so weak
of truth; and has kindly believed that it must be
earnest. Aye, indeed is it, fair, and generous one,
earnest as life and hope! Who indeed with a heart
at all, that has not yet slipped away irreparably, and
forever from the shores of youthfrom that fairy land
which young enthusiasm creates, and over which
bright dreams hoverbut knows it to be real? And
so such things will be real, till hopes are dashed, and
Death is come.
Another, a father, has laid down the book in
tears.
God bless them all! How far better this, than
the cold praise of newspaper paragraphs, or the
critically contrived approval of colder friends!
Let me gather up these letters, carefully,to be
read when the heart is faint, and sick of all that there
is unreal, and selfish in the world. Let me tie them
together, with a new, and longer bit of ribbonnot
by a love knot, that is too hardbut by an easy
slipping knot, that so I may get at them the better.
And now, they are all together, a snug pacquet, and
we will label them, not sentimentally, (I pity the one
who thinks it!) but earnestly, and in the best
meaning
of the term
Souvenirs du Cur
.
Thanks to my first Reverie, which has added to
such a treasure!
And now to my
Second Reverie
.
I am no longer in the country. The fields, the
trees, the brooks are far away from me, and yet they
are very present. A letter from my tenanthow
different from those other letters!lies upon my
table, telling me what fields he has broken up for the
autumn grain, and how many beeves he is fattening,
and how the potatoes are turning out.
But I am in a garret of the city. From my
window I look over a mass of crowded house-tops
moralizing often upon the scene, but in a strain too
long, and sombre to be set down here. In place of
the wide country chimney, with its iron fire-dogs, is a
snug grate, where the maid makes me a fire in the
morning, and rekindles it in the afternoon.
I am usually fairly seated in my chaira cozily
stuffed office chairby five or six o'clock of the
evening. The fire has been newly made, perhaps an
hour before: first, the maid drops a withe of paper
in the bottom of the grate, then a stick or two of
pine-wood
,
and after it a hod of Liverpool coal; so that by
the time I am seated for the evening, the sea-coal is
fairly in a blaze.
When this has sunk to a level with the second bar
of the grate, the maid replenishes it with a hod of
Anthracite; and I sit musing and reading, while the
new coal warms and kindlesnot leaving my place,
until it has sunk to the third bar of the grate, which
marks my bed-time.
I love these accidental measures of the hours, which
belong to you, and your life, and not to the world.
A watch is no more the measure of your time, than
of the time of your neighbors; a church clock is as
public, and vulgar as a church-warden. I would as
soon think of hiring the parish sexton to make my
bed, as to regulate my time by the parish clock.
A shadow that the sun casts upon your carpet, or
a streak of light on a slated roof yonder, or the
burning of your fire, are pleasant time-keepers,full
of presence, full of companionship, and full of the
warningtime is passing!
In the summer season I have even measured my
reading, and my night-watch, by the burning of a
taper; and I have scratched upon the handle to the
little bronze taper-holder, that meaning passage of the
New Testament,
the night
cometh!
But I must get upon my Reverie:it was a
drizzly evening; I had worked hard during the day,
and had drawn my bootsthrust my feet into
slippersthrown on a Turkish loose dress, and Greek
capsouvenirs to me of other times, and other
placesand sat watching the lively, uncertain, yellow
play of the bituminous flame.
I.
Sea-Coal.
IT is like a flirtmused I;lively, uncertain,
bright-colored, waving here and there, melting
the coal into black shapeless mass, making foul, sooty
smoke, and pasty, trashy residuum! Yet withal,
pleasantly sparkling, dancing, prettily waving, and
leaping like a roebuck from point to point.
How like a flirt! And yet is not this tossing
caprice of girlhood, to which I liken my sea-coal
flame, a native play of life, and belonging by nature
to the play-time of life? Is it not a sort of essential
fire-kindling to the weightier and truer passionseven
as Jenny puts the soft coal first, the better to kindle
the anthracite? Is it not a sort of necessary
consumption
of young vapors, which float in the soul,
and which is left thereafter the purer? Is there not
a stage somewhere in every man's youth, for just
such waving, idle heart-blaze, which means nothing,
yet which must be got over?
Lamartine says somewhere, very prettily, that
there is more of quick running sap, and floating
shade in a young tree; but more of fire in the heart
of a sturdy oak:
Il y a plus de sve folle et d'ombre
flottante dans les jeunes plants de la fort; il y a
plus de feu dans le vieux cur du chene
.
Is Lamartine playing off his prettiness of
expression
,
dressing up with his poetry,making a good
conscience against the ghost of some accusing
Graziella, or is there truth in the matter?
A man who has seen sixty years, whether widower
or bachelor, may well put such sentiment into words:
it feeds his wasted heart with hope; it renews the
exultation of youth by the pleasantest of
equivocation
,
and the most charming of self-confidence. But
after all, is it not true? Is not the heart like new
blossoming field-plants, whose first flowers are half
formed, one-sided perhaps, but by-and-by, in maturity
of season, putting out wholesome, well-formed
blossoms, that will hold their leaves long and bravely?
Bulwer in his story of the Caxtons, has counted
first heart-flights mere fancy-passagesa dalliance
with the breezes of lovewhich pass, and leave
healthful heart appetite. Half the reading world has
read the story of Trevanion and Pisistratus. But
Bulwer ispast; his heart-life is used up
puis
.
Such a man can very safely rant about the cool
judgment of after years.
Where does Shakspeare put the unripe
heart-age
?All
of it before the ambition, that alone makes
the hero-soul. The Shakspeare man `sighs like a
furnace,' before he stretches his arm to achieve the
`bauble, reputation.'
Yet Shakspeare has meted a soul-love, mature and
ripe, without any young furnace sighs to Desdemona
and Othello. Cordelia, the sweetest of his play
creations, loves without any of the mawkish matter,
which makes the whining love of a Juliet. And
Florizel in the Winter's Tale, says to Perdita, in the
true spirit of a most sound heart
My desires
Run not before mine honor, nor my wishes
Burn hotter than my faith.
How is it with Hector and Andromache?no
sea-coal
blaze, but one that is constant, enduring,
pervading
:
a pair of hearts full of esteem, and best love,
good, honest, and sound.
Look now at Adam and Eve, in God's presence,
with Milton for showman. Shall we quote by this
sparkling blaze, a gem from the Paradise Lost? We
will hum it to ourselveswhat Raphael sings to
Adama classic song.
Him, serve and fear!
Of other creatures, as Him pleases best
Wherever placed; let Him dispose; joy thou
In what he gives to thee, this Paradise
And thy fair Eve!
And again:
Love refines
The thoughts, and heart enlarges: hath his seat
In reason, and is judicious: is the scale
By which to Heavenly love thou mays't ascend!
None of the playing sparkle in this love, which
belongs to the flame of my sea-coal fire, that is now
dancing, lively as a cricket. But on looking about
my garret chamber, I can see nothing that resembles
the archangel Raphael, or `thy fair Eve.'
There is a degree of moisture about the sea-coal
flame, which with the most earnest of my musing, I
find it impossible to attach to that idea of a waving,
sparkling heart which my fire suggests. A damp
heart must be a foul thing to be sure! But whoever
heard of one?
Wordsworth somewhere in the Excursion, says:
The good die first,
And they whose hearts are
dry
as summer dust
Burn to the socket!
What, in the name of Rydal Mount, is a dry
heart? A dusty one, I can conceive of: a
bachelor's
heart must be somewhat dusty, as he nears the
sixtieth summer of his pilgrimage;and hung over
with cobwebs, in which sit such watchful gray old
spiders as Avarice, and Selfishness, forever on the
look out for such bottle-green flies as Lust.
I will neversaid Igriping at the elbows
of my chair,live a bachelor till sixty:never, so
surely as there is hope in man, or charity in woman,
or faith in both!
And with that thought, my heart leaped about in
playful coruscations, even like the flame of the
sea-coal
;rising,
and wrapping round old and tender
memories, and images that were present to me,
trying to cling, and yet no sooner fastened, than off
dancing again, riotous in its exultationa succession
of heart-sparkles, blazing, and going out!
And is there notmused I,a portion of this
world, forever blazing in just such lively sparkles;
waving here and there as the air-currents fan them?
Take for instance your heart of sentiment, and
quick sensibility, a weak, warm-working heart, flying
off in tangents of unhappy influence, unguided by
prudence, and perhaps virtue. There is a paper by
Mackenzie in the Mirror for April, 1780, which sets
this untoward sensibility in a strong light.
And the more it is indulged, the more strong and
binding such a habit of sensibility becomes. Poor
Mackenzie himself must have suffered thus; you
cannot read his books without feeling it; your eye,
in spite of you, runs over with his sensitive griefs,
while you are half-ashamed of his success at
picture-making
.
It is a terrible inheritance; and one that a
strong man or woman will study to subdue: it is a
vain sea-coal sparkling, which will count no good.
The world is made of much hard, flinty substance,
against which your better, and holier thoughts will be
striking fire;see to it, that the sparks do not burn
you!
But what a happy, careless life belongs to this
Bachelorhood, in which you may strike out boldly
right and left! Your heart is not bound to another
which may be full of only sickly vapors of feeling;
nor is it frozen to a cold, man's heart under a silk
boddiceknowing nothing of tenderness but the
name, to prate of; and nothing of soul-confidence,
but clumsy confession. And if in your careless
out-goings of feeling, you get here, only a little lip
vapidity in return; be sure that you will find,
elsewhere
,
a true heart utterance. This last you will
cherish in your inner soula nucleus for a new
group of affections; and the other will pass with a
whiff of your eigar.
Or if your feelings are touched, struck, hurt, who
is the wiser, or the worse, but you only? And have
you not the whole skein of your heart-life in your
own fingers to wind, or unwind, in what shape you
please? Shake it, or twine it, or tangle it, by the
light of your fire, as you fancy best. He is a weak
man who cannot twist and weave the threads of his
feelinghowever fine, however tangled, however
strained, or however stronginto the great cable of
Purpose, by which he lies moored to his life of
Action.
Reading is a great, and happy disentangler of all
those knotted snarlsthose extravagant vagaries,
which belong to a heart sparkling with sensibility;
but the reading must be cautiously directed. There
is old, placid Burton when your soul is weak, and its
digestion of life's humors is bad; there is Cowper
when your spirit runs into kindly, half-sad, religious
musing; there is Crabbe when you would shake off
vagary, by a little handling of sharp actualities.
There is Voltaire, a homeopathic doctor, whom you
can read when you want to make a play of life, and
crack jokes at Nature, and be witty with Destiny;
there is Rousseau, when you want to lose yourself in
a mental dream-land, and be beguiled by the harmony
of soul-music and soul-culture.
And when you would shake off this, and be
sturdiest among the battlers for hard, world-success,
and be forewarned of rocks against which you must
surely smiteread Bolingbroke;run over the
letters of Lyttleton; read, and think of what you
read, in the cracking lines of Rochefoucauld. How
he sums us up in his stinging words!how he puts
the scalpel between the nervesyet he never hurts;
for he is dissecting dead matter.
If you are in a genial careless mood; who is better
than such extemporizers of feeling and nature
good-hearted
fellowsas Sterne and Fielding?
And then again, there are Milton and Isaiah, to
lift up one's soul until it touches cloud-land, and you
wander with their guidance, on swift feet, to the very
gates of Heaven.
But this sparkling sensibility to one struggling
under infirmity, or with grief or poverty, is very
dreadful. The soul is too nicely and keenly hinged
to be wrenched without mischief. How it shrinks,
like a hurt child, from all that is vulgar, harsh, and
crude! Alas, for such a man!he will be buffeted,
from beginning to end; his life will be a sea of
troubles. The poor victim of his own quick spirit
he wanders with a great shield of doubt hung before
him, so that none, not even friends can see the
goodness
of such kindly qualities as belong to him.
Poverty, if it comes upon him, he wrestles with in
secret, with strong, frenzied struggles. He wraps
his scant clothes about him to keep him from the
cold; and eyes the world, as if every creature in it
was breathing chill blasts at him, from every opened
mouth. He threads the crowded ways of the city,
proud in his griefs, vain in his weakness, not stopping
to do good. Bulwer, in the New Timon, has painted
in a pair of stinging Pope-like lines, this feeling in a
woman:
Her vengeful pride, a kind of madness grown,
She hugged her wrongs, her sorrow was her throne!
Cold picture! yet the heart was sparkling under
it, like my sea-coal fire; lifting and blazing, and
lighting and falling,but with no object; and only
such little heat as begins and ends within.
Those fine sensibilities, ever active, are chasing
and observing all; they catch a hue from what the
dull and callons pass by unnoticed,because unknown.
They blunder at the great variety of the world's
opinions; they see tokens of belief, where others see
none. That delicate organization is a curse to a
man; and yet poor fool, he does not see where his
cure lies; he wonders at his griefs, and has never
reckoned with himself their source. He studies
others, without studying himself. He eats the leaves
that sicken, and never plucks up the root that will
cure.
With a woman it is worse; with her, this delicate
susceptibility is like a frail flower, that quivers at every
rough blast of heaven; her own delicacy wounds her;
her highest charm is perverted to a curse.
She listens with fear; she reads with trembling;
she looks with dread. Her sympathies give a tone,
like the harp of Eolus, to the slightest breath. Her
sensibility lights up, and quivers and falls, like the
flame of a sea-coal fire.
If she loves(and may not a Bachelor reason on
this daintiest of topics)her love is a gushing, wavy
flame, lit up with hope, that has only a little kindling
matter to light it; and this soon burns out. Yet
intense sensibility will persuade her that the flame
still scorches. She will mistake the annoyance of
affection unrequited for the sting of a passion, that
she fancies still burns. She does not look deep
enough to see that the passion is gone, and the
shocked sensitiveness emits only faint, yellowish
sparkles in its place; her high-wrought organization
makes those sparks seem a veritable flame.
With her, judgment, prudence, and discretion are
cold measured terms, which have no meaning, except
as they attach to the actions of others. Of her own
acts, she never predicates them; feeling is much too
high, to allow her to submit to any such obtrusive
guides of conduct. She needs disappointment to
teach her truth;to teach that all is not gold that
glittersto teach that all warmth does not blaze.
But let her beware how she sinks under any fancied
disappointments: she who sinks under real
disappointment
,
lacks philosophy; but she who sinks under a
fancied one, lacks purpose. Let her flee as the
plague, such brooding thoughts as she will love to
cherish; let her spurn dark fancies as the visitants of
hell; let the soul rise with the blaze of new-kindled,
active, and world-wide emotions, and so brighten into
steady and constant flame. Let her adjure such
poets as Cowper, or Byron, or even Wordsworth; and
if she must poetize, let her lay her mind to such
manly verse as Pope's, or to such sound and ringing
organry as Comus.
My fire was getting dull, and I thrust in the poker:
it started up on the instant into a hundred little
angry tongues of flame.
Just sothought Ithe over-sensitive heart
once cruelly disturbed, will fling out a score of
flaming passions, darting here, and darting there,
half-smoke, half-flamelove and hatecanker and
joywild in its madness, not knowing whither its
sparks are flying. Once break roughly upon the
affections, or even the fancied affections of such a
soul, and you breed a tornado of maddened action
a whirlwind of fire that hisses, and sends out jets of
wild, impulsive combustion, that make the
bystanders
,even
those most friendlystand aloof, until the
storm is past.
But this is not all that the dashing flame of my
sea-coal suggests.
How like a flirt!mused I again, recurring to
my first thoughtso lively, yet uncertain; so bright,
yet so flickering! Your true flirt plays with
sparkles
;
her heart, much as there is of it, spends itself
in sparkles; she measures it to sparkle, and habit
grows into nature, so that anon, it can only sparkle.
How carefully she cramps it, if the flames show too
great a heat; how dexterously she flings its blaze here
and there; how coyly she subdues it; how winningly
she lights it!
All this is the entire reverse of the unpremeditated
4
dartings of the soul at which I have been looking;
sensibility scorns heart-curbings, and heart-teachings;
sensibility enquires nothow much? but only
where?
Your true flirt has a coarse-grained soul; well
modulated and well tutored, but there is no fineness
in it. All its native fineness is made coarse, by
coarse efforts of the will. True feeling is a rustic
vulgarity, the flirt does not tolerate; she counts its
healthiest and most honest manifestation, all sentiment.
Yet she will play you off a pretty string of sentiment,
which she has gathered from the poets; she adjusts
it prettily as a Ghobelin weaver adjusts the colors in
his
tapis
. She shades it off delightfully; there are
no bold contrasts, but a most artistic mellow of
nuances
.
She smiles like a wizzard, and jingles it with a
laugh, such as tolled the poor home-bound Ulysses
to the Circean bower. She has a cast of the head,
apt and artful as the most dexterous cast of the best
trout-killing rod. Her words sparkle, and flow
hurriedly, and with the prettiest doubleness of meaning.
Naturalness she copies, and she scorns. She accuses
herself of a single expression or regard, which nature
prompts. She prides herself on her schooling. She
measures her wit by the triumphs of her art; she
chuckles over her own falsity to herself. And if by
chance her soulsuch germ as is left of itbetrays
her into untoward confidence, she condemns herself,
as if she had committed crime.
She is always gay, because she has no depth of
feeling to be stirred. The brook that runs shallow
over hard pebbly bottom always rustles. She is
light-hearted, because her heart floats in sparkles
like my sea-coal fire. She counts on marriage, not
as the great absorbent of a heart's-love, and life, but
as a happy, feasible, and orderly conventionality, to
be played with, and kept at distance, and finally to be
accepted as a cover for the faint and tawdry sparkles
of an old and cherished heartlessness.
She will not pine under any regrets, because she
has no appreciation of any loss: she will not chafe at
indifference, because it is her art; she will not be
worried with jealousies, because she is ignorant of
love. With no conception of the soul in its strength
and fulness, she sees no lack of its demands. A
thrill, she does not know; a passion, she cannot
imagine; joy is a name; grief is another; and Life
with its crowding scenes of love, and bitterness, is a
play upon the stage.
I think it is Madame Dudevant who says, in
something
like the same connection:
Les hiboux ne
connaissant pas le chemin par o les aigles vont au
soliel
Poor Ned!mused I, looking at the play of
the firewas a victim and a conqueror. He was a
man of a full, strong naturenot a little impulsive
with action too full of earnestness for most of men to
see its drift. He had known little of what is called
the world; he was frosh in feeling and high of hope;
he had been encircled always by friends who loved
him, and who, may be, flattered him. Scarce had he
entered upon the tangled life of the city, before he met
with a sparkling face and an airy step, that stirred
something in poor Ned, that he had never felt before.
With him, to feel was to act. He was not one to be
despised; for notwithstanding he wore a country air,
and the awkwardness of a man who has yet the
biens
ance
of social life before him, he had the soul, the
courage, and the talent of a strong man. Little
gifted in the knowledge of face-play, he easily
mistook those coy manuvres of a sparkling heart,
for something kindred to his own true emotions.
She was proud of the attentions of a man who
carried a mind in his brain; and flattered poor Ned
almost into servility. Ned had no friends to counsel
him; or if he had them, his impulses would have
blinded him. Never was dodger more artful at the
Olympic Games than the Peggy of Ned's
heart-affection
.
He was charmed, beguiled, entranced.
When Ned spoke of love, she staved it off with
the prettiest of sly looks that only bewildered him the
more. A charming creature to be sure; coy as a
dove!
So he went on, poor fool, until one dayhe told
me of it with the blood mounting to his temples, and
his eye shooting flamehe suffered his feelings to run
out in passionate avowal,entreaty,everything.
She gave a pleasant, noisy laugh, and manifested
such pretty surprise!
He was looking for the intense glow of passion;
and lo, there was nothing but the shifting sparkle of
a sea-coal flame.
I wrote him a letter of condolencefor I was his
senior by a year;my dear fellow, said I, diet
yourself; you can find greens at the up-town market;
eat a little fish with your dinner; abstain from
heating
drinks: don't put too much butter to your
cauliflower; read one of Jeremy Taylor's sermons,
and translate all the quotations at sight; run
carefully
over that exquisite picture of Geo. Dandin in
your Moliere, and my word for it, in a week you will
be a sound man.
He was too angry to reply; but eighteen months
thereafter I got a thick, three-sheeted letter, with a
dove upon the seal, telling me that he was as happy
as a king: he said he had married a good-hearted,
domestic, loving wife, who was as lovely as a June
day, and that their baby, not three months old, was
as bright as a spot of June day sunshine on the grass.
What a tender, delicate, loving wifemused I
such flashing, flaming flirt must in the end make;
the prostitute of fashion; the bauble of fifty hearts
idle as hers; the shifting make-piece of a stage scene;
the actress, now in peasant, and now in princely
petticoats! How it would cheer an honest soul to
call herhis! What a culmination of his heart-life;
what a rich dream-land to be realized!
Bah! and I thrust the poker into the clotted
mass of fading coaljust such, and so worthless is the
used heart of a city flirt; just so the incessant sparkle
of her life, and frittering passions, fuses all that is
sound and combustible, into black, sooty, shapeless
residuum.
When I marry a flirt, I will buy second-hand
clothes of the Jews.
Stillmused Ias the flame danced again
there is a distinction between coquetry and flirtation.
A coquette sparkles, but it is more the sparkle of a
harmless and pretty vanity, than of calculation. It
is the play of humors in the blood, and not the play
of purpose at the heart. It will flicker around a true
soul like the blaze around an
omelette au rhum
,
leaving
the kernel sounder and warmer.
Coquetry, with all its pranks and teasings, makes
the spice to your dinnerthe mulled wine to your
supper. It will drive you to desperation, only to
bring you back hotter to the fray. Who would
boast a victory that cost no strategy, and no careful
disposition of the forces? Who would bulletin such
success as my Uncle Toby's, in a back-garden, with
only the Corporal Trim for assailant? But let a man
be very sure that the city is worth the siege!
Coquetry whets the appetite; flirtation depraves
it. Coquetry is the thorn that guards the rose
easily trimmed off when once plucked. Flirtation is
like the slime on water-plants, making them hard to
handle, and when caught, only to be cherished in
slimy waters.
And so, with my eye clinging to the flickering
blaze, I see in my reverie, a bright one dancing before
me, with sparkling, coquettish smile, teasing me with
the prettiest graces in the world;and I grow
maddened between hope and fear, and still watch with
my whole soul in my eyes; and see her features by
and by relax to pity, as a gleam of sensibility comes
stealing over her spirit;and then to a kindly, feeling
regard: presently she approaches,a coy and
doubtful
approachand throws back the ringlets that lie
over her cheek, and lays her handa little bit of
white handtimidly upon my strong fingers,and
turns her head daintily to one side,and looks up in
my eyes, as they rest on the playing blaze; and my
fingers close fast and passionately over that little
hand, like a swift night-cloud shrouding the pale tips
of Dian;and my eyes draw nearer and nearer to
those blue, laughing, pitying, teasing eyes, and my
arm clasps round that shadowy form,and my lips
feel a warm breathgrowing warmer and warmer
Just here the maid comes in, and throws upon the
fire a pan-ful of Anthracite, and my sparkling
sea-coal
reverie is ended.
II.
Anthracite.
It
does not burn freely, so I put on the blower.
Quaint and good-natured Xavier de Maistre
*
*
Voyage autour de Ma Chambre.
would have made, I dare say, a pretty epilogue about
a sheet-iron blower; but I cannot.
I try to bring back the image that belonged to the
lingering bituminous flame, but with my eyes on that
dark blower,how can I?
It is the black curtain of destiny which drops down
before our brightest dreams. How often the
phantoms
of joy regale us, and dance before us
golden-winged
,
angel-faced, heart-warming, and make an
Elysium in which the dreaming soul bathes, and feels
translated to another existence; and thensudden as
night, or a clouda word, a step, a thought, a
memory
will chase them away, like scared deer vanishing
over a gray horizon of moor-land!
I know not justly, if it be a weakness or a sin to
create these phantoms that we love, and to group them
into a paradisesoul-created. But if it is a sin, it is
a sweet and enchanting sin; and if it is a weakness,
it is a strong and stirring weakness. If this heart is
sick of the falsities that meet it at every hand, and is
eager to spend that power which nature has ribbed it
with, on some object worthy of its fulness and depth,
shall it not feel a rich relief,nay more, an exercise
in keeping with its end, if it flow outstrong as a
tempest, wild as a rushing river, upon those ideal
creations, which imagination invents, and which are
tempered by our best sense of beauty, purity, and
grace?
Useless, do you say? Aye, it is as useless as
the pleasure of looking hour upon hour, over bright
landscapes; it is as useless as the rapt enjoyment of
listening with heart full and eyes brimming, to such
music as the Miserere at Rome; it is as useless as the
ecstacy of kindling your soul into fervor and love, and
madness, over pages that reek with genius.
There are indeed base-moulded souls who know
nothing of this; they laugh; they sneer; they even
affect to pity. Just so the Huns under the avenging
Attila, who had been used to foul cookery and steaks
stewed under their saddles, laughed brutally at the
spiced banquets of an Apicius!
No, this phantom-making is no sin; or if it
be, it is sinning with a soul so full, so earnest, that it
can cry to Heaven cheerily, and sure of a gracious
hearing
peccavimisericorde!
But my fire is in a glow, a pleasant glow, throwing
a tranquil, steady light to the farthest corner of my
garret. How unlike it is, to the flashing play of the
sea-coal!unlike as an unsteady, uncertain-working
heart to the true and earnest constancy of one cheerful
and right.
After all, thought I, give me such a heart; not bent
on vanities, not blazing too sharp with sensibility,
not throwing out coquettish jets of flame, not
wavering
,
and meaningless with pretended warmth, but
open, glowing and strong. Its dark shades and angles
it may have; for what is a soul worth that does not
take a slaty tinge from those griefs that chill the
blood? Yet still the fire is gleaming; you see it in
the crevices; and anon it will give radiance to the
whole mass.
It hurts the eyes, this fire; and I draw up a
screen painted over with rough, but graceful figures.
The true heart wears always the veil of modesty
(not of prudery, which is a dingy, iron, repulsive
screen.) It will not allow itself to be looked on too
nearit might scorch; but through the veil you feel
the warmth; and through the pretty figures that
modesty will robe itself in, you can see all the while
the golden outlines, and by that token, you
know
that
it is glowing and burning with a pure and steady
flame.
With such a heart the mind fuses naturallya
holy and heated fusion; they work together like
twins-born. With such a heart, as Raphael says to
Adam,
Love hath his seat
In reason, and is judicious.
But let me distinguish this heart from your
clay-cold
,
luke-warm, half-hearted soul;considerate,
because ignorant; judicious, because possessed of no
latent fires that need a curb; prudish, because with
no warm blood to tempt. This sort of soul may pass
scatheless through the fiery furnace of life; strong,
only in its weakness; pure, because of its failings;
and good, only by negation. It may triumph over
love, and sin, and death; but it will be a triumph of
the beast, which has neither passions to subdue, or
energy to attack, or hope to quench.
Let us come back to the steady and earnest heart,
glowing like my anthracite coal.
I fancy I see such a one now:the eye is deep
and reaches back to the spirit; it is not the trading
eye, weighing your purse; it is not the worldly eye,
weighing position; it is not the beastly eye,
weighing
your appearance; it is the heart's eye, weighing
your soul!
It is full of deep, tender, and earnest feeling. It
is an eye, which looked on once, you long to look on
again; it is an eye which will haunt your dreams,
an eye which will give a colour, in spite of you, to all
your reveries. It is an eye which lies before you in
your future, like a star in the mariner's heaven; by
it, unconsciously, and from force of deep soul-habit,
you take all your observations. It is meek and quiet;
but it is full, as a spring that gushes in flood; an
Aphrodite and a Mercurya Vauclause and a
Clitumnus
!
The face is an angel face; no matter for curious
lines of beauty; no matter for popular talk of
prettiness
;
no matter for its angles, or its proportions;
no matter for its colour or its formthe soul is there,
illuminating every feature, burnishing every point,
hallowing every surface. It tells of honesty, sincerity
and worth; it tells of truth and virtue;and you
clasp the image to your heart, as the received ideal
of your fondest dreams.
The figure may be this or that, it may be tall or
short, it matters nothing,the heart is there. The
talk may be soft or low, serious or piquanta free
and honest soul is warming and softening it all. As
you speak, it speaks back again; as you think, it
thinks again(not in conjunction, but in the same
sign of the Zodiac;) as you love it loves in return.
It is the heart for a sister, and happy is the
man who can claim such! The warmth that lies in
it is not only generous, but religious, genial,
devotional
,
tender, self-sacrificing, and looking
heavenward
.
A man without some sort of religion, is at best a
poor reprobate, the foot-ball of destiny, with no tie
linking him to infinity, and the wondrous eternity
that is begun with him; but a woman without it, is
even worsea flame without heat, a rainbow without
colour, a flower without perfume!
A man may in some sort tie his frail hopes and
honors, with weak, shifting ground-tackle to business,
or to the world; but a woman without that anchor which
they call Faith, is adrift, and a-wreck! A man may
clumsily contrive a kind of moral responsibility, out
of his relations to mankind; but a woman in her
comparatively isolated sphere, where affection and not
purpose is the controlling motive, can find no basis
for any system of right action, but that of spiritual
faith. A man may craze his thought, and his brain,
to trustfulness in such poor harborage as Fame and
Reputation may stretch before him; but a woman
where can she put her hope in storms, if not in
Heaven?
And that sweet trustfulnessthat abiding love
that enduring hope, mellowing every page and scene
of life, lighting them with pleasantest radiance, when
the world-storms break like an army with smoking
cannonwhat can bestow it all, but a holy soul-tie to
what is above the storms, and to what is stronger
than an army with cannon? Who that has enjoyed
the counsel and the love of a Christian mother, but
will echo the thought with energy, and hallow it with
a tear?
et moi, je pleurs!
My fire is now a mass of red-hot coal. The whole
atmosphere of my room is warm. The heart that
with its glow can light up, and warm a garret with
loose casements and shattered roof, is capable of the
best lovedomestic love. I draw farther off, and the
images upon the screen change. The warmth, the
hour, the quiet, create a home feeling; and that
feeling
,
quick as lightning, has stolen from the world of
fancy (a Promethean theft,) a home object, about
which my musings go on to drape themselves in
luxurious
reverie.
There she sits, by the corner of the fire, in a
neat home dress, of sober, yet most adorning colour.
A little bit of lace ruffle is gathered about the neck,
by a blue ribbon; and the ends of the ribbon are
crossed under the dimpling chin, and are fastened
neatly by a simple, unpretending broochyour gift.
The arm, a pretty taper arm, lies over the carved
elbow of the oaken chair; the hand, white and
delicate
,
sustains a little home volume that hungs from
her fingers. The forefinger is between the leaves,
and the others he in relief upon the dark embossed
cover. She repeats in a silver voice, a line that has
attracted her fancy; and you listenor at any rate,
you seem to listenwith your eyes now on the lips,
now on the forehead, and now on the finger, where
glitters like a star, the marriage ringlittle gold
band, at which she does not chafe, that tells you,
she is yours!
Weak testimonial, if that were all that told
it! The eye, the voice, the look, the heart, tells
you stronger and better, that she is yours. And a
feeling within, where it lies you know not, and
whence it comes you know not, but sweeping over
heart and brain, like a fire-flood, tells you too, that
you are hers! Irremediably bound as Massinger's
Hortensio:
I am subject to another's will, and can
Nor speak, nor do, without permission from her!
The fire is warm as ever; what length of heat in
this hard burning anthracite! It has scarce sunk yet
to the second bar of the grate, though the clock upon
the church-tower has tolled eleven.
Aye,mused I, gailysuch heart does not
grow faint, it does not spend itself in idle puffs of
blaze, it does not become chilly with the passing
years; but it gains and grows in strength, and heat,
until the fire of life, is covered over with the ashes of
death. Strong or hot as it may be at the first, it
loses nothing. It may not indeed, as time advances,
throw out, like the coal-fire, when new-lit, jets of
blue sparkling flame; it may not continue to bubble,
and gush like a fountain at its source, but it will
become
a strong river of flowing charities.
Clitumnus breaks from under the Tuscan
mountains
,
almost a flood; on a glorious spring day I
leaned down and tasted the water, as it boiled from
its sources;the little temple of white marble,the
mountain sides gray with olive orchards,the white
streak of road,the tall poplars of the river margin
were glistening in the bright Italian sunlight, around
me. Later, I saw it when it had become a river,
still clear and strong, flowing serenely between its
prairie banks, on which the white cattle of the valley
browsed; and still farther down, I welcomed it,
where it joins the Arno,flowing slowly under
wooded shores, skirting the fair Florence, and the
bounteous fields of the bright Cascino;gathering
strength and volume, till between Pisa and Leghorn,
in sight of the wondrous Leaning Tower, and the
ship-masts of the Tuscan port, it gave its waters to
its life's gravethe sea.
The recollection blended sweetly now with my
musings, over my garret grate, and offered a flowing
image, to bear along upon its bosom the affections
that were grouping in my Reverie.
It is a strange force of the mind and of the fancy,
that can set the objects which are closest to the heart
far down the lapse of time. Even now, as the fire
fades slightly, and sinks slowly towards the bar, which
is the dial of my hours, I seem to see that image of
love which has played about the fire-glow of my grate
years hence. It still covers the same warm,
trustful
,
religious heart. Trials have tried it; afflictions
have weighed upon it; danger has scared it; and
death is coming near to subdue it; but still it is the
same.
The fingers are thinner; the face has lines of care,
and sorrow, crossing each other in a web-work, that
makes the golden tissue of humanity. But the heart
is fond, and steady; it is the same dear heart, the
same self-sacrificing heart, warming, like a fire, all
around it. Affliction has tempered joy; and joy
adorned affliction. Life and all its troubles have
become
distilled into an holy incense, rising ever from
your fireside,an offering to your household gods.
Your dreams of reputation, your swift
determination
,
your impulsive pride, your deep uttered vows to
win a name, have all sobered into affectionhave all
blended into that glow of feeling, which finds its
centre
,
and hope, and joy in
Home
. From my soul I
pity him whose soul does not leap at the mere
utterance
of that name.
A home!it is the bright, blessed, adorable
phantom
which sits highest on the sunny horizon that
girdeth Life! When shall it be reached? When
shall it cease to be a glittering day-dream, and
become
fully and fairly yours?
It is not the house, though that may have its
charms; nor the fields carefully tilled, and streaked
with your own foot-paths;nor the trees, though
their shadow be to you like that of a great rock in a
weary land;nor yet is it the fireside, with its sweet
blaze-play;nor the pictures which tell of loved
ones, nor the cherished books,but more far than all
theseit is the
Presence
. The Lares of your
worship
are there; the altar of your confidence there;
the end of your worldly faith is there; and adorning
it all, and sending your blood in passionate flow, is
the ecstasy of the conviction, that
there
at least you
are beloved; that there you are understood; that
there your errors will meet ever with gentlest
forgiveness
;
that there your troubles will be smiled away;
that there you may unburden your soul, fearless of
harsh, unsympathizing ears; and that there you may
be entirely and joyfullyyourself!
There may be those of coarse mouldand I have
seen such even in the disguise of womenwho will
reckon these feelings puling sentiment. God pity
them!as they have need of pity.
That image by the fireside, calm, loving, joyful,
is there still: it goes not, however my spirit tosses,
because my wish, and every will, keep it there,
unerring.
The fire shows through the screen, yellow and
warm, as a harvest sun. It is in its best age, and
that age is ripeness.
A ripe heart!now I know what Wordsworth
meant, when he said,
The good die first,
And they whose hearts are dry as summer dust,
Burn to the socket!
The town clock is striking midnight. The cold of
the night-wind is urging its way in at the door and
window-crevice
;
the fire has sunk almost to the third
bar of the grate. Still my dream tires not, but
wraps fondly round that image,now in the far off,
chilling mists of age, growing sainted. Love has
blended into reverence; passion has subsided into
joyous content.
And what if age comes, said I, in a new flush
of excitation,what else proves the wine? What
else gives inner strength, and knowledge, and a
steady pilot-hand, to steer your boat out boldly upon
that shoreless sea, where the river of life is running?
Let the white ashes gather; let the silver hair lie,
where lay the auburn; let the eye gleam farther
back, and dimmer; it is but retreating toward the
pure sky-depths, an usher to the land where you will
follow after.
It is quite cold, and I take away the screen
altogether
;
there is a little glow yet, but presently the
coal slips down below the third bar, with a rumbling
sound,like that of coarse gravel falling into a
new-dug
grave.
She is gone!
Well, the heart has burned fairly, evenly,
generously
,
while there was mortality to kindle it; eternity
will surely kindle it better.
Tears indeed; but they are tears of
thanksgiving
,
of resignation, and of hope!
And the eyes, full of those tears, which ministering
angels bestow, climb with quick vision, upon the
angelic ladder, and open upon the futurity where she
has entered, and upon the country, which she enjoys.
It is midnight, and the sounds of life are dead.
You are in the death chamber of life; but you are
also in the death chamber of care. The world seems
sliding backward; and hope and you are sliding
forward
.
The clouds, the agonies, the vain
expectancies
,
the braggart noise, the fears, now vanish
behind
the curtain of the Past, and of the Night.
They roll from your soul like a load.
In the dimness of what seems the ending Present,
you reach out your prayerful hands toward that
boundless Future, where God's eye lifts over the
horizon, like sunrise on the ocean. Do you
recognize
it as an earnest of something better? Aye, if
the heart has been pure, and steady,burning like
my fireit has learned it without seeming to learn.
Faith has grown upon it, as the blossom grows upon
the bud, or the flower upon the slow-lifting stalk.
Cares cannot come into the dream-land where I
live. They sink with the dying street noise, and
vanish with the embers of my fire. Even Ambition,
with its hot and shifting flame, is all gone out.
The heart in the dimness of the fading fire-glow is
all itself. The memory of what good things have
come over it in the troubled youth-life, bear it up;
and hope and faith bear it on. There is no
extravagant
pulse-flow; there is no mad fever of the brain;
but only the soul; forgettingfor onceall, save its
destinies, and its capacities for good. And it mounts
higher and higher on these wings of thought; and
hope burns stronger and stronger out of the ashes of
decaying life, until the sharp edge of the grave
seems but a foot-scraper at the wicket of Elysium!
But what is paper; and what are words? Vain
things! The soul leaves them behind; the pen
staggers like a starveling cripple; and your heart is
leaving it, a whole length of the life-course behind.
The soul's mortal longings,its poor baffled hopes,
are dim now in the light of those infinite longings,
which spread over it, soft and holy as day-dawn.
Eternity has stretched a corner of its mantle toward
you, and the breath of its waving fringe is like a gale
of Araby.
A little rumbling, and a last plunge of the cinders
within my grate, startled me, and dragged back my
faney from my flower chase, beyond the Phlegethon,
to the white ashes, that were now thick all over the
darkened coals.
And thismused Iis only a bachelor-dream
about a pure, and loving heart! And to-morrow
comes cankerous life again:is it wished for?
Or if not wished for, is the not wishing, wicked?
Will dreams satisfy, reach high as they can? Are
we not after all poor grovelling mortals, tied to earth,
and to each other; are there not sympathies, and
hopes, and affections which can only find their issue,
and blessing, in fellow absorption? Does not the
heart, steady, and pure as it may be, and mounting
on soul flights often as it dare, want a human
sympathy
,
perfectly indulged, to make it healthful? Is
there not a fount of love for this world, as there is a
fount of love for the other? Is there not a certain
store of tenderness, cooped in this heart, which must,
and
will
be lavished, before the end comes? Does
it not plead with the judgment, and make issue
with prudence, year after year? Does it not dog
your steps all through your social pilgrimage,
setting
up its claims in forms fresh, and odorous as
new-blown
heath bells, saying,come away from the
heartless, the factitious, the vain, and measure your
heart not by its constraints, but by its fulness, and
by its depth?let it run, and be joyous!
Is there no demon that comes to your harsh
night-dreams
,
like a taunting fiend, whisperingbe satisfied;
keep your heart from running over; bridle those
affections; there is nothing worth loving?
Does not some sweet being hover over your spirit of
reverie like a beckoning angel, crowned with halo,
sayinghope on, hope ever; the heart and I are
kindred; our mission will be fulfilled; nature shall
accomplish
its purpose; the soul shall have its Paradise!
I threw myself upon my bed: and as my
thoughts ran over the definite, sharp business of the
morrow, my Reverie, and its glowing images, that
made my heart bound, swept away, like those fleecy
rain clouds of August, on which the sun paints
rainbows
driven
Southward, by a cool, rising wind from
the North.
I wonder,thought I, as I dropped asleep,
if a married man with his sentiment made actual, is,
after all, as happy as we poor fellows, in our dreams?
Third Reverie.
A Cigar three times Lighted.
OVER HIS CIGAR.
I DO not believe that there was ever an Aunt
Tabithy who could abide cigars. My Aunt
Tabithy hated them with a peculiar hatred. She was
not only insensible to the rich flavor of a fresh rolling
volume of smoke, but she could not so much as
tolerate the sight of the rich russet colour of an
Havana-labelled box. It put her out of all conceit
with Guava jelly, to find it advertised in the same
tongue, and with the same Cuban coarseness of
design.
She could see no good in a cigar.
But by your leave, my aunt, said I to her, the
other morning,there is very much that is good in
a cigar.
My aunt who was sweeping, tossed her head, and
with it, her curlsdone up in paper.
It is a very excellent matter, continued I,
puffing.
It is dirty, said my aunt.
It is clean and sweet, said I; and a most
pleasant soother of disturbed feelings; and a capital
companion; and a comforter and I stopped to
puff.
You know it is a filthy abomination, said my
aunt,and you ought to be, and she stopped
to put up one of her curls, which with the energy of
her gesticulation, had fallen out of its place.
It suggests quiet thoughtscontinued I,and
makes a man meditative; and gives a current to his
habits of contemplation,as I can show you, said I,
warming with the theme.
My aunt, still fingering her papers,with the pin
in her mouth,gave a most incredulous shrug.
Aunt Tabithysaid I, and gave two or three
violent, consecutive puffs,Aunt Tabithy, I can
make up such a series of reflections out of my cigar,
as would do your heart good to listen to!
About what, pray? said my aunt,
contemptuously
.
About love, said I, which is easy enough
lighted, but wants constancy to keep it in a glow;
or about matrimony, which has a great deal of fire
in the beginning, but it is a fire that consumes all
that feeds the blaze;or about life, continued I
earnestly,which at the first is fresh and odorous,
but ends shortly in a withered cinder, that is fit only
for the ground.
My aunt who was forty and unmarried, finished her
curl with a flip of the fingers,resumed her hold of
the broom, and leaned her chin upon one end of it,
with an expression of some wonder, some curiosity,
and a great deal of expectation.
I could have wished my aunt had been a little less
curious, or that I had been a little less
communicative
:
for though it was all honestly said on my part,
yet my contemplations bore that vague, shadowy, and
delicious sweetness, that it seemed impossible to put
them into words,least of all, at the bidding of an
old lady, leaning on a broom-handle.
Give me time, Aunt Tabithy,said I,a good
dinner, and after it a good cigar, and I will serve you
such a sun-shiny sheet of reverie, all twisted out of
the smoke, as will make your kind old heart ache!
Aunt Tabithy, in utter contempt, either of my
mention of the dinner, or of the smoke, or of the old
heart, commenced sweeping furiously.
If I do notcontinued I, anxious to appease
her,if I do not, Aunt Tabithy, it shall be my last
cigar; (Aunt Tabithy stopped sweeping) and all my
tobacco money, (Aunt Tabithy drew near me) shall
go to buy ribbons for my most respectable, and worthy
Aunt Tabithy; and a kinder person could not have
them; or one, continued I, with a generous puff,
whom they would more adorn.
My Aunt Tabithy gave me a half-playful,
half-thankful
nudge.
It was in this way that our bargain was struck;
my part of it is already stated. On her part, Aunt
Tabithy was to allow me, in case of my success, an
evening cigar unmolested, upon the front porch,
underneath her favorite rose-tree. It was concluded,
I say, as I sat; the smoke of my cigar rising
gracefully
around my Aunt Tabithy's curls;our right
hands joined;my left was holding my cigar, while
in hers, was tightly graspedher broom-stick.
And this Reverie, to make the matter short, is
what came of the contract.
I.
Lighted with a Coal.
I TAKE up a coal with the tongs, and setting the
end of my cigar against it, puffand puff again;
but there is no smoke. There is very little hope of
lighting from a dead coal;no more hope, thought
I,than of kindling one's heart into flame, by
contact
with a dead heart.
To kindle, there must be warmth and life; and I
sat for a moment, thinking,even before I lit my
cigar,on the vanity and folly of those poor,
purblind
fellows, who go on puffing for half a lifetime,
against dead coals. It is to be hoped that Heaven,
in its mercy, has made their senses so obtuse, that
they know not when their souls are in a flame, or
when they are dead. I can imagine none but the
most moderate satisfaction, in continuing to love,
what has got no ember of love within it. The
Italians
have a very sensible sort of proverb,
amare, e
non essere amato,  tempo perduto:
to love, and not
be loved, is time lost.
I take a kind of rude pleasure in flinging down a
coal that has no life in it. And it seemed to me,
and may Heaven pardon the ill-nature that belongs
to the thought,that there would be much of the
same kind of satisfaction, in dashing from you a
luke-warm
creature, covered over with the yellow ashes
of old combustion, that with ever so much attention,
and the nearest approach of the lips, never shows
signs of fire. May Heaven forgive me again, but I
should long to break away, though the marriage bonds
held me, and see what liveliness was to be found
elsewhere
.
I have seen before now a creeping vine try to grow
up against a marble wall; it shoots out its tendrils in
all directions, seeking for some crevice by which to
fasten and to climb;looking now above and now
below,twining upon itself,reaching farther up,
but after all, finding no good foothold, and falling
away as if in despair. But nature is not unkind;
twining things were made to twine. The longing
tendrils take new strength in the sunshine, and in the
showers, and shoot out toward some hospitable trunk.
5*
They fasten easily to the kindly roughness of the bark,
and stretch up, dragging after them the vine; which
by and by, from the topmost bough, will nod its
blossoms
over at the marble wall, that refused it suceour,
as if it said,stand there in your pride, cold, white
wall! we, the tree and I are kindred, it the helper,
and I the helped; and bound fast together, we riot
in the sunshine, and in gladness.
The thought of this image made me search for a
new coal that should have some brightness in it.
There may be a white ash over it indeed; as you
will find tender feelings covered with the mask of
courtesy, or with the veil of fear; but with a breath
it all flies off, and exposes the heat, and the glow that
you are seeking.
At the first touch, the delicate edges of the cigar
crimple, a thin line of smoke rises,doubtfully for a
while, and with a coy delay; but after a hearty
respiration
or two, it grows strong, and my cigar is fairly
lighted.
That first taste of the new smoke, and of the
fragrant
leaf is very grateful; it has a bloom about it,
that you wish might last. It is like your first love,
fresh, genial, and rapturous. Like that, it fills up
all the craving of your soul; and the light, blue
wreaths of smoke, like the roseate clouds that hang
around the morning of your heart life, cut you off
from the chill atmosphere of mere worldly
companionship
,
and make a gorgeous firmament for your
fancy to riot in.
I do not speak now of those later, and manlier
passions
,
into which judgment must be thrusting its cold
tones, and when all the sweet tumult of your heart has
mellowed into the sober ripeness of affection. But I
mean that boyish burning, which belongs to every
poor mortal's lifetime, and which bewilders him with
the thought that he has reached the highest point of
human joy, before he has tasted any of that
bitterness
,
from which alone our highest human joys have
spring. I mean the time, when you cut initials with
your jack-knife on the smooth bark of beech trees;
and went moping under the long shadows at sunset;
and thought Louise the prettiest name in the wide
world; and picked flowers to leave at her door; and
stole out at night to watch the light in her window;
and read such novels as those about Helen Mar, or
Charlotte, to give some adequate expression to your
agonized feelings.
At such a stage, you are quite certain that you are
deeply, and madly in love; you persist in the face of
heaven, and earth. You would like to meet the
individual
who dared to doubt it.
You think she has got the tidiest, and jauntiest
little figure that ever was seen. You think back
upon some time when in your games of forfeit, you
gained a kiss from these lips; and it seems as if the
kiss was hanging on you yet, and warming you all
over. And then again, it seems so strange that your
lips did really touch hers! You half question if it
could have been actually so,and how you could have
dared;and you wonder if you would have courage
to do the same thing again?and upon second
thought, are quite sure you would,and snap your
fingers at the thought of it.
What sweet little hats she does wear; and in the
school room, when the hat is hung upwhat curls
golden curls, worth a hundred Golcondas! How
bravely you study the top lines of the spelling book
that your eyes may run over the edge of the cover,
without the schoolmaster's notice, and feast upon
her!
You half wish that somebody would run away with
her, as they did with Amanda, in the Children of the
Abbey;and then you might ride up on a splendid
black horse, and draw a pistol, or blunderbuss, and
shoot the villians, and carry her back, all in tears,
fainting, and languishing upon your shoulder;and
have her father (who is Judge of the County Court,)
take your hand in both of his, and make some
eloquent
remarks. A great many such re-captures you
run over in your mind, and think how delightful it
would be to peril your life, either by flood, or fire,to
cut off your arm, or your head, or any such trifle,
for your dear Louise.
You can hardly think of anything more joyous in
life, than to live with her in some old castle, very far
away from steamboats, and post-offices, and pick wild
geraniums for her hair, and read poetry with her,
under the shade of very dark ivy vines. And you
would have such a charming boudoir in some corner
of the old ruin, with a harp in it, and books bound in
gilt, with cupids on the cover, and such a fairy couch,
with the curtains hungas you have seen them hung
in some illustrated Arabian storiesupon a pair of
carved doves!
And when they laugh at you about it, you turn it
off perhaps with sayingit isn't so; but
afterward
,
in your chamber, or under the tree where you
have cut her name, you take Heaven to witness, that
it is so; and thinkwhat a cold world it is, to be so
careless about such holy emotions! You perfectly
hate a certain stout boy in a green jacket, who is
forever
twitting you, and calling her names; but when
some old maiden aunt teases you in her kind, gentle
way, you bear it very proudly; and with a feeling as
if you could bear a great deal more for
her
sake.
And when the minister reads off marriage
anonuncements
in the church, you think how it will sound one
of these days, to have your name, and hers, read from
the pulpit;and how the people will all look at you,
and how prettily she will blush; and how poor little
Dick, who you know loves her, but is afraid to say so,
will squirm upon his bench.
Heigho!mused I,as the blue smoke rolled
up around my head,these first kindlings of the love
that is in one, are very pleasant!but will they last?
You love to listen to the rustle of her dress, as she
stirs about the room. It is better music than
grownup
ladies will make upon all their harpsichords, in
the years that are to come. But this, thank Heaven,
you do not know.
You think you can trace her foot-mark, on your
way to the school;and what a dear little foot-mark
it is! And from that single point, if she be out of
your sight for days, you conjure up the whole image,
the elastic, lithe little figure,the springy step,
the dotted muslin so light, and flowing,the silk
kerchief, with its most tempting fringe playing upon
the clear white of her throat,how you envy that
fringe! And her chin is as round as a peachand
the lipssuch lips!and you sigh, and hang your
head; and wonder when you
shall
see her again!
You would like to write her a letter; but then
people
would talk so coldly about it; and beside you are
not quite sure you could write such billets as
Thaddeus
of Warsaw used to write; and anything less
warm or elegant, would not do at all. You talk about
this one, or that one, whom they call pretty, in the
coolest way in the world; you see very little of their
prettiness; they are good girls to be sure; and you
hope they will get good husbands some day or other;
but it is not a matter that concerns you very much.
They do not live in your world of romance; they are
not the angels of that sky which your heart makes
rosy, and to which I have likened the blue waves of
this rolling smoke.
You can even joke as you talk of others; you can
smile,as you thinkvery graciously; you can say
laughingly that you are deeply in love with them, and
think it a most capital joke; you can touch their
hands, or steal a kiss from them in your games, most
imperturbably;they are very dead coals.
But the live one is very lively. When you take
the name on your lip, it seems somehow, to be made
of different materials from the rest; you cannot half
so easily separate it into letters;write it, indeed
you can; for you have had practice,very much
private
practice on odd scraps of paper, and on the
flyleaves
of geographies, and of your natural philosophy.
You know perfectly well how it looks; it seems to
be written indeed, somewhere behind your eyes; and
in such happy position with respect to the optic
nerve, that you see it all the time, though you are
looking in an opposite direction; and so distinctly,
that you have great fears lest people looking into your
eyes, should see it too!
For all this, it is a far more delicate name to
handle
than most that you know of. Though it is very
cool, and pleasant on the brain, it is very hot, and
difficult to manage on the lip. It is not, as your
schoolmaster would say,a name, so much as it is an
idea;not a noun, but a verb,an active, and
transitive
verb; and yet a most irregular verb, wanting
the passive voice.
It is something against your schoolmaster's
doctrine
,
to find warmth in the moonlight; but with that
soft handit is very softlying within your arm,
there is a great deal of warmth, whatever the
philosophers
may say, even in pale moonlight. The beams
too, breed sympathies, very close-running sympathies,
not talked about in the chapters on optics, and
altogether
too fine for language. And under their
influence
,
you retain the little hand, that you had not
dared retain so long before; and her struggle to
recover
it,if indeed it be a struggle,is infinitely less
than it was;nay, it is a kind of struggle, not so
much against you, as between gladness and modesty.
It makes you as bold as a lion; and the feeble hand
like a poor lamb in the lion's clutch, is powerless,
and very meek;and failing of escape, it will sue for
gentle treatment; and will meet your warm promise,
with a kind of grateful pressure, that is but half
acknowledged, by the hand that makes it.
My cigar is burning with wondrous freeness; and
from the smoke flash forth images bright and quick
as lightningwith no thunder, but the thunder of
the pulse. But will it all last? Damp will deaden
the fire of a cigar; and there are hellish damps
alas, too many,that will deaden the early blazing
of the heart.
She is pretty,growing prettier to your eye, the
more you look upon her, and prettier to your ear, the
more you listen to her. But you wonder who the
tall boy was, who you saw walking with her, two days
ago? He was not a bad-looking boy; on the
contrary
,
you think,(with a grit of your teeth)that
he was infernally handsome! You look at him very
shyly, and very closely, when you pass him; and turn
to see how he walks, and to measure his shoulders,
and are quite disgusted with the very modest, and
gentlemanly way, with which he carries himself.
You think you would like to have a fisticuff with him,
if you were only sure of having the best of it. You
sound the neighborhood coyly, to find out who the
strange boy is; and are half ashamed of yourself for
doing it.
You gather a magnificent bouquet to send her, and
tie it with a green ribbon, and a love knot,and get
a little rose-bud in acknowledgment.
That
day, you
pass the tall-boy with a very patronizing look; and
wonder if he would not like to have a sail in
your
boat?
But by and by, you find the tall boy walking with
her again; and she looks sideways at him, and with a
kind of grown up air, that makes you feel very
boy-like
,
and humble, and furious. And you look
daggers
at him when you pass; and touch your cap to
her, with quite uncommon dignity;and wonder if
she is not sorry, and does not feel very badly, to have
got such a look from you?
On some other day, however, you meet her alone;
and the sight of her makes your face wear a genial,
sunny air; and you talk a little sadly about your
fears and your jealousies; she seems a little sad, and
a little glad, together;and is sorry she has made
you feel badly,and you are sorry too. And with
this pleasant twin sorrow, you are knit together again
closer than ever. That one little tear of hers has
been worth more to you than a thousand smiles.
Now you love her madly; you could swear itswear
it to her, or swear it to the universe. You even say
as much to some kind old friend at night-fall; but
your mention of her, is tremulous and joyful,with
a kind of bound in your speech, as if the heart worked
too quick for the tongue; and as if the lips were
ashamed to be passing over such secrets of the soul,
to the mere sense of hearing. At this stage, you
cannot trust yourself to speak her praises; or if you
venture, the expletives fly away with your thought,
before you can chain it into language; and your
speech, at your best endeavor, is but a succession of
broken superlatives, that you are ashamed of. You
strain for language that will scald the thought of her;
but hot as you can make it, it falls back upon your
heated fancy, like a cold shower.
Heat so intense as this consumes very fast; and
the matter it feeds fastest on, isjudgment; and
with judgment gone, there is room for jealousy to
creep in. You grow petulant at another sight of that
tall-boy; and the one tear, which cured your first
petulance, will not cure it now. You let a little of
your fever break out in speecha speech which you
go home to mourn over. But she knows nothing of
the mourning, while she knows very much of the
anger. Vain tears are very apt to breed pride; and
when you go again with your petulance, you will find
your rosy-lipped girl taking her first studies in
dignity
You will stay away, you say;poor fool, you
are feeding on what your disease loves best! You
wonder if she is not sighing for your return,and if
your name is not running in her thought,and if
tears of regret are not moistening those sweet eyes.
And wondering thus, you stroll moodily, and
hopefully toward her father's home; you pass the
door oncetwice; you loiter under the shade of an
old tree, where you have sometimes bid her adieu;
your old fondness is struggling with your pride, and
has almost made the mastery; but in the very
moment
of victory, you see yonder your hated rival, and
beside him looking very gleeful, and happyyour
perfidious
Louise.
How quick you throw off the marks of your
struggle
,
and put on the boldest air of boyhood; and what
a dexterous handling to your knife, and a wonderful
keenness to the edge, as you cut away from the bark
of the beech tree, all trace of her name! Still there
is a little silent relenting, and a few tears at night,
and a little tremor of the hand, as you tear outthe
next day,every fly leaf that bears her name. But
at sight of your rival,looking so jaunty, and in such
capital spirits, you put on the proud man again.
You may meet her, but you say nothing of your
struggles;oh no, not one word of that!but you
talk with amazing rapidity about your games, or what
not; and you nevernever give her another peep
into your boyish heart!
For a week, you do not see her,nor for a month,
nor two monthsnor three.
Puffpuff once more; there is only a little
nauseous smoke and nowmy cigar is gone out
altogether. I must light again.
II.
With a Wisp of Paper.
THERE are those who throw away a cigar, when
once gone out; they must needs have plenty
more. But nobody that I ever heard of, keeps a cedar
box of hearts, labelled at Havanna. Alas, there is
but one to light!
But can a heart once lit, be lighted again?
Authority
on this point is worth something; yet it should
be impartial authority. I should be loth to take in
evidence, for the fact,however it might tally with
my hope, the affidavit of some rakish old widower,
who had cast his weeds, before the grass had started
on the mound of his affliction; and I should be as
slow to take, in way of rebutting testimony, the oath
of any sweet young girl, just becoming conscious of
her heart's existenceby its loss.
Very much, it seems to me, depends upon the
quality of the fire: and I can easily conceive of one
so pure, so constant, so exhausting, that if it were
once gone out, whether in the chills of death, or under
the blasts of pitiless fortune, there would be no
re-kindling
;simply
because there would be nothing
left to kindle. And I can imagine too a fire so
earnest, and so true, that whatever malice might urge,
or a devilish ingenuity devise, there could no other
be found, high or low, far or near, which should not
so contrast with the first, as to make it seem cold as
ice.
I remember in an old play of Davenport's, the
hero is led to doubt his mistress; he is worked upon
by slanders, to quit her altogether,though he has
loved, and does still love passionately. She bids him
adieu, with large tears dropping from her eyes, (and I
lay down my cigar, to recite it aloud, fancying all the
while, with a varlet impudence, that some Abstemia
is repeating it to me)
Farewell Lorenzo,
Whom my soul doth love; if you ever marry,
May you meet a good wife; so good, that you
May not suspect her, nor may she be worthy
Of your suspicion: And if you hear hereafter
That I am dead, inquire but my last words,
And you shall know that to the last I loved you.
And when you walk forth with your second choice,
Into the pleasant fields, and by chance talk of me,
Imagine that you see me thin, and pale,
Strewing your path with flowers!
Poor Abstemia! Lorenzo never could find
such another,there never could be such another, for
such Lorenzo.
To blaze anew, it is essential that the old fire be
utterly gone; and can any truly-lighted soul ever
grow cold, except the grave cover it? The poets all
say no: Othello, had he lived a thousand years
would not have loved again;nor Desdemona,nor
Andromache,nor Medea,nor Ulysses,nor
Hamlet
.
But in the cool wreaths of the pleasant smoke,
let us see what truth is in the poets.
What is love,mused I,at the first, but a
mere fancy? There is a prettiness, that your soul
cleaves to, as your eye to a pleasant flower, or your
ear to a soft melody. Presently, admiration comes
in, as a sort of balance-wheel for the eccentric
revolutions
of your fancy; and your admiration is touched
off with such neat quality as respect. Too much of
this indeed, they say, deadens the fancy; and so
retards
the action of the heart machinery. But with a
proper modicum to serve as a stock, devotion is
grafted in; and then, by an agreeable and confused
mingling, all these qualities, and affections of the
soul, become transfused into that vital feeling, called
Love.
Your heart seems to have gone over to another
and better counterpart of your humanity; what is
left of you, seems the mere husk of some kernel that
has been stolen. It is not an emotion of yours,
which is making very easy voyages towards another
soul,that may be shortened, or lengthened, at will;
but it is a passion, that is only yours, because it is
there;
the more it lodges there, the more keenly you
feel it to be yours.
The qualities that feed this passion, may indeed
belong to you; but they never gave birth to such an
one before, simply because there was no place in
which it could grow. Nature is very provident in
these matters. The chrysalis does not burst, until
there is a wing to help the gauze-fly upward. The
shell does not break, until the bird can breathe; nor
does the swallow quit its nest, until its wings are
tipped
with the airy oars.
This passion of love is strong, just in proportion as
the atmosphere it finds, is tender of its life. Let that
atmosphere change into too great coldness, and the
passion becomes a wreck,not yours, because it is
not worth your having;nor vital, because it has lost
the soil where it grew. But is it not laying the
reproach
6
in a high quarter, to say that those qualities
of the heart which begot this passion, are exhausted,
and will not thenceforth germinate through all of your
life time?
Take away the worm-eaten frame from your
arbour plant, and the wrenched arms of the despoiled
climber will not at the first, touch any new trellis;
they cannot in a day, change the habit of a year.
But let the new support stand firmly, and the needy
tendrils will presently lay hold upon the stranger;
and your plant will regain its pride and pomp;
cherishing perhaps in its bent figure, a memento of
the Old; but in its more earnest, and abounding life,
mindful only of its sweet dependance on the New.
Let the Poets say what they will, these affections
of ours are not blind, stupid creatures, to starve under
polar snows, when the very breezes of Heaven are
the appointed messengers to guide them toward
warmth and sunshine!
And with a little suddenness of manner, I
tear off a wisp of paper, and holding it in the blaze
of my lamp, relight my cigar. It does not burn so
easily perhaps as at first:it wants warming, before
it will catch; but presently, it is in a broad, full
glow, that throws light into the corners of my room.
Just so,thought I,the love of youth,
which succeeds the crackling blaze of boyhood,
makes a broader flame, though it may not be so easily
kindled. A mere dainty step, or a curling lock, or a
soft blue eye are not enough; but in her, who has
quickened the new blaze, there is a blending of all
these, with a certain sweetness of soul, that finds
expression in whatever feature or motion you look
upon. Her charms steal over you gently, and almost
imperceptibly. You think that she is a pleasant
companionnothing more: and you find the opinion
strongly confirmed day by day;so well confirmed,
indeed, that you begin to wonderwhy it is, that she
is such a delightful companion? It cannot be her
eye, for you have seen eyes almost as pretty as
Nelly's; nor can it be her mouth, though Nelly's
mouth is certainly very sweet. And you keep
studying what on earth it can be that makes you so
earnest to be near her, or to listen to her voice.
The study is pleasant. You do not know any study
that is more so; or which you accomplish with less
mental fatigue.
Upon a sudden, some fine day, when the air is
balmy, and the recollection of Nelly's voice and
manner, more balmy still, you wonderif you are
in love? When a man has such a wonder, he is
either very near love, or he is very far away from it;
it is a wonder, that is either suggested by his hope,
or by that entanglement of feeling which blunts all
his perceptions.
But if not in love, you have at least a strong
fancy,so strong, that you tell your friends
carelessly
,
that she is a nice girl,nay, a beautiful girl;
and if your education has been bad, you strengthen
the epithet on your own tongue, with a very wicked
expletive:of which the mildest form would be
`deuced fine girl!' Presently, however, you get
beyond this; and your companionship, and your
wonder, relapse into a constant, quiet habit of
unmistakeable
love:not impulsive, quick, and fiery,
like the first; but mature and calm. It is as if it
were born with your soul, and the recognition of it
was rather an old remembrance, than a fresh passion.
It does not seek to gratify its exuberance, and force,
with such relief as night-serenades, or any
Jacqueslike
meditations in the forest; but it is a quiet, still
joy, that floats on your hope, into the years to come,
making the prospect all sunny and joyful.
It is a kind of oil and balm for whatever was
stormy, or harmful; it gives a permanence to the
smile of existence. It does not make the sea of your
life turbulent with high emotions, as if a strong wind
were blowing;but it is as if an Aphrodite had
broken on the surface, and the ripples were spreading
with a sweet, low sound, and widening far out to the
very shores of time.
There is no need now, as with the boy, to bolster
up your feelings with extravagant vows: even should
yeu try this in her presence, the words are lacking to
put such vows in. So soon as you reach them, they
fail you: and the oath only quivers on the lip, or tells
its story by a pressure of the fingers. You wear a
brusque, pleasant air with your acquaintances, and
hintwith a sly lookat possible changes in your
circumstances. Of an evening, you are kind to the
most unattractive of the wall-flowers,if only your
Nelly is away; and you have a sudden charity for
street beggars, with pale children. You catch
yourself
taking a step in one of the new Polkas, upon a
country walk: and wonder immensely at the number
of bright days which succeed each other, without
leaving a single stormy gap, for your old melancholy
moods. Even the chambermaids at your hotel, never
did their duty one half so well; and as for your man
Tom, he is become a perfect pattern of a fellow.
My cigar is in a fine glow; but it has gone out
once, and it may go out again.
You begin to talk of marriage; but some
obstinate Papa, or guardian uncle think that it will
never do;that it is quite too soon, or that Nelly is
a mere girl. Or some of your wild oats,quite
forgotten by yourself,shoot up on the vision of a
staid Mamma, and throw a very damp shadow on
your character. Or the old lady has an ambition of
another sort, which you, a simple, earnest, plodding,
bachelor, can never gratify;being of only passable
appearance, and unschooled in the fashions of the
world, you will be eternally rubbing the elbows of the
old lady's pride.
All this will be strangely afflictive to one who has
been living for quite a number of weeks, or months,
in a pleasant dream-land, where there were no five
per cents, or reputations, but only a very full, and
delirious flow of feeling. What care you for any
position, except a position near the being that you
love? What wealth do you prize, except a wealth of
heart, that shall never know diminution;or for
reputation, except that of truth; and of honor? How
hard it would break upon these pleasant idealities, to
have a weazen-faced old guardian, set his arm in
yours, and tell you how tenderly he has at heart the
happiness of his niece;and reason with you about
your very small, and sparse dividends, and your
limited business;and caution you,for he has a
lively regard for your interests,about continuing
your addresses!
The kind old eurmudgeon!
Your man Tom has grown suddenly a very stupid
fellow; and all your charity for withered wall-flowers,
is gone. Perhaps in your wrath the suspicion comes
over you, that she too wishes you were something
higher, or more famous, or richer, or anything but what
you are!a very dangerous suspicion: for no man
with any true nobility of soul, can ever make his
heart the slave of another's condescension.
But no,you will not, you cannot believe this of
Nelly;that face of hers is too mild and gracious;
and her manner, as she takes your hand, after your
heart is made sad, and turns away those rich blue
eyes,shadowed more deeply than ever by the long
and moistened fringe;and the exquisite softness, and
meaning of the pressure of those little fingers;and
the low, half sob; and the heaving of that bosom, in
its struggles between love, and duty,all forbid.
Nelly, you could swear, is tenderly indulgent, like the
fond creature that she is, toward all your
short-comings
;
and would not barter your strong love, and
your honest heart, for the greatest magnate in the
land.
What a spur to effort is the confiding love of a
true-hearted
woman! That last fond look of hers,
hopeful
,
and encouraging, has more power within it to
nerve your soul to high deeds, than all the
admonitions
of all your tutors. Your heart, beating large
with hope, quickens the flow upon the brain; and
you make wild vows to win greatness. But alas, this
is a great worldvery full, and very rough;
all up-hill work when we would do;
All down-hill, when we suffer.
*
*
Festus.
Hard, withering toil only can achieve a name; and
long days, and months, and years, must be passed in
the chase of that bubblereputation; which when
once grasped, breaks in your eager clutch, into a
hundred lesser bubbles, that soar above you still!
A clandestine meeting from time to time, and a
note or two tenderly written, keep up the blaze in
your heart. But presently, the lynx-eyed old
guardian
so
tender of your interests, and hers,forbids
even this irregular and unsatisfying correspondence.
Now you can feed yourself only on stray glimpses of
her figureas full of sprightliness and grace, as ever;
and that beaming face, you are half sorry to see from
time to time,still beautiful. You struggle with your
moods of melancholy, and wear bright looks yourself
bright to her, and very bright to the eye of the old
curmudgeon, who has snatched your heart away. It
will never do to show your weakness to a man.
At length, on some pleasant morning, you learn
that she is gone,too far away to be seen, too
closely guarded to be reached. For a while you
throw down your books, and abandon your toil in
despair,thinking very bitter thoughts, and making
very helpless resolves.
My cigar is still burning; but it will require
constant
and strong respiration, to keep it in a glow.
A letter or two dispatched at random, relieve the
excess of your fever; until with practice, these
random
letters have even less heat in them, than the
heat of your study, or of your business. Grief
thank God!is not so progressive, or so cumulative
as joy. For a time, there is a pleasure in the mood,
with which you recal your broken hopes; and with
which you selfishly link hers to the shattered wreck;
but absence, and ignorance tame the point of your
woe. You call up the image of Nelly, adorning other
and distant scenes. You see the tearful smile give
place to a blithesome cheer; and the thought of you
that shaded her fair face so long, fades under the
sunshine
of gaiety; or at best, it only seems to cross
that white forehead, like a playful shadow, that a
fleecy cloud-remnant will fling upon a sunny lawn.
As for you, the world with its whirl and roar, is
deafening the sweet, distant notes, that come up
through old, choked channels of the affections. Life
is calling for earnestness, and not for regrets. So
the months, and the years slip by; your bachelor
6*
habit grows easy and light with wearing; you have
mourned enough, to smile at the violent mourning of
others; and you have enjoyed enough, to sigh over
their little eddies of delight. Dark shades, and
delicious
streaks of crimson and gold colour lie upon your
life. Your heart with all its weight of ashes, can yet
sparkle at the sound of a fairy step; and your face
can yet open into a round of joyous smiles,that are
almost hopes,in the presence of some bright-eyed
girl.
But amid this, there will float over you from time
to time, a midnight trance, in which you will hear
again with a thirsty ear, the witching melody of the
days that are gone; and you will wake from it with a
shudder into the cold resolves of your lonely, and
manly life. But the shudder passes as easy as night
from morning. Tearful regrets, and memories that
touch to the quick, are dull weapons to break through
the panoply of your seared, eager, and ambitious
manhood. They only venture out like timid,
white-winged
flies, when night is come; and at the first
glimpse of the dawn, they shrivel up, and lie without a
flutter, in some corner of your soul.
And when, years after, you learn that she has
returned
a
woman, there is a slight glow, but no
tumultuous bound of the heart. Life, and time
have worried you down like a spent hound. The
world has given you a habit of easy and unmeaning
smiles. You half accuse yourself of ingratitude and
forgetfulness; but the accusation does not oppress
you. It does not even distract your attention from
the morning journal. You cannot work yourself into
a respectable degree of indignation against the old
gentlemanher guardian.
You sighpoor thing!and in a very flashy
waistcoat, you venture a morning call.
She meets you kindly,a comely, matronly dame
in gingham, with her curls all gathered under a
high-topped
comb; and she presents to you two little boys
in smart crimson jackets, dressed up with braid. And
you dine with Madamea family party; and the
weazen-faced old gentleman meets you with a most
pleasant shake of the hand,hints that you were
among his niece's earliest friends, and hopes that you
are getting on well?
Capitally well!
And the boys toddle in at dessertDick to get a
plum from your own dish; Tom to be kissed by his
rosy-faced papa. In short, you are made perfectly
at home; and you sit over your wine for an hour, in
a cozy smoke with the gentlemanly uncle, and with
the very courteous husband of your second flame.
It is all very jovial at the table; for good wine, is
I find, a great strengthener of the bachelor heart.
But afterward, when night has fairly set in, and the
blaze of your fire goes flickering over your lonely
quarters, you heave a deep sigh. And as your
thought runs back to the perfidious Louise, and calls
up the married, and matronly Nelly, you sob over
that poor dumb heart within you, which craves so
madly a free and joyous utterance! And as you lean
over with your forehead in your hands, and your eyes
fall upon the old hound slumbering on the rug,the
tears start, and you wish,that you had married
years ago;and that you too had your pair of
prattling
boys, to drive away the loneliness of your
solitary
hearth stone.
My cigar would not go; it was fairly out.
But with true bachelor obstinacy, I vowed that I
would light again.
III.
Lighted with a Match.
I HATE a match. I feel sure that brimstone
matches were never made in heaven; and it is
sad to think, that with few exceptions, matches are all
of them tipped with brimstone.
But my taper having burned out, and the coals
being all dead upon the hearth, a match is all that is
left to me.
All matches will not blaze on the first trial; and
there are those, that with the most indefatigable
coaxings, never show a spark. They may indeed
leave in their trail phosphorescent streaks; but you
can no more light your cigar at them, than you can
kindle your heart, at the covered wife-trails, which
the infernal, gossipping, old match-makers will lay
in your path.
Was there ever a bachelor of seven and twenty, I
wonder, who has not been haunted by pleasant old
ladies, and trim, excellent, good-natured, married
friends, who talk to him about nice matches`very
nice matches,'matches, which never go off? And
who, pray, has not had some kind old uncle, to fill
two sheets for him, (perhaps in the time of heavy
postages) about some most eligible connection,`of
highly respectable parentage!'
What a delightful thing, surely, for a withered
bachelor, to bloom forth in the dignity of an
ancestral
tree! What a precious surprise for him, who
has all his life worshipped the wing-heeled Mercury,
to find on a sudden, a great stock of preserved, and
most respectable Penates!
In God's name,thought I, puffing
vehemently
,what
is a man's heart given him for, if not to
choose, where his heart's blood, every drop of it is
flowing? Who is going to dam these billowy tides of
the soul, whose roll is ordered by a planet greater
than the moon;and that planetVenus? Who is
going to shift this vane of my desires, when every
breeze that passes in my heaven is keeping it all the
more strongly, to its fixed bearings?
Beside this, there are the money matches, urged
upon you by disinterested bachelor friends, who
would be very proud to see you at the head of an
establishment. And I must confess that this kind of
talk has a pleasant jingle about it; and is one of the
cleverest aids to a bachelor's day-dreams, that can
well be imagined. And let not the pouting lady
condemn me, without a hearing.
It is certainly cheerful to think,for a
contemplative
bachelor,that the pretty ermine which so sets
off the transparent hue of your imaginary wife, or the
lace which lies so bewitchingly upon the superb
roundness of her form,or the graceful boddice,
trimmed to a line, which is of such exquisite
adaptation
to her lithe figure, will be always at her
command
;nay,
that these are only units among the
chameleon hues, under which you shall feed upon her
beauty! I want to know if it is not a pretty cabinet
picture, for fancy to luxuriate uponthat of a sweet
wife, who is cheating hosts of friends into love,
sympathy
and admiration, by the modest munificence of
her wealth? Is it not rather agreeable, to feed your
hopeful soul upon that abundance, which, while it
supplies her need, will give a range to her loving
charities;which will keep from her brow the
shadows of anxiety, and will sublime her gentle
nature
,
by adding to it the grace of an angel of mercy?
Is it not rich, in those days when the pestilent
humours
of bachelorhood hang heavy on you, to foresee in
that shadowy realm, where hope is a native, the quiet
of a home, made splendid with attractions; and made
real, by the presence of her, who bestows them?
Upon my wordthought I, as I continued puffing,
such a match must make a very grateful lighting of
one's inner sympathies; nor am I prepared to say,
that such associations would not add force to the most
abstract love imaginable.
Think of it for a moment;what is it, that we
poor fellows love? We love, if one may judge for
himself, over his cigar,gentleness, beauty,
refinement
,
generosity, and intelligence,and far above
these, a returning love, made up of all these qualities,
and gaining upon your love, day by day, and month
by month, like a sunny morning, gaining upon the
frosts of night.
But wealth is a great means of refinement; and it
is a security for gentleness, since it removes
disturbing
anxieties; and it is a pretty promoter of
intelligence
,
since it multiplies the avenues for its
reception
;
and it is a good basis for a generous habit of
life; it even equips beauty, neither hardening its
hand with toil, nor tempting the wrinkles to come
early. But whether it provokes greatly that
returning
passion,that abnegation of soul,that sweet
trustfulness, and abiding affection, which are to clothe
your heart with joy, is far more doubtful. Wealth
while it gives so much, asks much in return; and
the soul that is grateful to mammon, is not over
ready to be grateful for intensity of love. It is hard
to gratify those, who have nothing left to gratify.
Heaven help the man who having wearied his soul
with delays and doubts, or exhausted the freshness,
and exuberance of his youth,by a hundred little
dallyings of love,consigns himself at length to the
issues of what people call a nice matchwhether of
money, or of family!
Heaven help you(I brushed the ashes from my
cigar) when you begin to regard marriage as only a
respectable institution, and under the advices of staid
old friends, begin to look about you for some very
respectable wife. You may admire her figure, and
her family; and bear pleasantly in mind the very
casual mention which has been made by some of
your penetrating friends,that she has large
expectations
.
You think that she would make a very
capital appearance at the head of your table; nor in
the event of your coming to any public honor, would
she make you blush for her breeding. She talks
well, exceedingly well; and her face has its charms;
especially under a little excitement. Her dress is
elegant, and tasteful, and she is constantly remarked
upon by all your friends, as a `nice person.' Some
good old lady, in whose pew she occasionally sits on a
Sunday, or to whom she has sometime sent a papier
mach card-case, for the show-box of some Dorcas
benevolent society, thinks,with a sly wink,that
she would make a fine wife forsomebody.
She certainly
has
an elegant figure; and the
marriage
of some half dozen of your old flames, warn you
that time is slipping and your chances failing. And
in the pleasant warmth of some after-dinner mood,
you resolvewith her image in her prettiest pelisse
drifting across your brainthat you will marry.
Now comes the pleasant excitement of the chase;
and whatever family dignity may surround her, only
adds to the pleasurable glow of the pursuit. You
give an hour more to your toilette, and a hundred or
two more, a year, to your tailor. All is orderly,
dignified, and gracious. Charlotte is a sensible
woman
,
every body says; and you believe it yourself.
You agree in your talk about books, and churches,
and flowers. Of course she has good tastefor she
accepts you. The acceptance is dignified, elegant,
and even courteous.
You receive numerous congratulations; and your
old friend Tom writes youthat he hears you are
going to marry a splendid woman; and all the old
ladies saywhat a capital match! And your
business
partner, who is a married man, and something
of a wag`sympathizes sincerely.' Upon the whole,
you feel a little proud of your arrangement. You
write to an old friend in the country, that you are to
marry presently Miss Charlotte of such a street,
whose father was something very fine, in his way;
and whose father before him was very distinguished;
you add, in a postscript, that she is easily situated,
and has `expectations.' Your friend, who has a wife
that he loves, and that loves him, writes back kindly
`hoping you may be happy;' and hoping so
yourself
,
you light your cigar,one of your last bachelor
cigars,with the margin of his letter.
The match goes off with a brilliant marriage;at
which you receive a very elegant welcome from your
wife's spinster cousins,and drink a great deal of
champagne with her bachelor uncles. And as you
take the dainty hand of your bride,very
magnificent
under that bridal wreath, and with her face lit
up by a brilliant glow,your eye, and your soul, for
the first time, grow full. And as your arm circles
that elegant figure, and you draw her toward you,
feeling that she is yours,there is a bound at your
heart, that makes you think your soul-life is now
whole, and earnest. All your early dreams, and
imaginations
,
come flowing on your thought, like
bewildering
music; and as you gaze upon her,the
admiration
of that crowd,it seems to you, that all that
your heart prizes, is made good by the accident of
marriage.
Ahthought I, brushing off the ashes again,
bridal pictures are not home pictures; and the hour
at the altar, is but a poor type of the waste of years!
Your household is elegantly ordered; Charlotte
has secured the best of housekeepers, and she meets
the compliments of your old friends who come to dine
with you, with a suavity, that is never at fault. And
they tell you,after the cloth is removed, and you
sit quietly smoking in memory of the old times,
that she is a splendid woman. Even the old ladies
who come for occasional charities, think Madame a
pattern of a lady; and so think her old admirers,
whom she receives still with an easy grace, that half
puzzles you. And as you stand by the ball room
door, at two of the morning, with your Charlotte's
shawl upon your arm, some little panting fellow will
confirm the general opinion, by telling you that
Madame is a magnificent dancer; and Monsieur le
Comte, will praise extravagantly her French. You
are grateful for all this; but you have an
uncommonly
serious way of expressing your gratitude.
You think you ought to be a very happy fellow;
and yet long shadows do steal over your thought;
and you wonder that the sight of your Charlotte in
the dress you used to admire so much, does not
scatter
them to the winds; but it does not. You feel
coy about putting your arm around that delicately
robed figure,you might derange the plaitings of her
dress. She is civil towards you; and tender towards
your bachelor friends. She talks with dignity,
adjusts
her lace cape,and hopes you will make a
figure in the world, for the sake of the family. Her
cheek is never soiled with a tear; and her smiles are
frequent, especially when you have some spruce
young fellows at your table.
You catch sight of occasional notes perhaps, whose
superscription you do not know; and some of her
admirers'
attentions become so pointed, and constant,
that your pride is stirred. It would be silly to show
jealousy; but you suggest to your `dear'as you
sip your tea,the slight impropriety of her action.
Perhaps you fondly long for some little scene, as a
proof of wounded confidence;but nonothing of
that; she trusts, (calling you `my dear,') that she
knows how to sustain the dignity of her position.
You are too sick at heart, for comment, or for
reply.
And is this the intertwining of soul, of which
you had dreamed in the days that are gone? Is this
the blending of sympathies that was to steal from life
its bitterness; and spread over care and suffering, the
sweet, ministering hand of kindness, and of love?
Aye, you may well wander back to your bachelor
club, and make the hours long at the journals, or at
playkilling the flagging lapse of your life! Talk
sprightly with your old friends,and mimic the joy
you have not; or you will wear a bad name upon
your hearth, and head. Never suffer your Charlotte
to catch sight of the tears which in bitter hours, may
start from your eye; or to hear the sighs which in
your times of solitary musings, may break forth
sudden
,
and heavy. Go on counterfeiting your life, as
you have begun. It was a nice match; and you are
a nice husband!
But you have a little boy, thank God, toward
whom your heart runs out freely; and you love to
catch him in his respite from your well-ordered
nursery
,
and the tasks of his teachersalone;and to
spend upon him a little of that depth of feeling,
which through so many years has scarce been stirred.
You play with him at his games; you fondle him;
you take him to your bosom.
But papahe sayssee how you have tumbled
my collar. What shall I tell mamma?
Tell her, my boy, that I love you!
Ah, thought I(my cigar was getting dull, and
nauseous,)is there not a spot in your heart, that
the gloved hand of your elegant wife has never
reached:that you wish it might reach?
You go to see a far-away friend: his was not a
`nice match:' he was married years before you: and
yet the beaming looks of his wife, and his lively
smile, are as fresh and honest as they were years
ago; and they make you ashamed of your
disconsolate
humour. Your stay is lengthened, but the
home letters are not urgent for your return: yet
they are marvellously proper letters, and rounded
with a French
adieu
. You could have wished a little
scrawl from your boy at the bottom, in the place of
the postscript which gives you the names of a new
opera troupe; and you hint as mucha very bold
stroke for you.
Ben,she says,writes too shamefully.
And at your return, there is no great anticipation
of delight; in contrast with the old dreams, that a
pleasant summer's journey has called up, your parlour
as you enter itso elegant, so stillso modish
seems the charnel-house of your heart.
By and by, you fall into weary days of sickness;
you have capital nursesnurses highly
recommended
nurses
who never make mistakesnurses who
have served long in the family. But alas for that
heart of sympathy, and for that sweet face, shaded
with your painlike a soft landscape with flying
cloudsyou have none of them! Your pattern wife
may come in from time to time to look after your
nurse, or to ask after your sleep, and glide outher
silk dress rustling upon the doorlike dead leaves
in the cool night breezes of winter. Or perhaps
after putting this chair in its place, and adjusting to a
more tasteful fold that curtainshe will ask you, with
a tone that might mean sympathy, if it were not a
stranger to you,if she can do anything more.
Thank heras kindly as you can, and close your
eyes, and dream:or rouse up, to lay your hand
upon the head of your little boy,to drink in health,
and happiness, from his earnest look, as he gazes
strangely upon your pale and shrunken forehead.
Your smile even, ghastly with long suffering, disturbs
him; there is no interpreter, save the heart, between
you.
Your parched lips feel strangely, to his flushed,
healthful face; and he steps about on tip-toe, at a
motion from the nurse, to look at all those
rosy-colored
medicines upon the table,and he takes
your cane from the corner, and passes his hand over
the smooth ivory head; and he runs his eye along the
wall from picture to picture, till it rests on one he
knows,a figure in bridal dress,beautiful, almost
fond;and he forgets himself, and says aloud
`there's mamma!'
The nurse puts her finger to her lip; you waken
from your doze to see where your eager boy is
looking
;
and your eyes too, take in much as they can of
that figurenow shadowy to your fainting vision
doubly shadowy to your fainting heart!
From day to day, you sink from life: the physician
says the end is not far off; why should it be?
There is very little elastic force within you to keep
the end away. Madame is called, and your little
boy. Your sight is dim, but they whisper that she
is beside your bed; and you reach out your hand
both hands. You fancy you hear a sob:a strange
sound! It seems as if it came from distant years
a confused, broken sigh, sweeping over the long
stretch of your life: and a sigh from your heart
not audibleanswers it.
Your trembling fingers clutch the hand of your
little boy, and you drag him toward you, and move
your lips, as if you would speak to him; and they
place his head near you, so that you feel his fine hair
brushing your cheek.My boy, you must love
your mother!
Your other hand feels a quick, convulsive grasp,
and something like a tear drops upon your face.
Good God!Can it be indeed a tear?
You strain your vision, and a feeble smile flits
over your features, as you seem to see her figure
the figure of the paintingbending over you; and
you feel a bound at your heartthe same bound that
you felt on your bridal morning;the same bound
which you used to feel in the spring-time of your
life.
Only onerich, full bound of the heart;
that is all!
My cigar was out. I could not have lit it
again, if I would. It was wholly burned.
Aunt Tabithysaid I, as I finished reading,
may I smoke now under your rose tree?
Aunt Tabithy who had laid down her knitting to
hear me,smiled,brushed a tear from her old
eyes,said,YesIsaac, and having scratched
the back of her head, with the disengaged needle,
resumed her knitting.
Fourth Reverie.
Morning, Noon, and Evening.
MORNING, NOON, AND EVENING.
IT is a Spring day under the oaksthe loved oaks
of a once cherished home,now alas, mine no
longer!
I had sold the old farm-house, and the groves,
and the cool springs, where I had bathed my head in
the heats of summer; and with the first warm days
of May, they were to pass from me forever. Seventy
years they had been in the possession of my mother's
family; for seventy years, they had borne the same
name of proprietorship; for seventy years, the Lares
of our country home, often neglected, almost
forgotten
,yet
brightened from time to time, by gleams
of heart-worship, had held their place in the sweet
valley of Elmgrove.
And in this changeful, bustling, American life of
ours, seventy years is no child's holiday. The hurry
of action, and progress, may pass over it with quick
step; but the foot-prints are many and deep. You
surely will not wonder that it made me sad and
thoughtful, to break the chain of years, that bound
to my heart, the oaks, the hills, the springs, the
valleyand such a valley!
A wild stream runs through it,large enough
to make a river for English landscape,winding
between
rich banks, where in summer time, the
swallows
build their nests, and brood by myriads.
Tall elms rise here and there along the margin,
and with their uplifted arms, and leafy spray, throw
great patches of shade upon the meadow. Old
lion-like
oaks too, where the meadow-soil hardens into
rolling upland, fasten to the ground with their ridgy
roots; and with their gray, scraggy limbs, make
delicious
shelter for the panting workers, or for the
herds of August.
Westward of the stream, where I am lying, the
banks roll up swiftly into sloping hills, covered with
groves of oaks, and green pasture lands, dotted with
mossy rocks. And farther on, where some wood has
been swept down, some ten years gone, by the axe,
the new growth, heavy with the luxuriant foliage of
spring, covers wide spots of the slanting land;while
some dead tree in the midst, still stretches out its
bare arms to the blasta solitary mourner, over the
wreck of its forest brothers.
Eastward, the ridgy bank passes into wavy
meadows
,
upon whose farther edge, you see the roofs of
an old mansion, with tall chimneys and taller
elm-trees
shading it. Beyond, the hills rise gently, and
sweep away into wood-crowned heights, that are blue
with distance. At the upper end of the valley, the
stream is lost to the eye, in a wide swamp wood,
which in the autumn time is covered with a scarlet
sheet, blotched here and there by the dark crimson
stains of the ash-tops. Farther on, the hills crowd
close to the brook, and come down with granite
boulders, and scattered birch trees, and beeches,
under which, upon the smoky mornings of May, I
have time and again loitered, and thrown my line into
the pools, which curl, dark, and still, under their
tangled roots.
Below, and looking southward, through the
openings
of the oaks that shade me, I see a broad stretch
of meadow, with glimpses of the silver surface of the
stream, and of the giant solitary elms, and of some
old maple that has yielded to the spring tides, and
now dips its lower boughs in the insidious current;
and of clumps of alders, and willow tufts,above
which even now, the black-and-white coated
Bob-o'-Lincoln
,
is wheeling his musical flight, while his
quieter mate sits swaying on the topmost twigs.
A quiet road passes within a short distance of me,
and crosses the brook by a rude timber bridge;
beside
the bridge, is a broad glassy pool, shaded by old
maples, and hickories, where the cattle drink each
morning, on their way to the hill pastures. A step
or two beyond the stream, a lane branches across the
meadows, to the mansion with the tall chimneys. I
can just remember now, the stout, broad-shouldered
old gentleman, with his white hat, his long white
hair, and his white headed cane, who built the house,
and who farmed the whole valley around me. He is
gone, long since; and lies in a grave-yard looking
upon the sea! The elms that he planted shake their
weird arms over the mouldering roofs; and his
fruit-garden
shows only a battered phalanx of mossy limbs,
which will scarce tempt the July marauders.
In the other direction, upon this side the brook,
the road is lost to view, among the trees; but if I
were to follow the windings upon the hill-side, it
would bring me shortly upon the old home of my
grandfather; there is no pleasure in wandering there
now. The woods that sheltered it from the northern
winds, are cut down; the tall cherries that made the
yard one leafy bower, are dead. The cornice is
straggling from the eaves; the porch has fallen; the
7*
stone chimney is yawning with wide gaps. Within,
it is even worse; the floors sway upon the
mouldering
beams; the doors all sag from their hinges; the
rude frescos upon the parlor-wall are peeling off; all
is going to decay.And my grandfather sleeps in
a little grave-yard, by the garden-wall.
A lane branches from the country road, within a
few yards of me, and leads back, along the edge of
the meadow, to the homely cottage, which has been
my special care. Its gray porch, and chimney are
thrown into rich relief, by a grove of oaks that skirts
the hill behind it; and the doves are flying uneasily
about the open doors of the granary, and barns. The
morning sun shines pleasantly on the gray group of
buildings; and the lowing of the cows, not yet driven
afield, adds to the charming homeliness of the scene.
But alas, for the poor azalias, and laurels, and vines,
that I had put out upon the little knoll before the
cottage doorthey are all of them trodden down;
only one poor creeper hangs its loose tresses to the
lattice, all dishevelled, and forlorn!
This bye-lane which opens upon my farm-house,
leaves the road in the middle of a grove of oaks; the
brown gate swings upon an oak tree,the brown
gate closes upon an oak tree. There is a rustic seat,
built between two veteran trees, that rise from a little
hillock near by. Half a century ago, there was a
rustic seat on the same hillockbetween the same
veteran trees. I can trace marks of the old blotches
upon the bark, and the scars of the nails, upon the
scathed trunks. Time, and time again, it has been
renewed. This, the last, was built by my own hands,
a cheerful, and a holy duty.
Sixty years ago, they tell me, my grandfather used
to loiter here with his gun, while his hounds lay
around under the scattered oaks. Now he sleeps, as
I said, in the little grave-yard yonder, where I can
see one or two white tablets glimmering through the
foliage. I never knew him; he died, as the brown
stone table says, aged twenty-six. Yesterday I
climbed the wall that skirts the yard, and plucked a
flower from his tomb. I take out now from my
pocket book, that flowera frail, first-blooming
violet
,and
write upon the slip of paper, into which I
have thrust its delicate stem,`From my
grandfather's
tomb:1850.'
But other feet have trod upon this knollfar
more dear to me. The old neighbors have
sometimes
told me, how they have seen, forty years ago,
two rosy-faced girls, idling on this spot, under the
shade, and gathering acorns, and making oak-leaved
garlands, for their foreheads.Alas, alas, the
garlands
they wear now, are not earthly garlands!
Upon that spot, and upon that rustic seat, I am
lying this May morning. I have placed my gun
against a tree; my shot-pouch I have hung upon a
broken limb. I have thrown my feet upon the bench,
and lean against one of the gnarled oaks, between
which the seat is built. My hat is off; my book and
paper, are beside me; and my pencil trembles in my
fingers, as I catch sight of those white marble tablets,
gleaming through the trees, from the height above
me, like beckoning angel faces.If they were
alive!two more near, and dear friends, in a world
where we count friends, by units!
It is morning,a bright spring morning under the
oaksthese loved oaks of a once cherished home.
Last night, I slept in yonder mansion, under the
elms. The cattle going to the pasture are drinking
in the pool by the bridge; the boy who drives them,
is making his shrill halloo echo against the hills.
The sun has risen fairly over the eastern heights,
and shines brightly upon the meadow land, and
brightly upon a bend of the brook below me. The
birds,the blue-birds sweetest and noisiest of all,
are singing over me in the branches. A wood-pecker
is hammering at a dry limb aloft; and Carlo pricks
up his ears, and listens, and looks at me,then
stretches out his head upon his paws, in a warm bit
of the sunshine,and sleeps.
Morning brings back to me the Past; and the past
brings up not only its actualities, not only its events,
and memories, butstranger still,what might have
been. Every little circumstance which dawns on the
awakened memory, is traced not only to its actual,
but to its possible issues.
What a wide world that makes of the Past!a
great and gorgeous,a rich and holy world! Your
fancy fills it up artist-like; the darkness is mellowed
off into soft shades; the bright spots are veiled in
the sweet atmosphere of distance; and fancy and
memory together, make up a rich dream-land of the
past.
And now, as I go on to trace upon paper some of
the visions that float across that dream-land of the
Morning,I will notI cannot say, how much comes
fancy-wise, and how much from this vaulting memory.
Of this, the kind reader shall himself be judge.
I.
The Morning.
ISABEL and I,she is my cousin, and is seven
years old, and I am ten,are sitting together on
the bank of the stream, under an oak tree that leans
half way over to the water. I am much stronger
than she, and taller by a head. I hold in my hands
a little alder rod, with which I am fishing for the
roach and minnows, that play in the pool below us.
She is watching the cork tossing on the water, or
playing with the captured fish that lie upon the bank.
She has auburn ringlets that fall down upon her
shoulders; and her straw hat lies back upon them,
held only by the strip of ribbon, that passes under
her chin. But the sun does not shine upon her head;
for the oak tree above us is full of leaves; and only
here and there, a dimple of the sunlight plays upon
the pool, where I am fishing.
Her eye is hazel, and bright; and now and then
she turns it on me with a look of girlish curiosity, as
I lift up my rod,and again in playful menace, as
she grasps in her little fingers one of the dead fish,
and threatens to throw it back upon the stream.
Her little feet hang over the edge of the bank; and
from time to time, she reaches down to dip her toe in
the water; and laughs a girlish laugh of defiance, as
I scold her for frightening away the fishes.
Bella, I say, what if you should tumble in the
river?
But I won't.
Yes, but if you should?
Why then you would pull me out.
But if I wouldn't pull you out?
But I know you would; wouldn't you, Paul?
What makes you think so, Bella?
Because you love Bella.
How do you know I love Bella?
Because once you told me so; and because you
pick flowers for me that I cannot reach; and
because
you let me take your rod, when you have a
fish upon it.
But that's no reason, Bella.
Then what is, Paul?
I'm sure I don't know, Bella.
A little fish has been nibbling for a long time at
the bait; the cork has been bobbing up and down;
and now he is fairly hooked, and pulls away toward
the bank, and you cannot see the cork.
Here, Bella, quick!and she springs eagerly
to clasp her little hands around the rod. But the
fish has dragged it away on the other side of me;
and as she reaches farther, and farther, she slips,
criesoh, Paul!and falls into the water.
The stream they told us, when we came, was over
a man's head;it is surely over little Isabel's. I
fling down the rod, and thrusting one hand into the
roots that support the overhanging bank, I grasp at
her hat, as she comes up; but the ribbons give way,
and I see the terribly earnest look upon her face as
she goes down again. Oh, my mother!thought I,
if you were only here!
But she rises again; this time, I thrust my hand
into her dress, and struggling hard, keep her at the
top, until I can place my foot down upon a
projecting
root; and so bracing myself, I drag her to the
bank, and having climbed up, take hold of her belt
firmly with both hands, and drag her out; and poor
Isabel, choked, chilled, and wet, is lying upon the
grass.
I commence crying aloud. The workmen in the
fields hear me, and come down. One takes Isabel in
his arms, and I follow on foot to our uncle's home
upon the hill.
Oh my children!says my mother; and she
takes Isabel in her arms; and presently with dry
clothes, and blazing wood-fire, little Bella smiles
again. I am at my mother's knee.
I told you so, Paul, says Isabel,aunty,
doesn't Paul love me?
I hope so, Bella, said my mother.
I know so, said I; and kissed her cheek.
And how did I know it? The boy does not ask;
the man does. Oh, the freshness, the honesty, the
vigor of a boy's heart!how the memory of it
refreshes
like the first gush of spring, or the break of
an April shower!
But boyhood has its
Pride
, as well as its
Loves
.
My uncle is a tall, hard-faced man: I fear him
when he calls mechild; I love him when he
calls mePaul. He is almost always busy with
his books; and when I steal into the library door, as
I sometimes do, with a string of fish, or a heaping
basket of nuts to show to him,he looks for a
moment
curiously at them, sometimes takes them in his
fingers,gives them back to me, and turns over the
leaves of his book. You are afraid to ask him, if
you have not worked bravely; yet you want to do so.
You sidle out softly, and go to your mother; she
scarce looks at your little stores; but she draws you
to her with her arm, and prints a kiss upon your
forehead. Now your tongue is unloosed; that kiss,
and that action have done it; you will tell what
capital luck you have had; and you hold up your
tempting trophies;are they not great, mother?
But she is looking in your face, and not at your
prize.
Take them, mother, and you lay the basket
upon her lap.
Thank you, Paul, I do not wish them: but you
must give some to Bella.
And away you go to find laughing, playful, cousin
Isabel. And we sit down together on the grass, and
I pour out my stores between us. You shall take,
Bella, what you wish in your apron, and then when
study hours are over, we will have such a time down
by the big rock in the meadow!
But I do not know if papa will let me, says
Isabel.
Bella, I say, do you love your papa?
Yes, says Bella, why not?
Because he is so cold; he does not kiss you
Bella, so often as my mother does; and besides,
when he forbids your going away, he does not say, as
mother does,my little girl will be tired, she had
better not go,but he says only,Isabel must not
go. I wonder what makes him talk so?
Why Paul, he is a man, and doesn'tat any
rate, I love him; Paul. Besides, my mother is sick,
you know.
But Isabel, my mother will be your mother too.
Come Bella, we will go ask her if we may go.
And there I am, the happiest of boys, pleading
with the kindest of mothers. And the young heart
leans into that mother's heart;none of the void now
that will overtake it like an opening Koran gulf, in
the years that are to come. It is joyous, full, and
running over!
You may go, she says, if your uncle is
willing.
But mamma, I am afraid to ask him; I do not
believe he loves me.
Don't say so, Paul, and she draws you to her
side; as if she would supply by her own love, the
lacking love of a universe.
Go, with your cousin Isabel, and ask him kindly;
and if he says no,make no reply.
And with courage, we go hand in hand, and steal
in at the library door. There he sitsI seem to see
him now,in the old wainscotted room, covered over
with books and pictures; and he wears his
heavy-rimmed
spectacles, and is poring over some big volume,
full of hard words, that are not in any spelling-book.
We step up softly; and Isabel lays her little hand
upon his arm; and he turns, and sayswell, my
little daughter?
I ask if we may go down to the big rock in the
meadow?
He looks at Isabel, and says he is afraidwe
cannot go.
But why, uncle? It is only a little way, and we
will be very careful.
I am afraid, my children; do not say any more:
you can have the pony, and Tray, and play at
home.
But, uncle
You need say no more, my child.
I pinch the hand of little Isabel, and look in her
eye,my own half filling with tears. I feel that my
forehead is flushed, and I hide it behind Bella's
tresses,whispering to her at the same timelet
us go.
What sir, says my uncle, mistaking my
meaning
do
you persuade her to disobey?
Now I am angry, and say blindlyno, sir, I
didn't! And then my rising pride will not let me
say, that I wished only Isabel should go out with me.
Bella cries; and I shrink out; and am not easy
until I have run to bury my head in my mother's
bosom. Alas! pride cannot always find such covert!
There will be times when it will harrass you strangely;
when it will peril friendships,will sever old,
standing
intimacy; and thenno resource, but to feed on
its own bitterness. Hateful pride!to be conquered,
as a man would conquer an enemy, or it will make
whirlpools in the current of your affectionsnay,
turn the whole tide of the heart into rough, and
unaccustomed
channels!
But boyhood has its
Grief
too, apart from
Pride
.
You love the old dog Tray; and Bella loves him
as well as you. He is a noble old fellow, with shaggy
hair, and long ears, and big paws, that he will put
up into your hand, if you ask him. And he never
gets angry when you play with him, and tumble him
over in the long grass, and pull his silken ears.
Sometimes, to be sure, he will open his mouth, as if
he would bite, but when he gets your hand fairly in
his jaws, he will scarce leave the print of his teeth
upon it. He will swim, too, bravely, and bring
ashore all the sticks you throw upon the water; and
when you fling a stone to tease him, he swims round
and round, and whines, and looks sorry, that he
cannot find it.
He will carry a heaping basket full of nuts too in
his mouth, and never spill one of them; and when
you come out to your uncle's home in the spring,
after staying a whole winter in the town, he knows
youold Tray does! And he leaps upon you, and
lays his paws on your shoulder, and licks your face;
and is almost as glad to see you, as cousin Bella
herself
.
And when you put Bella on his back for a
ride, he only pretends to bite her little feet;but he
wouldn't do it for the world. Aye, Tray is a noble
old dog!
But one summer, the farmers say that some of
their sheep are killed, and that the dogs have worried
them; and one of them comes to talk with my uncle
about it.
But Tray never worried sheep; you know he never
did; and so does nurse; and so does Bella;for in
the spring, she had a pet lamb, and Tray never
worried
little Fidele.
And one or two of the dogs that belong to the
neighbors are shot; though nobody knows who shot
them; and you have great fears about poor Tray;
and try to keep him at home, and fondle him more
than ever. But Tray will sometimes wander off; till
finally, one afternoon, he comes back whining
piteously
,
and with his shoulder all bloody.
Little Bella cries loud; and you almost cry, as
nurse dresses the wound; and poor old Tray whines
very sadly. You pat his head, and Bella pats him;
and you sit down together by him on the floor of the
porch, and bring a rug for him to lie upon; and try
and tempt him with a little milk, and Bella brings a
piece of cake for him,but he will eat nothing.
You sit up till very late, long after Bella has gone to
bed, patting his head, and wishing you could do
something for poor Tray;but he only licks your
hand, and whines more piteously than ever.
In the morning, you dress early, and hurry down
stairs; but Tray is not lying on the rug; and you
run through the house to find him, and whistle, and
callTray!Tray! At length you see him lying
in his old place, out by the cherry tree, and you run
to him;but he does not start; and you lean down
to pat him,but he is cold, and the dew is wet upon
him:poor Tray is dead!
You take his head upon your knees, and pat again
those glossy ears, and cry; but you cannot bring
him to life. And Bella comes, and cries with you.
You can hardly bear to have him put in the ground;
but uncle says he must be buried. So one of the
workmen digs a grave under the cherry tree, where
he dieda deep grave, and they round it over with
earth, and smooth the sods upon iteven now I can
trace Tray's grave.
You and Bella together, put up a little slab for a
tombstone; and she hangs flowers upon it, and ties
them there with a bit of ribbon. You can scarce
play all that day; and afterward, many weeks later,
when you are rambling over the fields, or lingering
by the brook, throwing off sticks into the eddies, you
think of old Tray's shaggy coat, and of his big paw,
and of his honest eye; and the memory of your
boyish grief comes upon you; and you say with tears,
poor Tray! And Bella too, in her sad,
sweet tones, sayspoor old Tray,he is dead!
School Days.
The
morning was cloudy and threatened rain;
besides, it was autumn weather, and the winds were
getting harsh, and rustling among the tree-tops that
shaded the house, most dismally. I did not dare to
listen. If indeed, I were to stay by the bright fires of
home, and gather the nuts as they fell, and pile up the
falling leaves, to make great bonfires, with Ben, and
the rest of the boys, I should have liked to listen, and
would have braved the dismal morning with the
cheerfullest of them all. For it would have been a
capital time to light a fire in the little oven we had
built under the wall; it would have been so pleasant
to warm our fingers at it, and to roast the great
russets
on the flat stones that made the top.
But this was not in store for me. I had bid the
town boys good bye, the day before; my trunk was
all packed; I was to go awayto school. The
little oven would go to ruinI knew it would. I
was to leave my home. I was to bid my mother
good bye, and Lilly, and Isabel, and all the rest;
and was to go away from them so far, that I should only
know what they were all doingin letters. It
was
sad. And then to have the clouds come over on that
morning, and the winds sigh so dismally;oh, it
was too bad, I thought!
It comes back to me as I lie here this bright spring
morning, as if it were only yesterday. I remember
that the pigeons skulked under the eaves of the
carriage
house, and did not sit, as they used to do in
summer, upon the ridge; and the chickens huddled
together about the stable doors, as if they were
afraid of the cold autumn. And in the garden, the
white hollyhocks stood shivering, and bowed to the
wind, as if their time had come. The yellow
muskmelons
showed plain among the frost bitten vines,
and looked cold, and uncomfortable.
Then they were all so kind, in-doors! The
cook made such nice things for my breakfast,
because
little master was going; Lilly
would
give me
her seat by the fire, and would put her lump of sugar
in my cup; and my mother looked so smiling, and so
tenderly, that I thought I loved her more than I ever
8
did before. Little Ben was so gay too; and wanted
me to take his jacknife, if I wished it,though he
knew that I had a bran new one in my trunk. The
old nurse slipped a little purse into my hand, tied up
with a green ribbonwith money in it,and told
me not to show it to Ben or Lilly.
And cousin Isabel, who was there on a visit, would
come to stand by my chair, when my mother was
talking to me; and put her hand in mine, and look
up into my face; but she did not say a word. I
thought it was very odd; and yet it did not seem odd
to me, that I could say nothing to her. I daresay
we felt alike.
At length Ben came running in, and said the
coach had come; and there, sure enough, out of the
window, we saw ita bright yellow coach, with four
white horses, and band-boxes all over the top, with a
great pile of trunks behind. Ben said it was a grand
coach, and that he should like a ride in it; and the
old nurse came to the door, and said I should have a
capital time; but somehow, I doubted if the nurse
was talking honestly. I believe she gave me an
honest kiss though,and such a hug!
But it was nothing to my mother's. Tom told me
to be a man, and study like a Trojan; but I was not
thinking about study then. There was a tall-boy in
the coach, and I was ashamed to have him see me
cry;so I didn't, at first. But I remember, as I
looked back, and saw little Isabel run out into the
middle of the street, to see the coach go off, and the
curls floating behind her, as the wind freshened, I
felt my heart leaping into my throat, and the water
coming into my eyes,and how just then, I caught
sight of the tall boy glancing at me,and how I tried
to turn it off, by looking to see if I could button up
my great coat, a great deal lower down than the
button
holes went.
But it was of no use; I put my head out of the
coach window, and looked back, as the little figure of
Isabel faded, and then the house, and the trees; and
the tears did come; and I smuggled my handkerchief
outside without turning; so that I could wipe my
eyes, before the tall boy should see me. They say
that these shadows of morning fade, as the sun
brightens into noon-day; but they are very dark
shadows for all that!
Let the father, or the mother think long, before
they send away their boybefore they break the
home-ties that make a web of infinite fineness and
soft silken meshes around his heart, and toss him
aloof into the boy-world, where he must struggle up
amid bickerings and quarrels, into his age of youth!
There are boys indeed with little fineness in the
texture
of their hearts, and with little delicacy of soul,
to whom the school in a distant village, is but a
vacation
from home; and with whom, a return revives
all those grosser affections which alone existed
before
;just
as there are plants which will bear all
exposure without the wilting of a leaf, and will return
to the hot-house life, as strong, and as hopeful as
ever. But there are others, to whom the severance
from the prattle of sisters, the indulgent fondness of
a mother, and the unseen influences of the home
altar, gives a shock that lasts forever; it is
wrenching
with cruel hand, what will bear but little
roughness
;
and the sobs with which the adieux are said,
are sobs that may come back in the after years,
strong, and steady, and terrible.
God have mercy on the boy who learns to sob
early! Condemn it as sentiment, if you will; talk
as you will of the fearlessness, and strength of the
boy's heart,yet there belong to many, tenderly
strung chords of affection which give forth low, and
gentle music, that consoles, and ripens the ear for all
the harmonies of life. These chords a little rude,
and unnatural tension will break, and break forever.
Watch your boy then, if so be he will bear the
strain; try his nature, if it be rude or delicate;
and if delicate, in God's name, do not, as you value
your peace and his, breed a harsh youth spirit in him,
that shall take pride in subjugating, and forgetting
the delicacy, and richness of his finer affections!
I see now, looking into the past, the troops of
boys who were scattered in the great play-ground, as
the coach drove up at night. The school was in a
tall, stately building, with a high cupola on the top,
where I thought I would like to go up. The
school-master
,
they told me at home, was kind; he said he
hoped I would be a good boy, and patted me on the
head; but he did not pat me as my mother used to
do. Then there was a woman, whom they called the
Matron; who had a great many ribbons in her cap,
and who shook my hand,but so stiffly, that I didn't
dare to look up in her face.
One boy took me down to see the school room,
which was in the basement, and the walls were all
mouldy, I remember; and when we passed a certain
door, he said,there was the dungeon;how I felt!
I hated that boy; but I believe he is dead now.
Then the matron took me up to my room,a little
corner room, with two beds, and two windows, and a
red table, and closet; and my chum was about my
size, and wore a queer roundabout jacket with big
bell buttons; and he called the schoolmaster`Old
Crikey'and kept me awake half the night, telling
me how he whipped the scholars, and how they played
tricks upon him. I thought my chum was a very
uncommon boy.
For a day or two, the lessons were easy, and it
was sport to play with so many `fellows.' But soon I
began to feel lonely at night after I had gone to bed.
I used to wish I could have my mother come, and
kiss me; after school too, I wished I could step in,
and tell Isabel how bravely I had got my lessons.
When I told my chum this, he laughed at me, and
said that was no place for `homesick, white-livered
chaps.' I wondered if my chum had any mother.
We had spending money once a week, with which
we used to go down to the village store, and club our
funds together, to make great pitchers of lemonade.
Some boys would have money besides; though it was
against the rules; and one, I recollect, showed us a
five dollar bill in his walletand we all thought he
must be very rich.
We marched in procession to the village church
on Sundays. There were two long benches in the
galleries, reaching down the side of the
meeting-house
;
and on these we sat. At the first, I was
among the smallest boys, and took a place close to
the wall, against the pulpit; but afterward, as I grew
bigger, I was promoted to the lower end of the first
bench. This I never liked;because it was close
by one of the ushers, and because it brought me next
to some country women, who wore stiff bonnets, and
eat fennel, and sung with the choir. But there was
a little black-eyed girl, who sat over behind the choir,
that I thought handsome; I used to look at her very
often; but was careful she should never catch my
eye.
There was another down below, in a corner pew,
who was pretty; and who wore a hat in the winter
trimmed with fur. Half the boys in the school said
they would marry her some day or other. One's
name was Jane, and that of the other, Sophia; which
we thought pretty names, and cut them on the ice,
in skating time. But I didn't think either of them
so pretty as Isabel.
Once a teacher whipped me: I bore it bravely in the
school: but afterward, at night, when my chum was
asleep, I sobbed bitterly, as I thought of Isabel, and
Ben, and my mother, and how much they loved me;
and laying my face in my hands, I sobbed myself to
sleep. In the morning I was calm enough:it was
another of the heart ties broken, though I did not
know it then. It lessened the old attachment to
home, because that home could neither protect me,
nor soothe me with its sympathies. Memory indeed
freshened and grew strong; but strong in bitterness,
and in regrets. The boy whose love you cannot feed
by daily nourishment, will find pride, self-indulgence,
and an iron purpose coming in to furnish other supply
for the soul that is in him. If he cannot shoot his
branches into the sunshine, he will become acclimated
to the shadow, and indifferent to such stray gleams of
sunshine, as his fortune may vouchsafe.
Hostilities would sometimes threaten between the
school and the village boys; but they usually passed
off, with such loud, and harmless explosions, as
belong to the wars of our small politicians. The
village champions were a hatter's apprentice, and a
thick set fellow who worked in a tannery. We prided
ourselves especially on one stout boy, who wore a
sailor's monkey jacket. I cannot but think how
jaunty that stout boy looked in that jacket; and what
an Ajax cast there was to his countenance! It
certainly did occur to me, to compare him with
William Wallace (Miss Porter's William Wallace)
and I thought how I would have liked to have seen
a tussle between them. Of course, we who were
small boys, limited ourselves to indignant remark, and
thought `we should like to see them do it'; and
prepared clubs from the wood-shed, after a model
suggested by a New York boy, who had seen the
clubs of the Policemen.
There was one scholar,poor Leslie, who had
friends in some foreign country, and who occasionally
received letters bearing a foreign post-mark:what
an extraordinary boy that was;what astonishing
letters;what extraordinary parents! I wondered
if I should ever receive a letter from `foreign parts?'
I wondered if I should ever write one:but this was
too muchtoo absurd! As if I, Paul, wearing a
blue jacket with gilt buttons, and number four boots,
should ever visit those countries spoken of in
the geographies, and by learned travellers! No, no;
this was too extravagant: but I knew what I would
do, if I lived to come of age;and I vowed that I
would,I would go to New York!
Number seven was the hospital, and forbidden
ground; we had all of us a sort of horror of number
seven. A boy died there once, and oh, how he
moaned; and what a time there was when the father
came!
A scholar by the name of Tom Belton, who wore
linsey gray, made a dam across a little brook by the
school, and whittled out a saw-mill, that actually
sawed: he had genius. I expected to see him
before now at the head of American mechanics; but
I learn with pain, that he is keeping a grocery store.
At the close of all the terms we had exhibitions,
to which all the towns people came, and among them
the black-eyed Jane, and the pretty Sophia with fur
around her hat. My great triumph was when I had
the part of one of Pizarro's chieftains, the evening
8*
before I left the school. How I did look! I had a
moustache put on with burnt cork, and whiskers very
bushy indeed; and I had the militia coat of an
ensign in the town company, with the skirts pinned
up, and a short sword very dull, and crooked, which
belonged to an old gentleman who was said to have
got it from some privateer, who was said to have taken
it from some great British Admiral, in the old
wars:and the way I carried that sword upon the
platform, and the way I jerked it out, when it came
to my turn to say,`battle! battle!then death to
the armed, and chains for the defenceless!'was
tremendous!
The morning after, in our dramatic hatsblack
felt, with turkey feathers,we took our place upon
the top of the coach, to leave the school. The
head-master
,
in green spectacles, came out to shake hands
with us,a very awful shaking of hands. Poor
gentleman!he is in his grave now.
We gave three loud hurrahs `for the old school,'
as the coach started; and upon the top of the hill
that overlooks the village, we gave another round
and still another for the crabbed old fellow, whose
apples we had so often stolen.I wonder if old
Bulkeley is living yet?
As we got on under the pine trees, I recalled the
image of the black-eyed Jane, and of the other little
girl in the corner pew,and thought how I would
come back after the college days were over,a man,
with a beaver hat, and a cane, and with a splendid
barouche, and how I would take the best chamber at
the inn, and astonish the old school-master by giving
him a familiar tap on the shoulder; and how I would
be the admiration, and the wonder of the pretty girl,
in the fur-trimmed hat! Alas, how our thoughts
outrun our deeds!
For longlong years, I saw no more of my old
school: and when at length the new view came, great
changescrashing like tornadoes,had swept over
my path! I thought no more of startling the
villagers, or astonishing the black-eyed girl. No, no!
I was content to slip quietly through the little town,
with only a tear or two, as I recalled the dead ones,
and mused upon the emptiness of life!
The Sea.
As I look back, boyhood with its griefs and cares
vanishes into the proud stateliness of youth. The
ambition, and the rivalries of the college life,its
first boastful importance as knowledge begins to dawn
on the wakened mind, and the ripe, and enviable
complacency of its senior dignity,all scud over my
memory, like this morning breeze along the meadows;
and like that too, bear upon their wing, a chillness
as of distant ice-banks.
Ben has grown almost to manhood: Lilly is living
in a distant home; and Isabel is just blooming into
that sweet age, where womanly dignity waits her
beauty;an age that sorely puzzles one who has
grown up beside her,making him slow of tongue,
but very quick of heart!
As for the restlet us pass on.
The sea is around me. The last headlands have
gone down, under the horizon, like the city steeples,
as you lose yourself in the calm of the country, or
like the great thoughts of genius, as you slip from
the pages of poets, into your own quiet reverie.
The waters skirt me right and left: there is
nothing
but water before, and only water behind.
Above me are sailing clouds, or the blue vault, which
we call, with childish licenseheaven. The sails,
white and full, like helping friends are pushing me
on; and night and day are distent with the winds
which come and gonone know whence, and none
know whither. A land bird flutters aloft, weary
with long flying; and lost in a world where are no
forests but the careening masts, and no foliage but
the drifts of spray. It cleaves awhile to the smooth
spars, till urged by some homeward yearning, it bears
off in the face of the wind, and sinks, and rises over
the angry waters, until its strength is gone, and the
blue waves gather the poor flutterer to their cold, and
glassy bosom.
All the morning I see nothing beyond me but the
waters, or a tossing company of dolphins; all the
noon, unless some white saillike a ghost, stalks the
horizon, there is still nothing but the rolling seas; all
the evening, after the sun has grown big and sunk
under the water line, and the moon risen, white and
cold, to glimmer across the tops of the surging ocean,
there is nothing but the sea, and the sky, to lead
off thought, or to crush it with their greatness.
Hour after hour, as I sit in the moonlight upon the
taffrail, the great waves gather far back, and break,
and gather nearer, and break louder,and gather
again, and roll down swift and terrible under the
creaking ship, and heave it up lightly upon their
swelling surge, and drop it gently to their seething,
and yeasty cradle,like an infant in the swaying arms
of a mother,or like a shadowy memory, upon the
billows of manly thought.
Conscience wakes in the silent nights of ocean;
life lies open like a book, and spreads out as level as
the sea. Regrets and broken resolutions chase over
the soul like swift-winged night-birds, and all the
unsteady
heights and the wastes of action, lift up
distinct
,
and clear, from the uneasy, but limpid depths
of memory.
Yet within this floating world I am upon,
sympathies
are narrowed down; they cannot range, as
upon the land, over a thousand objects. You are
strangely attracted toward some frail girl, whose
pallor
has now given place to the rich bloom of the sea
life. You listen eagerly to the chance snatches of a
song from below, in the long morning watch. You
love to see her small feet tottering on the unsteady
deck; and you love greatly to aid her steps, and feel
her weight upon your arm, as the ship lurches to a
heavy sea.
Hopes and fears knit together pleasantly upon the
ocean. Each day seems to revive them; your
morning
salutation, is like a welcome after absence, upon
the shore; and each `good night' has the depth and
fullness of a land `farewell.' And beauty grows
upon the ocean; you cannot certainly say that the
face of the fair girl-voyager is prettier than that of
Isabel;oh, no!but you are certain that you cast
innocent, and honest glances upon her, as you steady
her walk upon the deck, far oftener than at the first;
and ocean life, and sympathy, makes her kind; she
does not resent your rudeness, one half so stoutly, as
she might upon the shore.
She will even linger of an eveningpleading first
with the mother, and standing beside you,her
white hand not very far from yours upon the rail,
look down where the black ship flings off with each
plunge, whole garlands of emeralds; or she will look
up (thinking perhaps you are looking the same way)
into the skies, in search of some starswhich were
her neighbors at home. And bits of old tales will
come up, as if they rode upon the ocean quietude;
and fragments of half forgotten poems, tremulously
uttered,either by reason of the rolling of the ship,
or some accidental touch of that white hand.
But ocean has its storms, when fear will make
strange, and holy companionship; and even here, my
memory shifts swiftly and suddenly.
It is a dreadful night. The passengers are
clustered, trembling, below. Every plank shakes;
and the oak ribs groan, as if they suffered with their
toil. The hands are all aloft; the captain is forward
shouting to the mate in the cross-trees, and I am
clinging to one of the stanchions, by the binnacle.
The ship is pitching madly, and the waves are
toppling
up, sometimes as high as the yard-arm, and
then dipping away with a whirl under our keel, that
makes every timber in the vessel quiver. The
thunder
is roaring like a thousand cannons; and at the
moment, the sky is cleft with a stream of fire, that
glares over the tops of the waves, and glistens on the
wet decks, and the spars,lighting up all so plain,
that I can see the men's faces in the main-top, and
catch glimpses of the reefers on the yard-arm,
clinging
like death;then all is horrible darkness.
The spray spits angrily against the canvass; the
waves crash against the weather-bow like mountains;
the wind howls through the rigging, or, as a gasket
gives way, the sail bellying to leeward, splits like the
crack of a musket. I hear the captain in the lulls,
screaming out orders; and the mate in the rigging,
screaming them over, until the lightning comes, and
the thunder, deadening their voices, as if they were
chirping sparrows.
In one of the flashes, I see a hand upon the
yard-arm
lose his foothold, as the ship gives a plunge;
but his arms are clenched around the spar. Before
I can see any more, the blackness comes, and the
thunder, with a crash that half deafens me. I think
I hear a low cry, as the mutterings die away in
the distance; and at the next flash of lightning,
which comes in an instant, I see upon the top of one
of the waves alongside, the poor reefer who has
fallen. The lightning glares upon his face.
But he has caught at a loose bit of running
rigging
,
as he fell; and I see it slipping off the coil
upon the deck. I shout madlyman overboard!
and catch the rope, when I can see nothing again.
The sea is too high, and the man too heavy for me.
I shout, and shout, and shout, and feel the
perspiration
starting in great beads from my forehead, as the
line slips through my fingers.
Presently the captain feels his way aft, and takes
hold with me; and the cook comes, as the coil is
nearly spent, and we pull together upon him. It is
desperate work for the sailor; for the ship is drifting
at a prodigious rate; but he clings like a dying man.
By and by at a flash, we see him on a crest, two
oars length away from the vessel.
Hold on, my man! shouts the captain.
For God's sake, be quick! says the poor fellow;
and he goes down in a trough of the sea. We pull
the harder, and the captain keeps calling to him to
keep up courage, and hold strong. But in the hush,
we can hear him sayI can't hold out much
longer;I'm most gone!
Presently we have brought the man where we can
lay hold of him, and are only waiting for a good lift
of the sea to bring him up, when the poor fellow
groans out,It's no useI can'tgood bye!
And a wave tosses the end of the rope, clean upon
the bulwarks.
At the next flash, I see him going down under the
water.
I grope my way below, sick and faint at heart;
and wedging myself into my narrow birth, I try to
sleep. But the thunder and the tossing of the ship,
and the face of the drowning man, as he said good bye,
peering at me from every corner, will not let me sleep.
Afterward, come quiet seas, over which we boom
along, leaving in our track, at night, a broad path of
phosphorescent splendor. The sailors bustle around
the decks, as if they had lost no comrade; and the
voyagers losing the pallor of fear, look out earnestly
for the land.
At length, my eyes rest upon the coveted fields of
Britain; and in a day more, the bright face, looking
out beside me, sparkles at sight of the sweet cottages,
which lie along the green Essex shores. Broad sailed
yachts, looking strangely, yet beautifully, glide upon
the waters of the Thames, like swans; black,
square-rigged
colliers from the Tyne, lie grouped in sooty
cohorts; and heavy, three-decked Indiamen,of
which I had read in story books,drift slowly down
with the tide. Dingy steamers, with white pipes,
and with red pipes, whiz past us to the sea; and
now, my eye rests on the great palace of Greenwich;
I see the wooden-legged pensioners smoking under
the palace walls; and above them upon the hillas
Heaven is truethat old, fabulous Greenwich, the
great centre of school-boy Longitude.
Presently, from under a cloud of murky smoke
heaves up the vast dome of St. Paul's, and the tall
Column of the Fire, and the white turrets of London
Tower. Our ship glides through the massive dock
gates, and is moored, amid that forest of masts, which
bears golden fruit for Britons.
That night, I sleep far away from `the old school,'
and far away from the valley of Hillfarm; long, and
late, I toss upon my bed, with swift visions in my
mind, of London Bridge, and Temple Bar, and Jane
Shore, and Falstaff, and Prince Hal, and King
Jamie. And when at length I fall asleep, my
dreams are very pleasant, but they carry me across
the ocean, away from the ship,away from London,
away even from the fair voyager,to the old oaks,
and to the brooks, andto thy sidesweet Isabel!
The Father-Land.
There
is a great contrast between the easy
deshabille of the ocean life, and the prim attire,
and conventional spirit of the land. In the first,
there are but few to please, and these few are known,
and they know us; upon the shore, there is a world
to humour, and a world of strangers. In a brilliant
drawing-room looking out upon the site of old
Charing-Cross
,
and upon the one-armed Nelson, standing
aloft at his coil of rope, I take leave of the fair
voyager of the sea. Her white neglig has given
place to silks; and the simple careless coiffe of the
ocean, is replaced by the rich dressing of a modiste.
Yet her face has the same bloom upon it; and her
eye sparkles, as it seems to me, with a higher pride;
and her little hand has I think a tremulous quiver
in it, (I am sure my own has)as I bid her adieu,
and take up the trail of my wanderings into the heart
of England.
Abuse her, as we will,pity her starving
peasantry
,
as we may,smile at her court pageantry, as
much as we like,old England, is dear old England
still! Her cottage homes, her green fields, her
castles, her blazing firesides, her church spires are as
old as song; and by song and story, we inherit them
in our hearts. This jeyous boast, was, I remember,
upon my lip, as I first trode upon the rich meadow
of Runnymede; and recalled that
Great Charter
wrested from the king, which made the first stepping
stone toward the bounties of our western freedom.
It is a strange feeling that comes over the Western
Saxon, as he strolls first along the green bye-lanes of
England, and scents the hawthorn in its April bloom,
and lingers at some quaint stile, to watch the rooks
wheeling and cawing around some lofty elm tops, and
traces the carved gables of some old country mansion
that lies in their shadow, and hums some fragment of
charming English poesy, that seems made for the
scene! This is not sight-seeing, nor travel; it is
dreaming sweet dreams, that are fed with the old life
of Books.
I wander on, fearing to break the dream, by a
swift step; and winding and rising between the
blooming hedgerows, I come presently to the sight
of some sweet valley below me, where a thatched
hamlet lies sleeping in the April sun, as quietly as the
dead lie in history;no sound reaches me save the
occasional clinck of the smith's hammer, or the
hedgeman's bill-hook, or the ploughman's `ho-tup!'
from the hills. At evening, listening to the
nightingale
,
I stroll wearily into some close-nestled village,
that I had seen long ago from a rolling height.
It is far away from the great lines of travel;and
the children stop their play to have a look at me, and
rosy-faced girls peep from behind half-opened doors.
Standing apart, and with a bench on either side of
the entrance, is the inn of the Eagle and the Falcon,
which guardian birds, some native Dick Tinto has
pictured upon the swinging sign-board at the corner.
The hostess is half ready to embrace me, and treats
me like a prince in disguise. She shows me through
the tap-room into a little parlor, with white curtains,
and with neatly framed prints of the old patriarchs.
Here, alone, beside a brisk fire, kindled with furze, I
watch the white flame leaping playfully through the
black lumps of coal, and enjoy the best fare of the
Eagle and the Falcon. If too late, or too early for
her garden stock, the hostess bethinks herself of some
small pot of jelly in an out-of-the-way cupboard of the
house, and setting it temptingly in her prettiest dish,
she coyly slips it upon the white cloth, with a modest
regret that it is no better; and a little evident
satisfaction
that
it is so good.
I muse for an hour before the glowing fire, as
quiet as the cat that has come in, to bear me
company
;
and at bed-time, I find sheets, as fresh as the
air of the mountains.
At another time, and many months later, I am
walking under a wood of Scottish firs. It is near
night-fall, and the fir tops are swaying, and sighing
hoarsely, in the cool wind of the Northern Highlands.
There is none of the smiling landscape of England
about me; and the crags of Edinburgh and Castle
Stirling, and sweet Perth, in its silver valley, are far
to the southward. The larchs of Athol and Bruar
Water, and that highland gemDunkeld, are passed.
I am tired with a morning's tramp over Culloden
Moor; and from the edge of the wood, there stretches
before me in the cool gray twilight, broad fields of
heather. In the middle, there rise against the
night-sky, the turrets of a castle; it is Castle Cawdor,
where King Duncan was murdered by Macbeth.
The sight of it lends a spur to my weary step; and
emerging from the wood, I bound over the springy
heather. In an hour, I clamber a broken wall, and
come under the frowning shadows of the castle. The
ivy clambers up here, and there, and shakes its
uncropped branches, and its dried berries over the
heavy portal. I cross the moat, and my step makes
the chains of the draw-bridge rattle. All is kept in
the old state; only in lieu of the warder's horn, I
pull at the warder's bell. The echoes ring, and
die in the stone courts; but there is no one astir, nor
is there a light at any of the castle windows. I ring
again, and the echoes come, and blend with the rising
night wind that sighs around the turrets, as they
sighed that night of murder. I fancyit must be a
fancy,that I hear an owl scream; I am sure that I
hear the crickets cry.
I sit down upon the green bank of the moat; a
little dark water lies in the bottom. The walls rise
from it gray, and stern in the deepening shadows.
I hum chance passages of Macbeth, listening for the
echoesechoes from the wall; and echoes from that
far away time, when I stole the first reading of the
tragic story.
Dids't thou not hear a noise?
I heard the owl scream, and the crickets cry.
Did not you speak?
When?
Now.
As I descended?
Ay.
Hark!
And the sharp echo comes back`hark!' And
at dead of night, in the thatched cottage under the
castle walls, where a dark faced, Gaelic woman, in plaid
turban, is my hostess, I wake, startled by the wind,
and my trembling lips say involuntarily`hark!'
Again, three months later, I am in the sweet
county of Devon. Its valleys are like emerald; its
threads of water stretched over the fields, by their
provident husbandry, glisten in the broad glow of
summer, like skeins of silk. A bland old farmer, of
the true British stamp, is my host. On market days
he rides over to the old town of Totness in a trim,
black farmer's cart; and he wears glossy topped
boots, and a broad-brimmed white hat. I take a vast
deal of pleasure in listening to his honest,
straight-forward
talk about the improvements of the day and
the state of the nation. I sometimes get upon one of
his nags, and ride off with him over his fields, or
visit the homes of the laborers, which show their gray
roofs, in every charming nook of the landscape. At
the parish church, I doze against the high pew backs,
as I listen to the see-saw tones of the drawling curate;
and in my half wakeful moments, the withered holly
sprigs (not removed since Easter) grow upon my
vision, into Christmas boughs, and preach sermons to
meof the days of old.
Sometimes, I wander far over the hills into a
neighboring park; and spend hours on hours, under
the sturdy oaks, watching the sleek fallow deer,
gazing at me with their soft, liquid eyes. The
squirrels, too, play above me, with their daring leaps,
utterly careless of my presence, and the pheasants
whir away from my very feet.
On one of these random strollsI remember it
very wellwhen I was idling along, thinking of the
broad reach of water that lay between me, and that
old forest home,and beating off the daisy heads
with my cane,I heard the tramp of horses, coming
up one of the forest avenues. The sound was
unusual, for the family, I had been told, was still in
town, and no right of way lay through the park.
There they were, however:I was sure it must be
the family, from the careless way in which they came
sauntering up.
First, there was a noble hound that came bounding
toward me,gazed a moment, and turned to watch
9
the approach of the little cavalcade. Next was an
elderly gentleman mounted upon a spirited hunter,
attended by a boy of some dozen years, who managed
his pony with a grace, that is a part of the English
boy's education. Then followed two older lads,
and a travelling phton, in which sat a couple
of elderly ladies. But what most drew my attention
was a girlish figure, that rode beyond the carriage,
upon a sleek-limbed gray. There was something
in the easy grace of her attitude, and the rich
glow that lit up her faceheightened as it was,
by the little black velvet riding cap, relieved with a
single flowing plume,that kept my eye. It was
strange, but I thought that I had seen such a figure
before, and such a face, and such an eye; and as I
made the ordinary salutation of a stranger, and
caught her smile, I could have sworn that it was she
my fair companion of the ocean. The truth flashed
upon me in a moment. She was to visit, she had told
me, a friend in the south of England;and this was
the friend's home;and one of the ladies of the
carriage was her mother; and one of the lads, the
school-boy brother, who had teased her on the sea.
I recal now perfectly, her frank manner, as she
ungloved her hand to bid me welcome. I strolled
beside them to the steps. Old Devon had suddenly
renewed its beauties for me. I had much to tell her,
of the little out-lying nooks, which my wayward feet
had led me to: and sheas much to ask. My stay
with the bland old farmer lengthened; and two days
hospitalities at the Park ran over into three, and four.
There was hard galloping down those avenues; and
new strolls, not at all lonely, under the sturdy oaks.
The long summer twilight of England used to find a
very happy fellow lingering on the garden terrace,
looking, now at the rookery, where the belated birds
quarreled for a resting place, and now down the long
forest vista, gray with distance, and closed with the
white spire of Modbury church.
English country life gains fast upon onevery
fast; and it is not so easy, as in the drawing-room of
Charing Cross, to sayadieu! But it is saidvery
sadly said; for God only knows how long it is to last.
And as I rode slowly down toward the lodge after my
leave-taking, I turned back again, and again, and
again. I thought I saw her standing still upon the
terrace, though it was almost dark; and I thought
it could hardly have been an illusionthat I saw
something white waving from her hand.
Her nameas if I could forget itwas Caroline;
her mother called herCarry. I wondered how it
would seem for me to call herCarry! I tried it;
it sounded well. I tried itover and over,until I
came too near the lodge. There I threw a half
crown to the woman who opened the gate for me.
She curtsied low, and saidGod bless you, sir!
I liked her for it; I would have given a guinea for
it: and that night,whether it was the old woman's
benediction, or the waving scarf upon the terrace, I
do not know;but there was a charm upon my
thought, and my hope, as if an angel had been near
me.
It passed away though in my dreams;for I
dreamed that I saw the sweet face of Bella in an
English park, and that she wore a black velvet riding
cap, with a plume; and I came up to her and
murmured, very sweetly, I thought,Carry, dear
Carry! and she started, looked sadly at me, and
turned away. I ran after her, to kiss her as I did
when she sat upon my mother's lap, on the day when
she came near drowning: I longed to tell her, as I
did thenI
do
love you. But she turned her tearful
face upon me, I dreamed; and then,I saw no more.
A Roman Girl.
I remember
the very words
non parlo
Francesce
,
Signore
,I do not speak French, Signor
said the stout lady,but my daughter, perhaps, will
understand you.
And she called
Enrica!Enrica! venite,
subito! c' un forestiere
.
And the daughter came, her light brown hair
falling
carelessly over her shoulders, her rich hazel eye
twinkling and full of life, the colour coming and going
upon her transparent cheek, and her bosom heaving
with her quick step. With one hand she put back
the scattered locks that had fallen over her
forehead
,
while she laid the other gently, upon the arm
of her mother, and asked in that sweet music of the
south
cosa volete, mamma?
It was the prettiest picture I had seen in many a
day; and this, notwithstanding I was in Rome, and had
come that very morning from the Palace of Borghese.
The stout lady was my hostess, and Enricaso fair,
so young, so unlike in her beauty, to other Italian
beauties, was my landlady's daughter. The house
was one of those tall housesvery, very old, which
stand along the eastern side of the Corso, looking out
upon the Piazzo di Colonna. The staircases were
very tall, and dirty, and they were narrow and dark.
Four flights of stone steps led up to the corridor
where they lived. A little trap was in the door; and
there was a bell-rope, at the least touch of which, I
was almost sure to hear tripping feet run along the
stone floor within, and then to see the trap thrown
slyly back, and those deep hazle eyes looking out
upon me; and then the door would open, and along
the corridor, under the daughter's guidance, (until I
had learned the way,) I passed to my Roman home.
I was a long time learning the way.
My chamber looked out upon the Corso, and I could
catch from it a glimpse of the top of the tall column
of Antoninus, and of a fragment of the palace of the
Governor. My parlor, which was separated from the
apartments of the family by a narrow corridor, looked
upon a small court, hung around with balconies.
From the upper one, a couple of black-eyed girls are
occasionally looking out, and they can almost read
the title of my book, when I sit by the window.
Below
are three or four blooming
ragazze
, who are
dark-eyed, and have Roman luxuriance of hair. The
youngest is a friend of our Enrica, and is of course
frequently looking up, with all the innocence in the
world, to see if Enrica may be looking out.
Night after night, a bright blaze glows upon my
hearth, of the alder faggots which they bring from the
Albanian hills. Night after night too, the family
come in, to aid my blundering speech, and to enjoy
the rich sparkling of my faggot fire. Little Cesare, a
dark-faced Italian boy, takes up his position with
pencil
and slate, and draws by the light of the blaze
genii and castles. The old one-eyed teacher of
Enrica, lays his snuff box upon the table, and his
handkerchief across his lap, and with his spectacles
upon his nose, and his big fingers on the lesson, runs
through the French tenses of the verb
amare
. The
father a sallow-faced, keen-eyed man, with true
Italian visage, sits with his arms upon the elbows of
his chair, and talks of the Pope, or of the weather.
A spruce count from the Marches of Ancona, wears
a heavy watch seal, and reads Dante with
furore
.
The mother, with arms akimbo, looks proudly upon
her daughter, and counts her, as well she may, a gem
among the Roman beauties.
The table was round, with the fire blazing on one
side; there was scarce room for but three upon the
other. Signor
il maestro
was onethen Enrica, and
nexthow well I remember itcame myself. For I
could sometimes help Enrica to a word of French;
and far oftener, she could help me to a word of
Italian. Her face was rich, and full of feeling; I
used greatly to love to watch the puzzled expressions
that passed over her forehead, as the sense of some
hard phrase escaped her;and better still, to see the
happy smile, as she caught at a glance, the thought
of some old scholastic Frenchman, and transferred it
into the liquid melody of her speech.
She had seen just sixteen summers, and only that
very autumn was escaped from the thraldom of a
convent, upon the skirts of Rome. She knew nothing
of life, but the life of feeling; and all thoughts of
happiness, lay as yet in her childish hopes. It was
pleasant to look upon her face; and it was still more
pleasant to listen to that sweet Roman voice. What a
rich flow of superlatives, and endearing diminutives,
from those vermillion lips! Who would not have
loved the study, and who would not have loved
without meaning itthe teacher?
In those days, I did not linger long at the tables
of lame Pietro in the Via Condotti; but would hurry
back to my little Roman parlorthe fire was so
pleasant! And it was so pleasant to greet Enrica
with her mother, even before the one-eyed
maestro
had come in; and it was pleasant to unfold the book
between us, and to lay my hand upon the pagea
small pagewhere hers lay already. And when she
pointed wrong, it was pleasant to correct herover
and over;insisting, that her hand should be here,
and not there, and lifting those little fingers from one
page, and putting them down upon the other. And
sometimes, half provoked with my fault-finding, she
would pat my hand smartly with hers;but when I
looked in her face to know what
that
could mean, she
would meet my eye with such a kind submission, and
half earnest regret, as made me not only pardon the
offence,but tempt me to provoke it again.
Through all the days of Carnival, when I rode
pelted with
confetti
, and pelting back, my eyes used to
wander up, from a long way off, to that tall house
upon the Corso, where I was sure to meet, again and
again, those forgiving eyes, and that soft brown hair,
all gathered under the little brown sombrero, set off
with one pure white plume. And her hand full of
bon-bons, she would shake at me threateningly; and
laugha musical laughas I bowed my head to the
assault, and recovering from the shower of missiles,
would turn to throw my stoutest bouquet at her
balcony
.
At night, I would bear home to the Roman
parlor, my best trophy of the day, as a guerdon for
Enrica; and Enrica would be sure to render in
acknowledgment, some carefully hidden flowers, the
prettiest that her beauty had won.
Sometimes upon those Carnival nights, she arrays
herself in the costume of the Albanian water-carriers;
and nothing, one would think could be prettier, than
the laced crimson jacket, and the strange head gear
with its trinkets, and the short skirts leaving to view
as delicate an ankle as could be found in Rome.
Upon another night, she glides into my little parlor,
as we sit by the blaze, in a close velvet boddice, and
with a Swiss hat caught up by a looplet of silver, and
adorned with a full blown rosenothing you think
could be prettier than this. Again, in one of her
girlish freaks, she robes herself like a nun; and with
9*
the heavy black surge, for dress, and the funereal
veil,relieved only by the plain white ruffle of her
capyou wish she were always a nun. But the wish
vanishes, when you see her in a pure white muslin,
with a wreath of orange blossoms about her forehead,
and a single white rose-bud in her bosom.
Upon the little balcony Enrica keeps a pot or two
of flowers, which bloom all winter long: and each
morning, I find upon my table a fresh rose bud; each
night, I bear back for thank-offering, the prettiest
bouquet that can be found in the Via Condotti. The
quiet fire-side evenings come back;in which my
hand seeks its wonted place upon her book; and my
other,
will
creep around upon the back of Enrica's
chair, and Enrica
will
look indignant,and then all
forgiveness.
One day I received a large pacquet of letters:
ah, what luxury to lie back in my big arm-chair,
there before the crackling faggots, with the pleasant
rustle of that silken dress beside me, and run
over a second, and a third time, those mute paper
missives, which bore to me over so many miles of
water, the words of greeting, and of love! It would
be worth travelling to the shores of the gean, to
find one's heart quickened into such life as the ocean
letters will make. Enrica threw down her book,
and wondered what could be in them?and snatched
one from my hand, and looked with sad, but vain
intensity over that strange scrawl.What can it
be?said she; and she lay her finger upon the little
half lineDear Paul.
I told her it was
Caro mio
.
Enrica lay it upon her lap, and looked in my face;
It is from your mother? said she.
No, said I.
From your sister?said she.
Alas, no!
Il vostro fratello, dunque?
Nemmeno
said Inot from a brother either.
She handed me the letter, and took up her book;
and presently she laid the book down again; and
looked at the letter, and then at me;and went out.
She did not come in again that evening; in the
morning, there was no rose-bud on my table. And
when I came at night,with a bouquet from Pietro's
at the corner, she asked mewho had written my
letter?
A very dear friend, said I.
A lady? continued she.
A lady, said I.
Keep this bouquet for her, said she, and put it
in my hands.
But, Enrica, she has plenty of flowers: she
lives among them, and each morning her children
gather them by scores to make garlands of.
Enrica put her fingers within my hand to take
again the bouquet; and for a moment I held both
fingers and flowers.
The flowers slipped out first.
I had a friend at Rome in that time, who afterward
died between Ancona and Corinth: we were sitting
one day upon a block of tufa in the middle of the
Coliseum, looking up at the shadows which the
waving shrubs upon the southern wall, cast upon the
ruined arcades within, and listening to the chirping
sparrows that lived upon the wreck,when he said to
me suddenlyPaul, you love the Italian girl.
She is very beautiful, said I.
I think she is beginning to love you, said he,
soberly.
She has a very warm heart, I believe, said I.
Aye, said he.
But her feelings are those of a girl, continued I.
They are not, said my friend; and he laid his
hand upon my knee, and left off drawing diagrams
with his cane,I have seen, Paul, more than you
of this southern nature. The Italian girl of fifteen
is a woman;an impassioned, sensitive, tender
creatureyet still a woman: you are lovingif you
lovea full-grown heart; she is lovingif she
lovesas a ripe heart should.
But I do not think that either is wholly true,
said I.
Try it, said he, setting his cane down firmly,
and looking in my face.
How? returned I.
I have three weeks upon my hands, continued
he. Go with me into the Appenines; leave your
home in the Corso, and see if you can forget in the
air of the mountains, your blue-eyed Roman girl!
I was pondering for an answer, when he went on:
It is better so: love as you might, that southern
nature with all its passion, is not the material to
build domestic happiness upon; nor is your northern
habitwhatever you may think at your time of life,
the one to cherish always those passionate sympathies
which are bred by this atmosphere, and their seenes.
One moment my thought ran to my little parlor,
and to that fairy figure, and to that sweet, angel
face: and then, like lightning it traversed oceans, and
fed upon the old ideal of home, and brought images
to my eye of lostdead ones, who seemed to be
stirring on heavenly wings, in that soft Roman
atmosphere, with greeting, and with beckoning.
I will go with you, said I.
The father shrugged his shoulders, when I told
him I was going to the mountains, and wanted a
guide. His wife said it would be cold upon the hills,
for the winter was not ended. Enrica said it would
be warm in the valleys, for the spring was coming.
The old man drummed with his fingers on the table,
and shrugged his shoulders again, but said nothing.
My landlady said I could not ride. Cesare said it
would be hard walking. Enrica asked papa, if there
would be any danger? And again the old man
shrugged his shoulders. Again I asked him, if he
knew a man who would serve us as guide among the
Appenines; and finding me determined, he shrugged
his shoulders, and said he would find one the next
day.
As I passed out at evening; on my way to the
Piazzo near the Monte Citorio, where stand the
carriages that go out to Tivoli, Enrica glided up to
me, and whispered
ah, mi dispiace tantotanto,
Signor!
The Appenines.
I shook
her hand, and in an hour afterward was
passing with my friend, by the Trajan forum, toward
the deep shadow of San Maggiore, which lay in our
way to the mountains. At sunset, we were wandering
over the ruin of Adrian's villa, which lies upon the
first step of the Appenines. Behind us, the vesper
bells of Tivoli were sounding, and their echoes
floating sweetly under the broken arches; before us,
stretching all the way to the horizon, lay the broad
Campagna; while in the middle of its great waves,
turned violet-coloured, by the hues of twilight, rose
the grouped towers of the Eternal City; and lording
it among them all, like a giant, stood the black dome
of St. Peter's.
Day after day we stretched on over the mountains,
leaving the Campagna far behind us. Rocks and
stones, huge and ragged, lie strewed over the surface
right and left, deep yawning valleys lie in the
shadows of mountains, that loom up thousands of
feet, bearing perhaps upon their tops old castellated
towns, perched like birds' nests. But mountain and
valley are blasted and scarred; the forests even, are
not continuous, but struggle for a livelihood; as if
the brimstone fire that consumed Nineveh, had
withered
their energies. Sometimes, our eyes rest on a
great white scar of the broken calcareous rock, on
which the moss cannot grow, and the lizards dare not
creep. Then we see a cliff beetling far aloft, with
the shining walls of some monastery of holy men
glistening
at its base. The wayside brooks do not seem
to be the gentle offspring of bountiful hills, but the
remnants of something greater, whose greatness has
expired;they are turbid rills, rolling in the bottom
of yawning chasms. Even the shrubs have a look, as
if the Volscian war-horse had trampled them down to
death; and the primroses and the violets by the
mountain path, alone look modestly beautiful amid
the ruin.
Sometimes, we loiter in a valley, above which the
goats are browsing on the cliffs, and listen to the sweet
pastoral pipes of the Appenines. We see the
shepherds
in their rough skin coats, high over our heads.
Their herds are feeding, as it seems, on ledges of a
hand's breadth. The sweet sound floats and lingers
in the soft atmosphere, without a breath of wind to
bear it away, or a noise to disturb its melody. The
shadows slant more and more as we linger; and the
kids begin to group together. And as we wander on,
through the stunted vineyards in the bottom of the
valley, the sweet sound flows after us, like a river of
song,nor leaves us, till the kids have vanished in
the distance, and the cliffs themselves, become one
dark wall of shadow.
At night, in some little meagre mountain town, we
stroll about in the narrow pass-ways, or wander under
the heavy arches of the mountain churches.
Shuffling
old women grope in and out; dim lamps
glimmer
faintly at the side altars, shedding horrid light
upon painted images of the dying Christ. Or
perhaps
,
to make the old pile more solemn, there stands
some bier in the middle, with a figure or two kneeling
at the foot, and ragged boys move stealthily under
the shadows of the columns. Presently comes a
young priest, in black robes, and lights a taper at the
foot, and another at the headfor there is a dead
man on the bier; and the parched, thin features look
awfully under the yellow light of the tapers, in the
gloom of the great building. It is very, very damp
in the church, and the body of the dead man seems
to make the air heavy, so we go out into the starlight
again.
In the morning, the western slopes wear broad
shadows, and the frosts crumple, on the herbage, to
our tread: across the valley, it is like summer; and
the birdsfor there are songsters in the Appenines,
make summer music. Their notes blend softly
with the faint sounds of some far off convent bell,
tolling for morning mass, and strike the frosted
and shaded mountain side, with a sweet echo. As
we toil on, and the shaded hills begin to glow in the
sunshine, we pass a train of mules, loaded with wine.
We have seen them an hour beforelittle black dots
twining along the white streak of foot-way upon the
mountain above us. We lost them as we began to
ascend, until a wild snatch of an Appenine song
turned our eyes up, and there, straggling through the
brush, they appeared again; a foot slip would have
brought the mules and wine casks rolling upon us.
We keep still, holding by the brushwood, to let them
pass. An hour more, and we see them toiling slowly,
mule and muleteer,big dots, and little dots,far
down where we have been before. The sun is hot
and smoking on them in the bare valleys; the sun is
hot and smoking on the hill-side, where we are toiling
over the broken stones. I thought of little Enrica,
when she saidthe spring was coming!
Time and again, we sit down togethermy friend
and Iupon some fragment of rock, under the
broad-armed chestnuts, that fringe the lower skirts of
the mountains, and talk through the hottest of the
noon, of the warriors of Seylla, and of the Sabine
women,but oftenerof the pretty peasantry, and
of the sweet-faced Roman girl. He too tells me of
his life and loves, and of the hopes that lie misty
and grand before him:little did we think that in so
few years, his hopes would be gone, and his body
lying low in the Adriatic, or tost with the drift upon
the Dalmatian shores! Little did I think, that here
under the ancestral wood,still a wishful and
blundering
mortal, I should be gathering up the shreds,
that memory can catch of our Appenine wandering,
and be weaving them into my bachelor dreams.
Away again upon the quick wing of thought, I
follow our steps, as after weeks of wandering, we gained
once more a height that overlooked the Campagna
and saw the sun setting on its edge, throwing into
relief the dome of St. Peter's, and blazing in a red
stripe upon the waters of the Tiber.
Below us was Palestrinathe Prneste of the poets
and philosophers;the dwelling place ofI know
not how manyEmperors. We went straggling
through the dirty streets, searching for some
tidy-looking
osteria. At length, we found an old lady,
who could give us a bed, but no dinner. My friend
dropped in a chair disheartened. A snub-looking
priest came out to condole with us.
And could Palestrina,the
frigidum Prneste
of
Horace, which had entertained over and over, the
noblest of the Colonna, and the most noble Adrian
could Palestrina not furnish a dinner to a tired
traveller?
Si, Signore
, said the snub-looking priest.
Si, Signorino
, said the neat old lady; and
away we went upon a new search. And we found
bright and happy faces;especially the little girl of
twelve years, who came close by me as I ate, and
afterward strung a garland of marigolds, and put it
on my head. Then there was a bright-eyed boy of
fourteen, who wrote his name, and those of the whole
family, upon a fly leaf of my book: and a pretty,
saucy-looking girl of sixteen, who peeped a long time
from behind the kitchen door, but before the evening
was gone, she was in the chair beside me, and had
written her nameCarlottaupon the first leaf of
my journal.
When I woke, the sun was up. From my bed I
could see over the town, the thin, lazy mists lying
on the old camp-ground of Pyrrhus; beyond it, were
the mountains, which hide Frascati, and Monte Cavi.
There was old Colonna too, that
Like an eagle's nest, hangs on the crest
Of purple Appenine.
As the mist lifted, and the sun brightened the
plain, I could see the road, along which Sylla came
fuming and maddened after the Mithridaten war. I
could see, as I half dreamed and half slept, the
frightened
peasantry whooping to their long-horned cattle,
as they drove them on tumultuously up through the
gateways of the town; and women with babies in
their arms, and children scowling with fear and hate,
all trooping fast and madly, to escape the hand of
the Avenger;alas! ineffectually, for Sylla
murdered
them, and pulled down the walls of their town
the proud Palestrina!
I had a queer fancy of seeing the nobles of Rome,
led on by Stefano Colonna, grouping along the plain,
their corslets flashing out of the mists,their
pennants
dashing above it,coming up fast, and still as
the wind, to make the Mural Prneste, their
strong-hold
against the Last of the Tribunes. And strangely
mingling fiction with fact, I saw the brother of
Walter
de Montreal, with his noisy and bristling army,
crowd over the Campagna, and put up his white tents,
and hang out his showy banners, on the grassy knolls
that lay nearest my eye.
But the knolls were all quiet; there was not
so much as a strolling
contadino
on them, to whistle
a mimic fife-note. A little boy from the inn went
with me upon the hill, to look out upon the town and
the wide sea of land below; and whether it was the
soft, warm April sun, or the gray ruins below me, or
whether the wonderful silence of the scene, or some
wild gush of memory, I do not know, but something
made me sad.
Perch cosi penseroso?
why so sad? said the
quick-eyed boy. The air is beautiful, the scene is
beautiful; Signore is young, why is he sad?
And is Giovanni never sad? said I.
Quasi mai
, said the boy, and if I could travel
as Signore, and see other countries, I would be
always
gay.
May you be always that! said I.
The good wish touched him; he took me by the
arms, and saidGo home with me, Signore; you
were happy at the inn last night; go back, and we
will make you gay again!
If we could be always boys!
I thanked him in a way that saddened him. We
passed out shortly after from the city gates, and
strode on over the rolling plain. Once or twice we
turned back to look at the rocky heights beneath
which lay the ruined town of Palestrina;a city that
defied Rome,that had a king before a ploughshare
had touched the Capitoline, or the Janiculan hill!
The ivy was covering up richly the Etruscan
foundations
,
and there was a quiet over the whole place.
The smoke was rising straight into the sky from the
chimney tops; a peasant or two, were going along
the road with donkeys; beside this, the city was, to
all appearance, a dead city. And it seemed to me
that an old monk, whom I could see with my glass,
near the little chapel above the town, might be going
to say mass for the soul of the dead city.
And afterward, when we came near to Rome, and
passed under the temple tomb of Metella,my friend
said,And will you go back now to your home?
or will you set off with me to-morrow for Ancona?
At least, I must say adieu, returned I.
God speed you! said he, and we parted upon
the Piazza di Venezia,he for his last mass at St.
Peter's, and I for the tall house upon the Corso.
Enrica.
I hear
her glancing feet, the moment I have tinkled
the bell;and there she is, with her brown hair
gathered into braids, and her eyes full of joy, and
greeting. And as I walk with the mother to the
window to look at some pageant that is passing,she
steals up behind, and passes her arm around me, with
a quick electric motion, and a gentle pressure of
welcomethat tells more than a thousand words.
It is a pageant of death that is passing below. Far
down the street, we see heads thrust out of the
windows
,
and standing in bold relief against the red
torch-light of the moving train. Below, dim figures
are gathering on the narrow side ways to look at the
solemn spectacle. A hoarse chant rises louder, and
louder; and half dies in the night air, and breaks out
again with new, and deep bitterness.
Now, the first torch-light under us shines plainly
on faces in the windows, and on the kneeling women
in the street. First, come old retainers of the dead
one, bearing long blazing flambeaux. Then comes a
company of priests, two by two, bare-headed, and
every second one with a lighted torch, and all are
chanting.
Next, is a brotherhood of friars in brown cloaks,
with sandalled feet;and the red-light streams full
upon their grizzled heads. They add their heavy
guttural voices to the chant, and pass slowly on.
Then comes a company of priests, in white muslin
capes, and black robes, and black caps,bearing
books in their hands, wide open, and lit up plainly
by the torches of churchly servitors, who march
beside
them; and from the books, the priests chant
loud and solemnly. Now, the music is loudest; and
the friars take up the dismal notes from the
white-capped
priests, and the priests before catch them from
the brown-robed friars, and mournfully the sound rises
up between the tall buildings,into the blue
night-sky
,
that lies between Heaven and Rome.
Vedevede!
says Cesare; and in a blaze of
the red-torch fire, comes the bier, borne on the necks
of stout friars; and on the bier, is the body of a dead
man, habited like a priest. Heavy plumes of black
wave at each corner.
Hist!says my landlady.
The body is just under us. Enrica crosses herself;
her smile is for the moment gone. Cesare's boy-face
is grown suddenly earnest. We could see the pale,
youthful features of the dead man. The glaring
flambeaux, sent their flaunting streams of unearthly
light over the wan visage of the sleeper. A thousand
eyes were looking on him; but his face careless of
them all, was turned up, straight toward the stars.
Still the chant rises; and companies of priests
follow
the bier, like those who had gone before. Friars,
in brown cloaks, and prelates, and Carmelites come
afterall with torches. Two by twotheir voices
growing hoarsethey tramp, and chant.
For a while the voices cease, and you can hear the
rustling of their robes, and their foot-falls, as if your
ear was to the earth. Then the chant rises again, as
they glide on in a wavy, shining line, and rolls back
over the death-train, like the howling of a wind in
winter.
As they pass, the faces vanish from the windows.
The kneeling women upon the pavement, rise up,
mindful of the paroxysm of Life once more. The
groups in the door-ways scatter. But their low
voices do not drown the voices of the host of
mourners
,
and their ghost-like music.
I look long upon the blazing bier, trailing under
the deep shadows of the Roman palaces, and at the
stream of torches, winding like a glittering, scaled
serpent.It is a priestsay I to my landlady, as
she closes the window.
No, signor,a young man never married, and so
10
by virtue of his condition, they put on him the
priest-robes
.
So Isays the pretty Enricaif I should
die, would be robed in white, as you saw me on a
carnival night, and be followed by nuns for sisters.
A long way off may it be, Enrica!
She took my hand in hers, and pressed it. An
Italian girl does not fear to talk of death; and we
were talking of it still, as we walked back to my little
parlormy hand all the time in hersand sat down
by the blaze of my fire.
It was holy weeknever had Enrica looked more
sweetly than in that black dress,under that long,
dark veil of the days of Lent. Upon the broad
pavement of St. Peter's,where the people flocking
by thousands, made only side groups about the altars
of the vast templeI have watched her kneeling,
beside her mother,her eyes bent down, her lips
moving earnestly, and her whole figure tremulous with
deep emotion. Wandering around among the
halberdiers
of the Pope, and the court coats of Austria,
and the bare-footed pilgrims with sandal, shell and
staff, I would sidle back again, to look upon that
kneeling figure; and leaning against the huge
columns of the church, would dreameven as I
am dreaming now.
At night-fall, I urge my way into the Sistine
Chapel: Enrica is beside me,looking with me upon
the gaunt figures of the Judgment of Angelo. They
are chanting the Miserere. The twelve candle-sticks
by the altar are put out one by one, as the service
continues. The sun has gone down, and only the red
glow of twilight steals through the dusky windows.
There is a pause, and a brief reading from a
red-cloaked
cardinal, and all kneel down.
She
kneels
beside me: and the sweet, mournful flow of the
Miserere begins again,growing in force, and depth,
till the whole chapel rings, and the balcony of the
choir trembles: then, it subsides again into the low
soft wail of a single voiceso prolongedso
tremulous
,
and so real, that the heart aches, and the tears
startfor Christ is dead!
Lingering yet, the wail dies not wholly, but
just as it seemed expiring, it is caught up by another
and stronger voice that carries it on, plaintive as
ever;nor does it stop with thisfor just as you
looked for silence, three voices more begin the
lamentsweet, touching, mournful voices,and bear
it up to a full cry, when the whole choir catch its
burden, and make the lament change into the wailings
of a multitudewild, shrill, hoarsewith swift chants
intervening, as if agony had given force to anguish.
Then, sweetly, slowly, voice by voice, note by note,
the wailings sink into the low, tender, moan of a
single singerfaltering, tremulous, as if tears checked
the utterance; and swelling out, as if despair
sustained
it.
It was dark in the chapel, when we went out;
voices were low. Enrica said nothingI could
say nothing.
I was to leave Rome after Easter; I did not
love to speak of itnor to think of it. Romethat
old city, with all its misery, and its fallen state, and
its broken palaces of the Empiregrows upon one's
heart. The fringing shrubs of the coliseum, flaunting
their blossoms at the tall beggar-men in cloaks, who
grub below,the sun glimmering over the mossy pile
of the House of Nero,the sweet sunsets from the
Pincian, that make the broad pine-tops of the
Janiculan
,
stand sharp and dark against a sky of gold,
cannot easily be left behind. And Enrica with her
silver brown hair, and the silken fillet that bound
it,and her deep blue eyes,and her white, delicate
fingers,and the blue veins chasing over her fair
templesah, Easter is too near!
But it comes; and passes with the glory of St.
Peter'slighted from top to bottom. With Enrica
I saw it from the Ripetta, as it loomed up in the
distance, like a city on fire.
The next day, I bring home my last bunch of
flowers, and with it a little richly-chased Roman ring.
No fire blazes on the hearthbut they are all there.
Warm days have come, and the summer air, even
now, hangs heavy with fever, in the hollows of the
plain.
I heard them stirring early on the morning on
which I was to go away. I do not think I slept very
well myselfnor very late. Never did Enrica look
more beautifulnever. All her Carnival robes, and
the sad drapery of the
Friday of Crucifixion
could
not so adorn her beauty as that neat morning dress,
and that simple rosebud she wore upon her bosom.
She gave it to methe lastwith a trembling hand.
I did not, for I could not, thank her. She knew it;
and her eyes were full.
The old man kissed my cheekit was the Roman
custom, but the custom did not extend to the Roman
girls;at least not often. As I passed down the
Corso, I looked back at the balcony, where she stood
in the time of Carnival, in the brown Sombrero, with
the white plume. I knew she would be there now;
and there she was. My eyes dwelt upon the vision,
very loth to leave it; and after my eyes had lost it,
my heart clung to it,there, where my memory
clings now.
At noon, the carriage stopped upon the hills,
toward
Soracte, that overlooked Rome. There was a
stunted pine tree grew a little way from the road, and
I sat down under it,for I wished no dinnerand
I looked back with strange tumult of feeling, upon
the sleeping city, with the gray, billowy sea of the
Campagna, lying around it.
I seemed to see Enricathe Roman girl, in that
morning dress, with her brown hair in its silken fillet;
but the rose-bud that was in her bosom, was now
in mine. Her silvery voice too, seemed to float past
me, bearing snatches of Roman songs;but the songs
were sad and broken.
After all, this is sad vanity!thought I: and
yet if I had espied then some returning carriage
going down toward Rome, I will not saybut that I
should have bailed it, and taken a place,and gone
back, and to this day, perhapshave lived at Rome.
But the vetturino called me; the coach was ready;
I gave one more look toward the dome that guarded
the sleeping city; and then, we galloped down the
mountain, on the road that lay towards Perugia, and
Lake Thrasimene.
Sweet Enrica! art thou living yet? Or hast
thou passed away to that Silent Land, where the
good sleep, and the beautiful?
The visions of the Past fade. The morning breeze
has died upon the meadow; the Bob-o'-Lincoln sits
swaying on the willow tuftssinging no longer. The
trees lean to the brook; but the shadows fall straight
and dense upon the silver stream.
Noon
has broken into the middle sky; and
Morning
is gone.
II.
Noon.
THE Noon is short; the sun never loiters on the
meridian, nor does the shadow on the old dial
by the garden, stay long at XII. The Present, like
the noon, is only a point; and a point so fine, that it
is not measurable by the grossness of action. Thought
alone is delicate enough to tell the breadth of the
Present.
The Past belongs to God: the Present only is
ours. And short as it is, there is more in it, and of
it, than we can well manage. That man who can
grapple it, and measure it, and fill it with his purpose,
is doing a man's work: none can do more: but there
are thousands who do less.
Short as it is, the Present is great and strong;as
much stronger than the Past, as fire than ashes, or as
Death than the grave. The noon sun will quicken
vegetable life, that in the morning was dead. It is
hot and scorching: I feel it now upon my head: but
it does not scorch and heat like the bewildering
Present. There are no oak leaves to interrupt the
rays of the burning NOW. Its shadows do not fall
east or west;like the noon, the shade it makes, falls
straight from sky to earthstraight from Heaven to
Hell!
Memory presides over the Past; Action presides
over the Present. The first lives in a rich temple
hung with glorious trophies, and lined with tombs:
the other has no shrine but Duty, and it walks the
earth like a spirit!
I called my dog to me, and we shared
together the meal that I had brought away at sunrise
from the mansion under the elms; and now, Carlo is
gnawing at the bone that I have thrown to him, and I
stroll dreamily in the quiet noon atmosphere, upon
that grassy knoll, under the oaks.
Noon in the country is very still: the birds do not
sing: the workmen are not in the field: the sheep lay
their noses to the ground; and the herds stand in
pools, under shady trees, lashing their sides,but
otherwise, motionless. The mills upon the brook, far
above, have ceased for an hour their labor; and the
10*
stream softens its rustle, and sinks away from the
sedgy banks. The heat plays upon the meadow in
noiseless waves, and the beech leaves do not stir.
Thought, I said, was the only measure of the
Present: and the stillness of noon breeds thought:
and my thought brings up the old companions, and
stations them in the domain of NOW. Thought
ranges over the world, and brings up hopes, and fears,
and resolves, to measure the burning NOW. Joy, and
grief, and purpose, blending in my thought, give
breadth to the Present.
Wherethought Iis little Isabel now? Where
is Lillywhere is Ben? Where is Leslie,where is
my old teacher? Where is my chum, who played
such rare trickswhere is the black-eyed Jane?
Where is that sweet-faced girl whom I parted with
upon that terrace, looking down upon the old spire of
Modbury church? Where are my hopeswhere
my purposeswhere my sorrows?
I care not who you arebut if you bring such
thought to measure the Present, the present will
seem broad; and it will be sultry as noonand make
a fever of Now.
Early Friends.
Where
are they?
I cannot sit now, as once, upon the edge of the
brook, hour after hour, flinging off my line and hook
to the nibbling roach, and reckon it great sport.
There is no girl with auburn ringlets to sit beside me,
and to play upon the bank. The hours are shorter
than they were then; and the little joys that furnished
boyhood till the heart was full, can fill it no longer.
Poor Tray is dead, long ago; and he cannot swim
into the pools for the floating sticks; nor can I sport
with him hour after hour, and think it happiness.
The mound that covers his grave is sunken; and the
trees that shaded it, are broken and mossy.
Little Lilly is grown into a woman, and is married;
and she has another little Lilly, with flaxen hair, she
says,looking as
she
used to look. I dare say the
child is pretty; but it is not my Lilly. She has a
little boy too, that she calls Paul;a chubby
rogueshe writes,and as mischievous as ever I
was. God bless the boy!
Ben,who would have liked a ride in the coach
that carried me away to schoolhas had a great
many rides since thenrough rides, and hard ones,
over the road of life. He does not rake up the falling
leaves for bonfires, as he did once; he is grown a
man, and is fighting his way somewhere in our
western world, to the short-lived honours of time. He
was married not long ago; his wife I remembered as
one of my playmates at my first school: she was
beautiful, but fragile as a leaf. She died within a
year of their marriage. Ben was but four years my
senior; but this grief has made him ten years older.
He does not say it; but his eye and his figure tell it.
The nurse who put the purse in my hand that
dismal
morning, is grown a feeble old woman. She was
over fifty then; she may well be seventy now. She
did not know my voice when I went to see her the
other day, nor did she know my face at all. She
repeated the name when I told it to herPaul,
Paul,she did not remember any Paul, except a
little boy, a long while ago.
To whom you gave a purse when he went
away, and told him to say nothing to Lilly or to
Ben?
Yes, that Paulsays the old woman
exultingly
do
you know him?
And when I told hershe would not have believed
it! But she did; and took hold of my hand again,
(for she was blind); and then smoothed down the plaits
of her apron, and jogged her cap strings, to look tidy in
the presence of `the gentleman.' And she told me
long stories about the old house and how other people
came in afterward; and she called me `sir' sometimes,
and sometimes `Paul.' But I asked her to say only
Paul; she seemed glad for this, and talked easier;
and went on to tell of my old playmates, and how we
used to ride the ponypoor Jacko!and how we
gathered nutssuch heaping piles; and how we used
to play at fox and geese through the long winter
evenings; and how my poor mother would smile
but here I asked her to stop. She could not have
gone on much longer, for I believe she loved our house
and people, better than she loved her own.
As for my uncle, the cold, silent man, who lived
with his books in the house upon the hill, and who
used to frighten me sometimes with his look, he grew
very feeble after I had left, and almost crazed. The
country people said that he was mad; and Isabel
with her sweet heart clung to him, and would lead
him out when his step tottered, to the seat in the
garden, and read to him out of the books he loved to
hear. And sometimes, they told me, she would read
to him some letters that I had written to Lilly or to
Ben, and ask him if he remembered Paul, who saved
her from drowning under the tree in the meadow?
But he could only shake his head, and mutter
something
about how old, and feeble he had grown.
They wrote me afterward that he died; and was
buried in a far-away place, where his wife once lived,
and where he now sleeps beside her. Isabel was sick
with grief, and came to live for a time with Lilly;
but when they wrote me last, she had gone back to
her old homewhere Tray was buried,where we
had played together so often, through the long days
of summer.
I was glad I should find her there, when I came
back. Lilly and Ben were both living nearer to the
city, when I landed from my long journey over the
seas; but still I went to find Isabel first. Perhaps I
had heard so much oftener from the others, that I felt
less eager to see them; or perhaps I wanted to save
my best visits to the last; or perhaps(I did think
it) perhaps I loved Isabel, better than them all.
So I went into the country, thinking all the way,
how she must have changed since I left. She must
be now nineteen or twenty; and then her grief must
have saddened her face somewhat; but I thought I
should like her all the better for that. Then perhaps
she would not laugh, and tease me, but would be
quieter, and wear a sweet smileso calm, and
beautiful
,
I thought. Her figure too must have grown
more elegant, and she would have more dignity in her
air.
I shuddered a little at this; for I thought,she
will hardly think so much of me then; perhaps she
will have seen those whom she likes a great deal
better
.
Perhaps she will not like me at all; yet I knew
very well that I should like her.
I had gone up almost to the house; I had passed
the stream where we fished on that day, many years
before; and I thought that now since she was grown
to womanhood, I should never sit with her there
again, and surely never drag her as I did out of the
water, and never chafe her little hands, and never
perhaps kiss her, as I did, when she sat upon my
mother's lapoh, nonono!
I saw where we buried Tray, but the old slab was
gone; there was no ribbon there now. I thought
that at least, Isabel would have replaced the slab;
but it was a wrong thought. I trembled when I went
up to the doorfor it flashed upon me, that perhaps,
Isabel was married. I could not tell why she
should not; but I knew it would make me
uncomfortable
,
to hear that she had.
There was a tall woman who opened the door; she
did not know me; but I recognized her as one of the
old servants. I asked after the housekeeper first,
thinking I would surprise Isabel. My heart fluttered
somewhat, thinking that she might step in suddenly
herselfor perhaps that she might have seen me
coming up the hill. But even then, I thought, she
would hardly know me.
Presently the housekeeper came in, looking very
grave; she asked if the gentleman wished to see her?
The gentleman did wish it, and she sat down on
one side of the fire;for it was autumn, and the
leaves were falling, and the November winds were
very chilly.
Shall I tell herthought Iwho I am, or ask
at once for Isabel? I tried to ask; but it was hard
for me to call her name; it was very strange, but I
could not pronounce it at all.
Who, sir?said the housekeeper, in a tone so
earnest, that I rose at once, and crossed over, and
took her hand:You know me, said I,you
surely remember Paul?
She started with surprise, but recovered herself,
and resumed the same grave manner. I thought I
had committed some mistake, or been in some way
cause of offence. I called herMadame, and asked
forIsabel?
She turned pale, terribly paleBella? said she.
Yes, Bella.
SirBella is dead!
I dropped into my chair. I said nothing. The
housekeeperbless her kind heart!slipped
noiselessly
out. My hands were over my eyes. The
winds were sighing outside, and the clock ticking
mournfully within.
I did not sob, nor weep, nor utter any cry.
The clock ticked mournfully, and the winds were
sighing; but I did not hear them any longer; there
was a tempest raging within me, that would have
drowned the voice of thunder.
It broke at length in a long, deep sigh,oh God!
said I. It may have been a prayer;it was not
an imprecation.
Bellasweet Bella was dead! It seemed as if
with her, half the world were deadevery bright face
darkenedevery sunshine blotted out,every flower
withered,every hope extinguished!
I walked out into the air, and stood under the trees
where we had played together with poor Traywhere
Tray lay buried. But it was not Tray I thought of,
as I stood there, with the cold wind playing through
my hair, and my eyes filling with tears. How could
she die? Why
was
she gone? Was it really true?
Was Isabel indeed deadin her coffinburied?
Then why should anybody live? What was there to
live for, now that Bella was gone?
Ah, what a gap in the world, is made by the death
of those we love! It is no longer whole, but a poor
half-world that swings uneasy on its axis, and makes
you dizzy with the clatter of its wreck!
The housekeeper told me alllittle by little, as I
found calmness to listen. She had been dead a
month; Lilly was with her through it all; she died
sweetly, without pain, and without fear,what can
angels fear? She had spoken often of `Cousin Paul;'
she had left a little pacquet for him, but it was not
there; she had given it into Lilly's keeping.
Her grave, the housekeeper told me, was only a
little way off from her homebeside the grave of a
brother
who died long years before. I went there that
evening. The mound was high and fresh. The sods
had not closed together, and the dry leaves caught in
the crevices, and gave a ragged and a terrible look to
the grave. The next day, I laid them all smooth
as we had once laid them on the grave of Tray;I
clipped the long grass, and set a tuft of blue violets
at the foot, and watered it all withtears. The
homestead, the trees, the fields, the meadowsin the
windy November, looked dismally. I could not like
them again;I liked nothing, but the little mound,
that I had dressed over Bella's grave. There she
sleeps now,the sleep of Death!
School Revisited.
The
old school is there still,with the high cupola
upon it, and the long galleries, with the sleeping
rooms opening out on either side, and the corner one,
where I slept. But the boys are not there, nor the
old teachers. They have ploughed up the play-ground
to plant corn, and the apple tree with the low limb,
that made our gymnasium, is cut down.
I was there only a little time ago. It was on a
Sunday. One of the old houses of the village had
been fashioned into a tavern, and it was there I
stopped. But I strolled by the old one, and looked
into the bar-room, where I used to gaze with wonder
upon the enormous pictures of wild animals, which
heralded some coming menagerie. There was just
such a picture hanging still, and two or three
advertisements
of sheriffs, and a little bill of a `horse stolen,'
andas I thoughtthe same brown pitcher on the
edge of the bar. I was sure it was the same great
wood box that stood by the fire place, and the same
whip, and great coat hung in the corner.
I was not in so gay costume, as I once thought I
would be wearing, when a man; I had nothing better
than a rusty shooting jacket; but even with this, I
was determined to have a look about the church, and
see if I could trace any of the faces of the old times.
They had sadly altered the building; they had
cut out its long galleries, and its old fashioned square
pews, and filled it with narrow boxes, as they do in
the city. The pulpit was not so high, or grand; and
it was covered over with the work of the
cabinetmakers
.
I missed too the old preacher, whom we all feared
so much; and in place of him, was a jaunty looking
man, whom I thought I would not be at all afraid to
speak to, or if need be, to slap on the shoulder.
And when I did meet him after church, I looked him
in the eye as boldly as a lionwhat a change was
that, from the school days!
Here and there, I could detect about the church,
some old farmer, by the stoop in his shoulders, or by
a particular twist in his nose; and one or two young
fellows, who used to storm into the gallery in my
school days, in very gay jackets, dressed off with
ribbons
,which
we thought was astonishing heroism, and
admired accordingly,were now settled away into
fathers of families; and looked as demure, and
peaceable
,
at the head of their pews, with a white-headed
boy or two between them, and their wives, as if they
had been married all their days.
There was a stout man too, with a slight limp
in his gait, who used to work on harnesses, and strap
our skates, and who I always thought would have
made a capital Vulcan,he stalked up the aisle past
me, as if I had my skates strapped at his shop, only
yesterday.
The bald-pated shoemaker, who never kept his
word, and who worked in the brick shop, and who
had a son called Theodore,which we all thought a
very pretty name for a shoemaker's sonI could not
find. I feared he might be dead. I hoped, if he
was, that his broken promises about patching boots,
would not come up against him.
The old factor of tamarinds and sugar crackers,
who used to drive his covered waggon every Saturday
evening into the play-ground, I observed, still holding
his place in the village choir; and singingthough
with a tooth or two gone,as serenely, and
obstreporously
as ever.
I looked around the church, to find the black-eyed
girl who always sat behind the choir,the one I
loved to look at so much. I knew she must be
grown up; but I could fix upon no face positively;
once, as a stout woman with a pair of boys, and who
wore a big red shawl, turned half around, I thought I
recognized her nose. If it was she, it had grown red
though; and I felt cured of my old fondness. As for
the other, who wore the hat trimmed with furshe
was nowhere to be seen, among either maids, or
matrons
;
and when I asked the tavern-keeper, and
described
her, and her father, as they were in my
school-days, he told me that she had married too, and
lived some five miles from the village; and said he,
I guess she leads her husband a devil of a life!
I felt cured of her too; but I pitied the husband.
One of my old teachers was in the church; I could
have sworn to his face; he was a precise man; and
now I thought he looked rather roughly at my old
shooting jacket. But I let him look, and scowled at
him a little; for I remembered that he had feruled
me once. I thought it was not probable that he
would ever do it again.
There was a bustling little lawyer in the village,
who lived in a large house, and who was the great
man of that town and country,he had scarce
changed at all; and he stepped into the church as
briskly, and promptly, as he did ten years ago. But
what struck me most, was the change in a couple of
pretty, little, white-haired girls, that at the time I
left, were of that uncertain age, when the mother
lifts them on a Sunday, and pounces them down one
after the other upon the seat of the pew;these were
now grown into blooming young ladies. And they
swept by me in the vestibule of the church, with a
flutter of robes, and a grace of motion, that fairly
made my heart twitter in my bosom. I know nothing
that brings home upon a man so quick, the
consciousness
of increasing years, as to find the little prattling
girls, that were almost babies in his boyhoodbecome
dashing ladies;and to find those whom he used to
look on patronizingly, and compassionatelythinking
they were pretty little girlsgrown to such maturity,
that the mere rustle of their silk dress will give him
a twinge; and their eyes, if he looks at themmake
him unaccountably shy.
After service I strolled up by the school
buildings
;
I traced the names that we had cut upon
the fence; but the fence had grown brown with
age, and was nearly rotted away. Upon the beech
tree in the hollow behind the school, the
carvings
were all overgrown. It must have been
vacation
,
if indeed there was any school at all; for I
could see only one old woman about the premises,
and she was hanging out a dishcloth, to dry in the
sun. I passed on up the hill, beyond the buildings,
where in the boy-days, we built stone forts with
bastions and turrets; but the farmers had put
bastions, and turrets, into their cobble-stone walls.
At the orchard fence, I stopped, and lookedfrom
force, I believe, of old habit,to see if any one were
watching;and then leaped over, and found my way
to the early apple tree; but the fruit had gone by.
It seemed very daring in me, even then, to walk so
boldly in the forbidden ground.
But the old head-master who forbade it, was dead;
and Russel and Burgess, and I know not how many
others, who in other times, were culprits with me,
were dead too. When I passed back by the school,
I lingered to look up at the windows of that corner
room, where I had slept the sound, healthful sleep of
boyhood,and where too I had passed manymany
wakeful hours, thinking of the absent Bella, and of
my home.
How small, seem now, the great griefs of
boyhood! Light floating clouds will obscure the sun
that is but half risen; but let him be upmid
heaven, and the cloud that then darkens the land,
must be thick, and heavy indeed.
The tears started from my eyes:was not
such a cloud over me now?
College.
School-mates
slip out of sight and knowledge,
and are forgotten; or if you meet them, they bear
another character; the boy is not there. It is a new
acquaintance that you make, with nothing of your
fellow upon the benches, but the name. Though the
eye and face cleave to your memory, and you meet
them afterward, and think you have met a friend
the voice or the action will break the charm, and you
find onlyanother man.
But with your classmates, in that later school,
where form and character were both nearer ripeness,
and where knowledge labored for together, bred the
first manly sympathies,it is different. And as you
meet them, or hear of them, the thought of their
advance makes a measure of your ownit makes a
measure of the NOW.
You judge of your happiness, by theirs,of your
progress, by theirs, and of your prospects, by theirs.
If one is happy, you seek to trace out the way by
which he has wrought his happiness; you consider
how it differs from your own; and you think with
sighs, how you might possibly have wrought the
same; but
now
it has escaped. If another has won
some honorable distinction, you fall to thinking, how
the manyour old equal, as you thought, upon the
college bencheshas outrun you. It pricks to effort,
and teaches the difference between now, and then.
Life with all its duties, and hopes, gathers upon your
Present, like a great weight, or like a storm ready to
burst. It is met anew; it pleads more strongly; and
action that has been neglected, rises before youa
giant of remorse.
Stop not, loiter not, look not backward, if you
would be among the foremost! The great Now, so
quick, so broad, so fleeting, is yours;in an hour it
will belong to the Eternity of the Past. The temper
of Life is to be made good by big honest blows; stop
striking, and you will do nothing: strike feebly, and
11
you will do almost as little. Success rides on every
hour: grapple it, and you may win: but without a
grapple, it will never go with you. Work is the
weapon of honor, and who lacks the weapon, will
never triumph.
There were some seventy of usall scattered now.
I meet one here and there at wide distances apart;
and we talk together of old days, and of our present
work and life,and separate. Just so ships at sea,
in murky weather, will shift their course to come
within hailing distance, and compare their longitude,
andpart. One I have met wandering in southern
Italy, dreaming as I was dreamingover the tomb
of Virgil, by the dark grotto of Persilipo. It seemed
strange to talk of our old readings in Tacitus there
upon classic ground; but we did; and ran on to talk
of our lives; and sitting down upon the promontory
of Baie, looking off upon that blue sea, as clear as the
classics, we told each other our respective stories.
And two nights after, upon the quay, in sight of
Vesuvius, which shed a lurid glow upon the sky, that
was reflected from the white walls of the Hotel de
Russie, and from the broad lava pavements, we parted
he to wander among the isles of the gean, and I
to turn northward.
Another time, as I was wandering among those
mysterious figures that crowd the foyer of the French
opera upon a night of the Masked Ball, I saw a
familiar face: I followed it with my eye, until I
became
convinced. He did not know me until I named
his old seat upon the bench of the Division Room,
and the hard-faced Tutor G. Then we talked
of the old rivalries, and Christmas jollities, and of this
and that one, whom we had come upon in our wayward
tracks; while the black-robed grisettes stared through
their velvet masks;nor did we tire of comparing
the old memories, with the unearthly gaiety of the
scene about us, until day-light broke.
In a quiet mountain town of New England, I came
not long since upon another: he was hale and hearty,
and pushing his lawyer work with just the same
nervous energy, with which he used to recite a
theorem
of Euclid. He was father too of a couple of
stout, curly-pated boys; and his good woman, as he
called her, appeared a sensible, honest, good-natured
lady. I must say that I envied him his wife, much
more than I had envied my companion of the opera
his Domino.
I happened only a little while ago to drop into the
college chapel of a Sunday. There were the same
hard oak benches below, and the lucky fellows who
enjoyed a corner seat, were leaning back upon the
rail, after the old fashion. The tutors were perched
up in their side boxes, looking as prim, and serious,
and important, as ever. The same stout Doctor read
the hymn in the same rhythmical way; and he prayed
the same prayer, for (I thought) the same old sort of
sinners. As I shut my eyes to listen, it seemed as if
the intermediate years had all gone out; and that I
was on my own pew bench, and thinking out those
little schemes for excuses, or for effort, which were to
relieve me, or to advance me, in my college world.
There was a pleasure, like the pleasure of dreaming
about forgotten joysin listening to the Doctor's
sermon: he began in the same half embarrassed, half
awkward way; and fumbled at his Bible leaves, and
the poor pinched cushion, as he did long before. But
as he went on with his rusty and polemic vigour, the
poetry within him would now and then warm his soul
into a burst of fervid eloquence, and his face would
glow, and his hand tremble, and the cushion and the
Bible leaves be all forgot, in the glow of his thought,
until with a half cough, and a pinch at the cushion,
he fell back into his strong, but tread-mill
argumentation
.
In the corner above, was the stately, white-haired
professor, wearing the old dignity of carriage, and a
smile as bland, as if the years had all been playthings;
and had I seen him in his lecture-room, I daresay I
should have found the same suavity of address, the
same marvellous currency of talk, and the same
infinite
composure over the exploding retorts.
Near him was the silver-haired old gentleman,
with a very astute expression,who used to have an
odd habit of tightening his cloak about his nether limbs.
I could not see that his eye was any the less bright;
nor did he seem less eager to catch at the handle of
some witticism, or bit of satire,to the poor student's
cost. I remembered my old awe of him, I must say,
with something of a grudge; but I had got fairly
over it now. There are sharper griefs in life, than a
professor's talk.
Farther on, I saw the long-faced, dark-haired man,
who looked as if he were always near some explosive,
electric battery, or upon an insulated stool. He was,
I believe, a man of fine feelings; but he had a way of
reducing all action to dry, hard, mathematical
system
,
with very little poetry about it. I know there
was not much poetry in his problems in physics, and
still less in his half-yearly examinations. But I do
not dread them now.
Over opposite, I was glad to see still, the aged
head of the kind, and generous old man, who in my
day presided over the college; and who carried with
him the affections of each succeeding class,added to
their respect for his learning. This seems a higher
triumph to me now, than it seemed then. A strong
mind, or a cultivated mind may challenge respect;
but there is needed a noble one, to win affection.
A new man now filled his place in the president's
seat; but he was one whom I had known, and been
proud to know. His figure was bent, and thinthe
very figure that an old Flemish master would have
chosen, for a scholar. His eye had a kind of piercing
lustre, as if it had long been fixed on books; and his
expressionwhen unrelieved by his affable smile
was that of hard midnight toil. With all his polish
of mind, he was a gentleman at heart; and treated us
always with a manly courtesy, that is not forgotten.
But of all the faces that used to be ranged below
four hundred men and boysthere was not one,
with whom to join hands, and live back again. Their
griefs, joys, and toil, were chaining them to their
labor of life. Each one in his thought, coursing over
a world as wide as my own;how many thousand
worlds of thought, upon this one world of ours!
I stepped dreamily through the corridors of the old
Atheneum, thinking of that first, fearful step, when
the faces were new, and the stern tutor was strange,
and the prolix Livy
so
hard. I went up at night, and
skulked around the buildings, when the lights were
blazing from all the windows, and they were busy
with their tasksplain tasks, and easy tasks,because
they are certain tasks. Happy fellowsthought I
who have only to do, what is set before you to be
done. But the time is coming, and very fast, when
you must not only do, but know what to do. The
time is coming, when in place of your one master, you
will have a thousand mastersmasters of duty, of
business, of pleasure, and of griefgiving you harder
lessons each one of them, than any of your Fluxions.
Morning
will pass, and the
Noon
will comehot,
and scorching.
The Pacquet of Bella.
I HAVE not forgotten that pacquet of Bella; I did
not once forget it. And when I saw Lillynow the
grown up Lilly, happy in her household, and blithe
as when she was a maiden, she gave it to me. She told
me too of Bella's illness, and of her suffering, and of
her manner, when she put the little pacquet in her
hand `for Cousin Paul.' But this I will not repeat;
I cannot.
I know not why it was, but I shuddered at the
mention of her name. There are some who will talk,
at table, and in their gossip, of dead friends; I
wonder
how they do it? For myself, when the grave has
closed its gates on the faces of those I lovehowever
busy my mournful thought may be, the tongue is
silent. I cannot name their names; it shocks me to
hear them named. It seems like tearing open
half-healed
wounds, and disturbing with harsh worldly
noise, the sweet sleep of death.
I loved Bella. I know not how I loved her,
whether as a lover, or as a husband loves a wife; I
only know this,I always loved her. She was so
gentleso beautiful,so confiding, that I never once
thought, but that the whole world loved her, as well
as I. There was only one thing I never told to
Bella;I would tell her of all my grief, and of all
my joys; I would tell her my hopes, my ambitious
dreams, my disappointments, my anger, and my
dislikes
;but
I never told her how much I loved her.
I do not know why, unless I knew that it was
needless
.
But I should as soon have thought of telling
Bella on some winter's dayBella, it is winter!or
of whispering to her on some balmy day of August
Bella, it is summer!as of telling her, after she had
grown to girlhood.Bella, I love you!
I had received one letter from her in the old
countries
;
it was a sweet letter, in which she told me all
that she had been doing, and how she had thought of
me, when she rambled over the woods where we had
rambled together. She had written two or three
other letters, Lilly told me, but they had never
reached me. I had told her too of all that made my
happiness; I wrote her about the sweet girl I had
seen on shipboard, and how I met her afterward, and
what a happy time we passed down in Devon. I
even told her of the strange dream I had, in which
Isabel seemed to be in England, and to turn away from
me sadly, because I called herCarry.
I also told her of all I saw in that great world of
Pariswriting, as I would write to a sister; and I
told her too of the sweet Roman girl, Enricaof her
brown hair, and of her rich eyes, and of her pretty
Carnival dresses. And when I missed letter after
letter, I told her that she must still write her
letters, or some little journal, and read it to me when
I came back. I thought how pleasant it would be to
sit under the trees by her father's house, and listen
to her tender voice going through that record of her
thoughts, and fears. Alas, how our hopes betray
us!
It began almost like a diary, about the time that
her father fell sick. It issaid she to Lilly, when
she gave it to her, what I would have said to Cousin
Paul, if he had been here.
It beginsI have come back now to father's
house; I could not leave him alone, for they told me
he was sick. I found him not well; he was very
glad to see me, and kissed me so tenderly that I am sure,
11*
Cousin Paul, you would not have said, as you used to
saythat he was a cold man! I sometimes read to
him, sitting in the deep library window, (you
remember
it,) where we used to nestle out of his sight, at
dusk. He cannot read any more.
I would give anything to see the little Carry you
speak of; but do you know you did not describe her
to me at all; will you not tell me if she has dark
hair, or light, or if her eyes are blue, or dark, like
mine? Is she good; did she not make ugly speeches,
or grow peevish, in those long days upon the ocean?
How I would have liked to have been with you, on
those clear starlit nights, looking off upon the water!
But then I think that you would not have wished me
there; and that you did not once think of me even.
This makes me sad; yet I know not why it should;
for I always liked you best, when you were happy;
and I am sure you must have been happy then. You
say you shall never see her after you have left the
ship:you must not think so, Cousin Paul; if she is
so beautiful, and fond, as you tell me, your own heart
will lead you in her way, some time again; I feel
almost sure of it.
* * * Father is getting more and more
feeble, and wandering in his mind; this is very dreadful;
he calls me sometimes by my mother's name; and
when I sayit is Isabel,he sayswhat Isabel!
and treats me as if I was a stranger. The physician
shakes his head when I ask him of father: oh, Paul,
if he should diewhat could I do? I should die too
I know I should. Who would there be to care for me?
Lilly is married, and Ben is far off, and you Paul, whom
I love better than either, are a long way from me.
But God is good, and he will spare my father.
* * * So you have seen again your little
Carry! I told you it would be so. You tell me
how accidental it was:ah, Paul, Paul, you rogue,
honest as you are I half doubt you there! I like
your description of her too:dark eyes like mine you
say`almost as pretty;' well, Paul, I will forgive you
that; it is only a white lie. You know they must be
a great deal prettier than mine, or you would never
have stayed a whole fortnight in an old farmer's
house, far down in Devon! I wish I could see her:
I wish she was here with you now; for it is
mid-summer
,
and the trees and flowers were never prettier.
But I am all alone; father is too ill to go out at all.
I fear now very much, that he will never go out
again. Lilly was here yesterday, but he did not
know her. She read me your last letter: it was not
so long as mine. You are veryvery good to me,
Paul.
* * * For a long time I have written
nothing: my father has been very ill, and the old
housekeeper has been sick too, and father would have
no one but me near him. He cannot live long. I
feel sadlymiserably; you will not know me when
you come home; your pretty Bellaas you used
to call me, will have lost all her beauty. But perhaps
you will not care for that, for you tell me you have
found one prettier than ever. I do not know, Cousin
Paul, but it is because I am so sad, and selfishfor
sorrow is selfishbut I do not like your raptures
about the Roman girl. Be careful, Paul: I know
your heart: it is quick and sensitive; and I dare say
she is pretty, and has beautiful eyes; for they tell me
all the Italian girls have soft eyes.
But Italy is far away, Paul; I can never see
Enrica; she will never come here. Nono,
remember
Devon: I feel as if Carry was a sister now: I
cannot feel so of the Roman girl: I do not want to
feel so. You will say this is harsh; and I am afraid
you will not like me so well for it; but I cannot help
saying it. I love you too well, Cousin Paul, not to
say it.
* * * It is all over! Indeed, Paul, I
am very desolate! `The golden bowl is broken'
my poor father has gone to his last home. I was
expecting it; but how can we expect that fearful
comerdeath? He had been for a long time so
feeble, that he could scarce speak at all: he sat for
hours in his chair, looking upon the fire, or looking
out at the window. He would hardly notice me when
I came to change his pillows, or to smooth them for
his head. But before he died, he knew me as well as
ever. `Isabel,' he said, `you have been a good
daughter: God will reward you!' and he kissed me
so tenderly, and looked after me so anxiously, with
such intelligence in his look, that I thought perhaps
he would revive again. In the evening he asked me
for one of his books, that he loved very much.
`Father,' said I, `you cannot read; it is almost
dark.'
`Oh, yes,' said he; `Isabel, I can read now.'
And I brought it; he kept my hand a long while;
then he opened the book;it was a book about
death.
I brought a candle, for I knew he could not read
without.
`Isabel, dear,' said he, `put the candle a little
nearer.' But it was close beside him even then.
`A little nearer, Isabel,'repeated he, and his
voice was very faint; and he grasped my hand hard.
`Nearer, Isabel!nearer!'
There was no need to do it, for my poor father was
dead! Oh! Paul, Paul!pity me. I do not know
but I am crazed. It does not seem the same world
it was. And the house, and the trees, oh, they are
very dismal!
I wish you would come home, Cousin Paul: life
would not be so veryvery blank as it is now.
Lilly is kind;I thank her from my heart. But it
is not
her
father who is dead!
I am calmer now; I am staying
with Lilly. The world seems smaller than it did;
but Heaven seems a great deal larger: there is a
place for us all there, Paul,if we only seek it!
They tell me you are coming home: I am glad.
You will not like perhaps to come away from that
pretty Enrica, you speak of; but do so, Paul. It
seems to me that I see clearer than I did, and I talk
bolder. The girlish Isabel you will not find, for I
am much older, and my air is more grave; and this
suffering has made me feeblevery feeble.
It is not easy for me to write; but
I must tell you that I have just found out who your
Carry is. Years ago, when you were away from home,
I was at school with her. We were always together.
I wonder I could not have found her out from your
description; but I did not even suspect it She is a
dear girl, and is worthy of all your love. I have seen
her once since you have met her: we talked of you.
She spoke kindlyvery kindly: more than this, I
cannot tell you, for I do not know more. Ah, Paul,
may you be happy: I feel as if I had but a little while
to live.
It is even so, my dear Cousin
Paul,I shall write but little more; my hand
trembles
now. But I am ready. It is a glorious world
beyond thisI know it is! And there we shall
meet. I did hope to see you once again, and to hear
your voice, speaking to me as you used to speak.
But I shall not. Life is too frail with me. I seem
to live wholly now in the world where I am going:
there
is my mother, and my father, and my little
brotherwe shall meetI know we shall meet!
The lastPaul. Never again in
this world! I am happyvery happy. You will
come to me. I can write no more. May good angels
guard you, and bring you to Heaven!
Shall I go on?
But the toils of life are upon me. Private griefs
do not break the force, and the weight of the great
Present A lifeat best the half of it, is before me.
It is to be wrought out with nerve and work. And
blessed be God!there are gleams of sunlight upon
it. That sweet Carry, doubly dear to me now,
that she is joined with my sorrow for the lost Isabel,
shall be sought for!
And with her sweet image floating before me, the
Noon
wanes, and the shadows of
Evening
lengthen
upon the land.
III.
Evening.
THE Future is a great land:how the lights,
and the shadows throng over it,bright and
dark, slow and swift!
Pride and Ambition build up great castles on its
plains,great monuments on the mountains, that
reach heavenward, and dip their tops in the blue of
Eternity! Then comes an earthquakethe
earthquake
of disappointment, of distrust, or of inaction,
and lays them low. Gaping desolation widens its
breaches everywhere; the eye is full of them, and
can see nothing beside. By and by, the sun peeps
forth,as now from behind yonder cloudand
reanimates
the soul.
Fame beckons, sitting high in the heavens; and
joy lends a halo to the vision. A thousand resolves
stir your heart; your hand is hot, and feverish for
action; your brain works madly, and you snatch
here, and you snatch there, in the convulsive throes
of your delirium. Perhaps you see some earnest,
careful plodder, once far behind you, now toiling
slowly but surely, over the plain of life, until he seems
near to grasping those brilliant phantoms which dance
along the horizon of the future; and the sight stirs
your soul to frenzy, and you bound on after him with
the madness of a fever in your veins. But it was by
no such action, that the fortunate toiler has won his
progress. His hand is steady, his brain is cool; his
eye is fixed, and sure.
The Future is a great land; a man cannot go round
it in a day; he cannot measure it with a bound; he
cannot bind its harvests into a single sheaf. It is
wider than the vision, and has no end.
Yet always, day by day, hour by hour, second by
second, the hard Present is elbowing us off into that
great land of the Future. Our souls indeed, wander
to it, as to a home-land; they run beyond time and
space, beyond planets and suns, beyond far-off suns
and comets, until like blind flies, they are lost in the
blaze of immensity, and can only grope their way
back to our earth, and our time, by the cunning of
instinct.
Cut out the Futureeven that little Future, which
is the
Evening
of our life, and what a fall into
vacuity! Forbid those earnest forays over the
borders
of Now, and on what spoils would the soul live?
For myself, I delight to wander there, and to
weave every day, the passing life, into the coming
life,so closely, that I may be unconscious of the
joining. And if so be that I am able, I would make
the whole piece bear fair proportions, and just figures,
like those tapestries, on which nuns work by inches,
and finish with their lives;or like those grand
frescos
,
which poet artists have wrought on the vaults of
old cathedrals, gaunt, and colossal,appearing mere
daubs of carmine and azure, as they lay upon their
backs, working out a hand's breadth at a time,but
when complete, showingsymmetrical, and glorious!
But not alone does the soul wander to those
glittering
heights where fame sits, with plumes waving in
zephyrs of applause; there belong to it, other
appetites
,
which range wide, and constantly over the
broad Future-land. We are not merely, working,
intellectual
machines, but social puzzles, whose solution,
is the work of a life. Much as hope may lean toward
the intoxicating joy of distinction, there is another
leaning in the soul, deeper, and stronger, toward those
pleasures which the heart pants for, and in whose
atmosphere, the affections bloom and ripen.
The first may indeed be uppermost; it may be
noisiest; it may drown with the clamor of mid-day,
the nicer sympathies. But all our day is not
mid-day
;
and all our life is not noise. Silence is as strong
as the soul; and there is no tempest so wild with
blasts, but has a wilder lull. There lies in the depth
of every man's soul a mine of affection, which from
time to time will burn with the seething heat of a
volcano, and heave up lava-like monuments, through
all the cold strata of his commoner nature.
One may hide his warmer feelings;he may paint
them dimly;he may crowd them out of his sailing
chart, where he only sets down the harbors for traffic;
yet in his secret heart, he will map out upon the
great country of the Future, fairy islands of love, and
of joy. There, he will be sure to wander, when his
soul is lost in those quiet and hallowed hopes, which
take hold on Heaven.
Love only, unlocks the door upon that Futurity,
where the isles of the blessed, lie like stars.
Affection
is the stepping stone to God. The heart is our
only measure of infinitude. The mind tires with
greatness; the heartnever. Thought is worried
and weakened in its flight through the immensity of
space; but Love soars around the throne of the
Highest, with added blessing and strength.
I know not how it may be with others, but with
me, the heart is a readier, and quicker builder of
those fabrics which strew the great country of the
Future, than the mind. They may not indeed rise
so high, as the dizzy pinnacles that ambition loves to
rear; but they lie like fragrant islands, in a sea,
whose ripple is a continuous melody.
And as I muse now, looking toward the
Evening
,
which is already begun,tossed as I am, with the
toils of the Past, and bewildered with the vexations
of the Present, my affections are the architect, that
build up the future refuge. And, in fancy at least, I
will build it boldly;saddened it may be, by the
chance shadows of evening; but through all, I will
hope for a sunset, when the day ends, glorious with
crimson, and gold.
Carry.
I SAID that harsh, and hot as was the Present,
there were joyous gleams of light playing over the
Future. How else could it be, when that fair being
whom I met first upon the wastes of ocean, and whose
name even, is hallowed by the dying words of Isabel,
is living in the same world with me? Amid all the
perplexities that haunt me, as I wander from the
present to the future, the thought of her image, of
her smile, of her last kind adieu, throws a dash of
sunlight upon my path.
And yet why? Is it not very idle? Years have
passed since I have seen her: I do not even know
where she may be. What is she to me?
My heart whispersvery much!but I do not
listen to that in my prouder moods. She is a woman,
a beautiful woman indeed, whom I have known once
pleasantly known: she is living, but she will die, or
she will marry;I shall hear of it by and by, and
sigh perhapsnothing more. Life is earnest around
me; there is no time to delve in the past, for bright
things to shed radiance on the future.
I will forget the sweet girl, who was with me upon
the ocean, and think she is dead. This manly soul is
strong, if we would but think so: it can make a
puppet of griefs, and take down, and set up at will,
the symbols of its hope.
But no, I cannot: the more I think thus, the
less, I really think thus. A single smile of that frail
girl, when I recal it,mocks all my proud purposes;
as if, without her, my purposes were nothing.
Pshaw!I sayit is idle!and I bury my
thought in books, and in long hours of toil; but as the
hours lengthen, and my head sinks with fatigue, and
the shadows of evening play around me, there comes
again that sweet vision, saying with tender mockery
is it idle? And I am helpless, and am led away
hopefully and joyfully, toward the golden gates which
open on the Future.
But this is only in those silent hours when the man
is alone, and away from his working thoughts. At
mid-day, or in the rush of the world, he puts hard
armor on, that reflects all the light of such joyous
fancies. He is cold and careless, and ready for
suffering, and for fight.
One day I am travelling: I am absorbed in some
present caresthinking out some plan which is to
make easier, or more successful, the voyage of life.
I glance upon the passing scenery, and upon new
faces, with that careless indifference which grows upon
a man with years, and above all, with travel. There
is no wife to enlist your sympathiesno children to
sport with: my friends are few, and scattered; and
are working out fairly, what is before them to do.
Lilly is living here, and Ben is living there: their
letters are cheerful, contented letters; and they wish
me well. Griefs even have grown light with wearing;
and I am just in that careless humoras if I said,
jog on, old worldjog on! And the end will come
along soon; and we shall getpoor devils that we
arejust what we deserve!
But on a sudden, my eyes rest on a figure that I
think I know. Now, the indifference flies like mist;
and my heart throbs: and the old visions come up.
I watch her, as if there were nothing else to be seen.
The form is hers; the grace is hers; the simple dress
so neat, so tasteful,that is hers too. She half
turns her head:it is the face that I saw under the
velvet cap, in the Park of Devon!
I do not rush forward: I sit as if I were in a
trance. I watch her every actionthe kind
attentions
to her mother who sits beside her,her naive
exclamations, as we pass some point of surpassing
beauty. It seems as if a new world were opening
to me; yet I cannot tell why. I keep my place, and
think, and gaze. I tear the paper I hold in my
hand into shreds. I play with my watch chain, and
twist the seal, until it is near breaking. I take out
my watch, look at it, and put it backyet I cannot
tell the hour.
It is sheI murmurI know it is Carry!
But when they rise to leave, my lethargy is broken;
yet it is with a trembling hesitationa faltering as it
were, between the present life and the future, that I
approach. She knows me on the instant, and greets
me kindly;as Bella wrotevery kindly. Yet she
shows a slight embarrassment, a sweet embarrassment,
that I treasure in my heart, more closely even than
the greeting. I change my course, and travel with
them;now we talk of the old scenes, and two hours
seem to have made with me the difference of half a
life time.
It is five years since I parted with her, never
hoping to meet again. She was then a frail girl; she
is now just rounding into womanhood. Her eyes are
as dark and deep as ever: the lashes that fringe them,
seem to me even longer than they were. Her colour
is as rich, her forehead as fair, her smile as sweet, as
they were before;only a little tinge of sadness
floats upon her eye, like the haze upon a summer
landscape. I grow bold to look upon her, and timid
with looking. We talk of Bella:she speaks in a
soft, low voice, and the shade of sadness on her face,
gathersas when a summer mist obscures the sun.
I talk in monosyllables: I can command no other.
And there is a look of sympathy in her eye, when I
speak thus, that binds my soul to her, as no smiles
could do. What can draw the heart into the fulness
of love, so quick as sympathy?
But this passes;we must part; she for her home,
and I for that broad home, that has been mine so
longthe world. It seems broader to me than ever,
and colder than ever, and less to be wished for than
ever. A new book of hope is sprung wide open in
my life:a hope of home!
We are to meet at some time, not far off, in the
city where I am living. I look forward to that time,
12
as at school I used to look for vacation: it is a
point
d'appui
for hope, for thought, and for countless
journeyings into the opening future. Never did I
keep the dates better, never count the days more
carefully, whether for bonds to be paid, or for
dividends
to fall due.
I welcome the time, and it passes like a dream.
I am near her, often as I dare; the hours are very
short with her, and very long away. She receives
me kindlyalways very kindly; she could not be
otherwise than kind. But is it anything more?
This is a greedy nature of ours; and when sweet
kindness flows upon us, we want more. I know she
is kind; and yet in place of being grateful, I am only
covetous of an excess of kindness.
She does not mistake my feelings, surely:ah, no,
trust a woman for that! But what have I, or what
am I, to ask a return? She is pure, and gentle as an
angel; and Ialasonly a poor soldier in our
world-fight
against the Devil! Sometimes in moods of
vanity, I call up what I fondly reckon my
excellencies
or desertsa sorry, pitiful array, that makes me
shame-faced when I meet her. And in an instant, I
banish them all. And I think, that if I were called
upon in some high court of justice, to say why I
should claim her indulgence, or her loveI would
say nothing of my sturdy effort to beat down the
roughnesses of toilnothing of such manliness as wears
a calm front amid the frowns of the world,nothing
of little triumphs, in the every-day fight of life; but
only, I would enter the simple pleathis heart is
hers!
She leaves; and I have said nothing of what was
seething within me;how I curse my folly! She is
gone, and never perhaps will return. I recal in
despair
her last kind glance. The world seems blank
to me. She does not know; perhaps she does not
care, if I love her.Well, I will bear it,I say. But
I cannot bear it. Business is broken; books are
blurred; something remains undone, that fate
declares
must be done. Not a place can I find, but
her sweet smile gives to it, either a tinge of gladness,
or a black shade of desolation.
I sit down at my table with pleasant books; the
fire is burning cheerfully; my dog looks up earnestly
when I speak to him; but it will never do! Her
image sweeps away all these comforts in a flood. I
fling down my book; I turn my back upon my dog;
the fire hisses and sparkles in mockery of me.
Suddenly a thought flashes on my brain;I will
write to herI say. And a smile floats over my
face,a smile of hope, ending in doubt. I catch up
my penmy trusty pen; and the clean sheet lies
before
me. The paper could not be better, nor the
pen. I have written hundreds of letters; it is easy
to write letters. But now, it is not easy.
I begin, and cross it out. I begin again, and get
on a little farther;then cross it out. I try again,
but can write nothing. I fling down my pen in
despair
,
and burn the sheet, and go to my library for
some old sour treatise of Shaftesbury, or Lyttleton;
and saytalking to myself all the while;let her
go!She is beautiful, but I am strong; the world is
short; weI and my dog, and my books, and my
pen, will battle it through bravely, and leave enough
for a tomb-stone.
But even as I say it, the tears start;it is all false
saying! And I throw Shaftesbury across the room,
and take up my pen again. It glides on and on, as
my hope glows, and I tell her of our first meeting,
and of our hours in the ocean twilight, and of our
unsteady
stepping on the heaving deck, and of that
parting in the noise of London, and of my joy at
seeing her in the pleasant country, and of my grief
afterward
.
And then I mention Bella,her friend and
mineand the tears flow; and then I speak of our
last meeting, and of my doubts, and of this very
evening
,and
how I could not write, and abandoned it,
and then felt something within me that made me write,
and tell herall!That my heart was not
my own, but was wholly hers;and that if she would
be mine,I would cherish her, and love her always!
Then, I feel a kind of happiness,a strange,
tumultuous
happiness, into which doubt is creeping from
time to time, bringing with it a cold shudder. I seal
the letter, and carry ita great weightfor the mail.
It seems as if there could be no other letter that day;
and as if all the coaches and horses, and cars, and
boats were specially detailed to bear that single sheet.
It is a great letter for me; my destiny lies in it.
I do not sleep well that night;it is a tossing
sleep; one time joysweet and holy joy comes to my
dreams, and an angel is by me;another time, the
angel fades,the brightness fades, and I wake,
struggling
with fear. For many nights it is so, until the
day comes, on which I am looking for a reply.
The postman has little suspicion that the letter
which he gives mealthough it contains no
promissory
notes, nor moneys, nor deeds, nor articles of
tradeis yet to have a greater influence upon my life
and upon my future, than all the letters he has ever
brought to me before. But I do not show him this;
nor do I let him see the clutch with which I grasp
it. I bear it, as if it were a great and fearful burden,
to my room. I lock the door, and having broken the
seal with a quivering hand,read:
The Letter.
Paul
for I think I may call you so nowI
know not how to answer you. Your letter gave me
great joy; but it gave me pain too. I cannotwill
not doubt what you say: I believe that you love me
better than I deserve to be loved; and I know that I
am not worthy of all your kind praises. But it is not
this that pains me; for I know that you have a
generous
heart, and would forgive, as you always have
forgiven
,
any weakness of mine. I am proud too, very
proud, to have won your love; but it pains memore
perhaps than you will believeto think that I cannot
write back to you, as I would wish to write;alas,
never!
Here I dash the letter upon the floor, and with my
hand upon my forehead, sit gazing upon the glowing
coals, and breathing quick and loud.The dream
then is broken!
Presently I read again:
You know that my father died, before we
had ever met. He had an old friend, who had come
from England; and who in early life had done him
some great service, which made him seem like a
brother. This old gentleman was my god-father, and
called me daughter. When my father died, he drew
me to his side, and said,`Carry, I shall leave you,
but my old friend will be your father;' and he put my
hand in his, and said`I give you my daughter.'
This old gentleman had a son, older than myself;
but we were much together, and grew up as brother
and sister. I was proud of him; for he was tall and
strong, and every one called him handsome. He was
as kind too, as a brother could be; and his father was
like my own father. Every one said, and believed,
that we would one day be married; and my mother,
and my new father spoke of it openly. So did
Laurence
for
that is my friend's name.
I do not need to tell you any more, Paul; for
when I was still a girl, we had promised, that we
would one day be man and wife. Laurence has been
much in England; and I believe he is there now.
The old gentleman treats me still as a daughter, and
talks of the time, when I shall come and live with
him. The letters of Laurence are very kind; and
though he does not talk so much of our marriage as
he did, it is only I think, because he regards it as so
certain.
I have wished to tell you all this before; but I
have feared to tell you; I am afraid I have been too
selfish to tell you. And now what can I say?
Laurence
seems most to me like a brother;and you,
Paul  but I must not go on. For if I marry
Laurence, as fate seems to have decided, I will try
and love him, better than all the world.
But will you not be a brother, and love me, as
you once loved Bella;you say my eyes are like
hers, and that my forehead is like hers;will you not
believe that my heart is like hers too?
Paul, if you shed tears over this letterI have
shed them as well as you. I can write no more now.
Adieu.
I sit long looking upon the blaze; and when I
rouse myself, it is to say wicked things against destiny.
Again, all the future seems very blank. I cannot
love Carry, as I loved Bella; she cannot be a sister
to me; she must be more, or nothing! Again, I
seem to float singly on the tide of life, and see all
around me in cheerful groups. Everywhere the sun
shines, except upon my own cold forehead. There
seems no mercy in Heaven, and no goodness for me
upon Earth.
I write after some days, an answer to the letter.
But it is a bitter answer, in which I forget myself, in
the whirl of my misfortunesto the utterance of
reproaches.
Her reply, which comes speedily, is sweet, and
gentle. She is hurt by my reproaches, deeply hurt.
But with a touching kindness, of which I am not
worthy, she credits all my petulance to my wounded
feeling; she soothes me; but in soothing, only
wounds the more. I try to believe her, when she
speaks of her unworthiness;but I cannot.
Business, and the pursuits of ambition or of
interest
,
pass on like dull, grating machinery. Tasks
are met, and performed with strength indeed, but
with no cheer. Courage is high, as I meet the shocks,
and trials of the world; but it is a brute, careless
courage, that glories in opposition. I laugh at any
dangers, or any insidious pitfalls;what are they to
me? What do I possess, which it will be hard to
lose? My dog keeps by me; my toils are present;
my food is ready; my limbs are strong;what
need for more?
The months slip, by; and the cloud that floated
over my evening sun, passes.
Laurence wandering abroad, and writing to
Caroline
,
as to a sister,writes more than his father could
have wished. He has met new faces, very sweet
faces; and one which shows through the ink of his
later letters, very gorgeously. The old gentleman
12*
does not like to lose thus his little Carry; and he
writes back rebuke. But Laurence, with the letters
of Caroline before him for data, throws himself upon
his sister's kindness, and charity. It astonishes not
a little the old gentleman, to find his daughter
pleading
in such strange way, for the son. And what
will you do then, my Carry?the old man says.
Wear weeds, if you wish, sir; and love you
and Laurence more than ever!
And he takes her to his bosom, and saysCarry
Carry, you are too good for that wild fellow
Laurence
!
Now, the letters are different! Now they are full
of hopedawning all over the future sky. Business,
and care, and toil, glide, as if a spirit animated them
all; it is no longer cold machine work, but intelligent,
and hopeful activity. The sky hangs upon you
lovingly, and the birds make music, that startles you
with its fineness. Men wear cheerful faces; the
storms have a kind pity, gleaming through all their
wrath.
The days approach, when you can call her yours.
For she has said it, and her mother has said it; and
the kind old gentleman, who says he will still be her
father, has said it too; and they have all welcomed
youwon by her storywith a cordiality, that has
made your cup full, to running over. Only one
thought comes up to obscure your joy;is it real?
or if real, are you worthy to enjoy? Will you
cherish
and love always, as you have promised, that angel
who accepts your word, and rests her happiness on
your faith? Are there not harsh qualities in your
nature, which you fear may sometime make her
regret
that she gave herself to your love and charity?
And those friends who watch over her, as the apple
of their eye, can you always meet their tenderness and
approval, for your guardianship of their treasure? Is
it not a treasure that makes you fearful, as well as
joyful?
But you forget this in her smile: her kindness, her
goodness, her modesty, will not let you remember it.
She
forbids
such thoughts; and you yield such
obedience
,
as you never yielded even to the commands
of a mother. And if your business, and your labor slip
by, partially neglectedwhat matters it? What is
interest, or what is reputation, compared with that
fullness of your heart, which is now ripe with joy?
The day for your marriage comes; and you live as
if you were in a dream. You think well, and hope
well for all the world. A flood of charity seems to
radiate from all around you. And as you sit beside
her in the twilight, on the evening before the day,
when you will call her yours, and talk of the coming
hopes, and of the soft shadows of the past; and
whisper
of Bella's love, and of that sweet sister's death, and
of Laurence, a new brother, coming home joyful with
his bride,and lay your cheek to herslife seems as
if it were all day, and as if there could be no night!
The marriage passes; and she is yours,yours
forever.
New Travel.
Again
I am upon the sea; but not alone. She
whom I first met upon the wastes of ocean, is there
beside me. Again I steady her tottering step upon
the deck; once it was a drifting, careless pleasure;
now the pleasure is holy.
Once the fear I felt, as the storms gathered, and
night came, and the ship tossed madly, and great
waves gathering swift, and high, came down like
slipping
mountains, and spent their force upon the
quivering
vessel, was a selfish fear. But it is so no
longer. Indeed I hardly know fear; for how can the
tempests harm
her?
Is she not too good to suffer
any of the wrath of heaven?
And in nights of calm,holy nights, we lean over
the ship's side, looking down, as once before, into the
dark depths, and murmur again snatches of ocean
song, and talk of those we love; and we peer among the
stars, which seem neighborly, and as if they were the
homes of friends. And as the great ocean-swells
come rocking under us, and carry us up and down
along the valleys and the hills of water, they seem
like deep pulsations of the great heart of nature,
heaving us forward toward the goal of life, and to the
gates of heaven!
We watch the ships as they come upon the
horizon
,
and sweep toward us, like false friends, with the
sun glittering on their sails; and then shift their
course, and bear awaywith their bright sails, turned
to spots of shadow. We watch the long winged
birds skimming the waves hour after hour,like
pleasant thoughtsnow dashing before our bows, and
then sweeping behind, until they are lost in the hollows
of the water.
Again life lies open, as it did once before; but the
regrets, disappointments, and fruitless resolves do
not come to trouble me now. It is the future,
which has become as level as the sea; and
she
is
beside
me,the sharer in that futureto look out with
me, upon the joyous sparkle of water, and to count
with me, the dazzling ripples, that lie between us and
the shore. A thousand pleasant plans come up, and
are abandoned, like the waves we leave behind us;
a thousand other joyous plans, dawn upon our fancy,
like the waves that glitter before us. We talk of
Laurence and his bride, whom we are to meet; we
talk of her mother, who is even now watching the
winds that waft her child over the ocean; we talk of
the kindly old man, her god-father, who gave her a
father's blessing; we talk low, and in the twilight
hours, of Isabelwho sleeps.
At length, as the sun goes down upon a fair night,
over the western waters which we have passed, we
see before us, the low blue line of the shores of
Cornwall
and Devon. In the night, shadowy ships glide
past us with gleaming lanterns; and in the morning,
we see the yellow cliffs of the Isle of Wight; and
standing out from the land, is the dingy sail of our
pilot. London with its fog, roar, and crowds, has
not the same charms that it once had; that roar and
crowd is good to make a man forget his griefsforget
himself, and stupify him with amazement. We are
in no need of such forgetfulness.
We roll along the banks of the sylvan river that
glides by Hampton Court; and we toil up Richmond
Hill, to look together upon that scene of water, and
meadow,of leafy copses, and glistening villas, of
brown cottages, and clustered hamlets,of solitary
oaks, and loitering herdsall spread like a veil of
beauty, upon the bosom of the Thames. But we
cannot linger here, nor even under the glorious old
boles of Windsor Forest; but we hurry on to that
sweet county of Devon, made green with its white
skeins of water.
Again we loiter under the oaks, where we have
loitered before; and the sleek deer gaze on us with
their liquid eyes, as they gazed before. The squirrels
sport among the boughs as fearless as ever; and some
wandering puss pricks her long ears at our steps,
and bounds off along the hedge rows to her burrow.
Again I see Carry in her velvet riding-cap, with the
white plume; and I meet her as I met her before,
under the princely trees that skirt the northern
avenue
.
I recal the evening when I sauntered out at the
park gates, and gained a blessing from the porter's
wife, and dreamed that strange dream;now, the
dream seems more real, than my life.God bless
you!said the woman again.
Aye, old lady, God has blessed me!and I
fling her a guinea, not as a gift, but as a debt.
The bland farmer lives yet; he scarce knows me,
until I tell him of my bout around his oat-field, at the
tail of his long stilted plough. I find the old pew in
the parish church. Other holly sprigs are hung
now; and I do not doze, for Carry is beside me.
The curate drawls the service; but it is pleasant to
listen; and I make the responses with an emphasis,
that tells more I fear, for my joy, than for my
religion
.
The old groom at the mansion in the Park,
has not forgotten the hard-riding of other days; and
tells long stories (to which I love to listen) of the old
visit of mistress Carry, when she followed the hounds
with the best of the English lasses.
Yer honor may well be proud; for not a
prettier
face, or a kinder heart has been in Devon, since
mistress Carry left us!
But pleasant as are the old woods, full of memories,
and pleasant as are the twilight evenings upon the
terracewe must pass over to the mountains of
Switzerland. There we are to meet Laurence.
Carry has never seen the magnificence of the Juras;
and as we journey over the hills between Dole, and
the border line, looking upon the rolling heights
shrouded with pine trees, and down thousands of feet,
at the very road side, upon the cottage roofs, and
emerald valleys, where the dun herds are feeding
quietly, she is lost in admiration. At length we
come to that point above the little town of Gex, from
which you see spread out before you, the meadows
that skirt Geneva, the placid surface of Lake Leman
and the rough, shaggy mountains of Savoy;and far
behind them, breaking the horizon with snowy cap,
and with dark pinnaclesMont Blanc, and the
Needles of Chamouni.
I point out to her in the valley below, the little
town of Ferney, where stands the deserted chateau of
Voltaire; and beyond, upon the shores of the lake,
the old home of de Stael; and across, with its white
walls reflected upon the bosom of the water, the house
where Byron wrote the prisoner of Chillon. Among
the grouping roofs of Geneva, we trace the dark
cathedral, and the tall hotels shining on the edge of
the lake. And I tell of the time, when I tramped
down through yonder valley, with my future all
visionary, and broken, and drank the splendor of the
scene, only as a quick relief to the monotony of my
solitary life.
And now, Carry, with your hand locked in
mine, and your heart mineyonder lake sleeping in
the sun, and the snowy mountains with their rosy hue,
seem like the smile of nature, bidding us be glad!
Laurence is at Geneva; he welcomes Carry, as he
would welcome a sister. He is a noble fellow, and
tells me much of his sweet Italian wife; and presents
me to the smiling, blushingEnrica! She has
learned English now; she has found, she says, a
better teacher, than ever I was. Yet she welcomes
me warmly, as a sister might; and we talk of those
old evenings by the blazing fire, and of the one-eyed
Maestro
, as children long separated, might talk of
their school tasks, and of their teachers. She cannot
tell me enough of her praises of Laurence, and of his
noble heart.You were good,she says,but
Laurence is better.
Carry admires her soft brown hair, and her deep
liquid eye, and wonders how I could ever have left
Rome?
Do you indeed wonderCarry?
And together we go down into Savoy, to that
marvellous valley, which lies under the shoulder of
Mont Blanc; and we wandered over the
Mer de Glace
,
and picked Alpine roses from the edge of the
frowning
glacier. We toil at night-fall up to the
monastery
of the Great St. Bernard, where the new forming
ice crackles in the narrow foot-way, and the cold
moon glistens over wastes of snow, and upon the
windows of the dark Hospice. Again, we are among
the granite heights, whose ledges are filled with ice,
upon the Grimsel. The pond is dark and cold; the
paths are slippery;the great glacier of the Aar
sends down icy breezes, and the echoes ring from rock
to rock, as if the ice-God answered. And yet we
neither suffer, nor fear.
In the sweet valley of Meyringen, we part from
Laurence: he goes northward, by Grindelwald, and
Thun,thence to journey westward, and to make for
the Roman girl, a home beyond the ocean. Enrica
bids me go on to Rome: she knows that Carry will
love its soft warm air, its ruins, its pictures and
temples, better than these cold valleys of Switzerland.
And she gives me kind messages for her mother, and
for Cesare; and should we be in Rome at the Easter
season, she bids us remember her, when we listen to
the Miserere, and when we see the great
Chiesa
on
fire, and when we saunter upon the Pincian hill;
and remember, that it is her home.
We follow them with our eyes, as they go up the
steep height over which falls the white foam of the
clattering Reichenbach; and they wave their hands
toward us, and disappear upon the little plateau which
stretches toward the crystal Rosenlaui, and the tall,
still, Engel-Horner.
May the mountain angels guard them!
As we journey on toward that wonderful pass of
Splugen, I recal by the way, upon the heights, and in
the valleys, the spots where I lingered years before;
here, I plucked a flower, there, I drank from that
cold, yellow glacier water; and here, upon some rock
overlooking a stretch of broken mountains, hoary with
their eternal frosts, I sat musing upon that very Future,
which is with me now. But never, even when the
ice-genii were most prodigal of their fancies to the
wanderer, did I look for more joy, or a better angel.
Afterward, when all our trembling upon the Alpine
paths has gone by, we are rolling along under the
chestnuts and lindens that skirt the banks of Como.
We recal that sweet story of Manzoni, and I point
out, as well as I may, the loitering place of the
bravi
,
and the track of poor Don Abbondio. We follow in
the path of the discomfited Renzi, to where the
dainty spire, and pinnacles of the Duomo of Milan,
glisten against the violet sky.
Carry longs to see Venice; its water-streets, and
palaces have long floated in her visions. In the
bustling activity of our own country, and in the quiet
fields of England, that strange, half-deserted capital,
lying in the Adriatic, has taken the strongest hold
upon her fancy.
So we leave Padua, and Verona behind us, and find
ourselves upon a soft spring noon, upon the end of
the iron road which stretches across the lagoon,
toward Venice. With the hissing of steam in the
ear, it is hard to think of the wonderful city, we are
approaching. But as we escape from the carriage,
and set our feet down into one of those strange,
hearse-like, ancient boats, with its sharp iron prow,
and listen to the melodious rolling tongue of the
Venetian gondolier:as we see rising over the watery
plain before us, all glittering in the sun, tall, square
towers with pyramidal tops, and clustered domes, and
minarets; and sparkling roofs lifting from marble
wallsall so like the old paintings;and as we glide
nearer and nearer to the floating wonder, under the
silent working oar, of our now silent gondolier;
as we ride up swiftly under the deep, broad shadows
of palaces, and see plainly the play of the sea-water
in the crevices of the masonry,and turn into
narrow rivers shaded darkly by overhanging walls,
hearing no sound, but of voices, or the swaying of the
water against the houses,we feel the presence of the
place. And the mystic fingers of the Past, grappling
our spirits, lead them awaywilling and rejoicing
captives, through the long vista of the ages, that are
gone.
Carry is in a trance;rapt by the witchery of the
scene, into dream. This is her Venice; nor have all
the visions that played upon her fancy, been equal to
the enchanting presence of this hour of approach.
Afterward, it becomes a living thing,stealing
upon the affections, and upon the imagination by a
thousand coy advances. We wander under the warm
Italian sunlight to the steps from which rolled the
white head of poor Marino Faliero. The gentle
Carry can now thrust her ungloved hand, into the
terrible Lion's mouth. We enter the salon of the
fearful Ten; and peep through the half opened door,
into the cabinet of the more fearful Three. We go
through the deep dungeons of Carmagnola and of
Carrara; and we instruct the willing gondolier to
push his dark boat under the Bridge of Sighs; and
with Rogers' poem in our hand, glide up to the prison
door, and read of
that fearful closet at the foot
Lurking for prey, which, when a victim came,
Grew less and less, contracting to a span
An iron door, urged onward by a screw,
Forcing out life!
I sail, listening to nothing but the dip of the
gondolier's
oar, or to
her
gentle words, fast under the
palace door, which closed that fearful morning, on
the guilt and shame of Bianca Capello. Or, with
souls lit up by the scene, into a buoyancy that can
scarce distinguish between what is real, and what is
merely written,we chase the anxious step of the
forsaken Corinna; or seek among the veteran palaces
the casement of the old Brabantio,the chamber of
Desdemona,the house of Jessica, and trace among
the strange Jew money-changers, who yet haunt the
Rialto, the likeness of the bearded Shylock. We
wander into stately churches, brushing over grass, or
tell-tale flowers that grow in the court, and find them
damp and cheerless; the incense rises murkily, and
rests in a thick cloud over the altars, and over the
paintings; the music, if so be that the organ notes
are swelling under the roof, is mournfully plaintive.
Of an afternoon we sail over to the Lido, to
gladden
our eyes with a sight of land and green things,
and we pass none upon the way, save silent oarsmen,
with barges piled high with the produce of their
gardens
,pushing
their way down toward the floating
city. And upon the narrow island, we find Jewish
graves, half covered by drifted sand; and from
among them, watch the sunset glimmering over a
desolate level of water. As we glide back, lights
lift over the Lagoon, and double along the Guideca,
and the Grand Canal. The little neighbor isles will
have their company of lights dancing in the water;
and from among them, will rise up against the mellow
evening sky of Italy, gaunt, unlighted houses.
After the nightfall, which brings no harmful dew
with it, I stroll, with her hand within my arm,as
once upon the sea, and in the English Park, and in
the home-landover that great square which lies
before
the palace of St. Marks. The white moon is
riding in the middle heaven, like a globe of silver;
the gondoliers stride over the echoing stones; and
their long black shadows, stretching over the
pavement
,
or shaking upon the moving water, seem like
great funereal plumes, waving over the bier of Venice.
Carrying thence whole treasures of thought and
fancy, to feed upon in the after years, we wander to
Rome.
I find the old one-eyed
maestro
, and am met with
cordial welcome by the mother of the pretty Enrica.
The Count has gone to the marches of Ancona.
Lame Pietro still shuffles around the boards at the
Lepr, and the flower sellers at the corner, bind me
a more brilliant bouquet than ever, for a new beauty
at Rome. As we ramble under the broken arches of
the great aqueduct stretching toward Frascati, I tell
Carry, the story of my trip in the Appenines; and
we search for the pretty Carlotta. But she is
married
,
they tell us, to a Neapolitan guardsman. In
the spring twilight, we wander upon those heights
which lie between Frascati and Albano; and looking
westward, see that glorious view of the Campagna,
which can never be forgotten. But beyond the
Campagna
,
and beyond the huge hulk of St. Peter's,
heaving
into the sky from the middle waste, we see, or
fancy we see, a glimpse of the sea which stretches out
and on to the land we love, better than Rome. And
in fancy, we build up that home, which shall belong
to us, on the return;a home, that has slumbered
long in the future; and which, now that the future
has come, lies fairly before me.
Home.
Years
seem to have passed. They have mellowed
life into ripeness. The start, and change, and hot
ambition of youth, seem to have gone by. A calm,
and joyful quietude has succeeded. That future
which still lies before me, seems like a roseate
twilight
,
sinking into a peaceful, and silent night.
My home is a cottage, near that where Isabel once
lived. The same valley is around me; the same
brook rustles, and loiters under the gnarled roots of
the overhanging trees. The cottage is no mock
cottage
,
but a substantial, wide spreading cottage, with
clustering gables, and ample shade;such a cottage,
as they build upon the slopes of Devon. Vines
clamber
over it, and the stones show mossy through the
interlacing climbers. There are low porches, with
cozy arm chairs; and generous oriels, fragrant with
mignionette, and the blue blossoming violets.
The chimney stacks rise high, and show clear
against the heavy pine trees, that ward off the blasts
of winter. The dovecote, is a habited dovecote, and
the purple-necked pigeons swoop around the roofs,
in great companies. The hawthorn is budding into
its June fragrance along all the lines of fence; and
13
the paths are trim, and clean. The shrubs,
our neglected azalias and rhododendrons chiefest
among them,stand in picturesque groups upon the
close shaven lawn.
The gateway in the thicket below, is between two
mossy old posts of stone; and there is a tall
hemlock
flanked by a sturdy pine, for sentinel. Within
the cottage, the library is wainscotted with native
oak; and my trusty gun hangs upon a branching pair
of antlers. My rod and nets are disposed above the
generous book-shelves; and a stout eagle, once a
tenant of the native woods, sits perched over the
central
alcove. An old fashioned mantel is above the
brown stone jams of the country fire-place; and along
it are distributed records of travel;little bronze
temples from Rome, the
pietro duro
of Florence, the
porcelain busts of Dresden, the rich iron of Berlin,
and a cup fashioned from a stag's horn, from the
Black Forest by the Rhine.
Massive chairs stand here and there, in tempting
attitude; strewed over an oaken table in the middle,
are the uncut papers, and volumes of the day; and
upon a lion's skin stretched before the hearth, is lying
another Tray.
But this is not all. There are children in the
cottage
.
There is Jamiewe think him handsome
for he has the dark hair of his mother, and the same
black eye, with its long, heavy fringe. There is Carry
little Carry I must call her nowwith a face full
of glee, and rosy with health; then there is a little
rogue some two years old, whom we call Paula
very bad boy,as we tell him.
The mother is as beautiful as ever, and far more
dear to me; for gratitude has been adding, year by
year, to love. There have been times when a harsh
word of mine, uttered in the fatigues of business, have
touched her; and I have seen that soft eye fill with
tears; and I have upbraided myself for causing her
one pang. But such things she does not remember;
or remembers, only to cover with her gentle
forgiveness
.
Laurence and Enrica are living near us. And the
old gentleman, who was Carry's god-father, sits with
me, on sunny days upon the porch, and takes little
Paul upon his knee, and wonders if two such
daughters
as Enrica, and Carry are to be found in the
world. At twilight, we ride over to see Laurence;
Jamie mounts with the coachman; little Carry puts
on her wide-rimmed Leghorn for the evening visit;
and the old gentleman's plea for Paul, cannot be
denied
.
The mother too is with us; and old Tray
comes whisking along, now frolicking before the
horses' heads, and then bounding off after the flight
of some belated bird.
Away from that cottage home, I seem away from
life. Within it, that broad, and shadowy future,
which lay before me in boyhood and in youth, is
garnered,like a fine mist, gathered into drops of
crystal.
And when awaythose long letters, dating from
the cottage home, are what tie me to life. That
cherished wife, far dearer to me now, than when she
wrote that first letter, which seemed a dark veil
between
me and the futurewrites me now, as tenderly
as then. She narrates, in her delicate way, all the
incidents of the home life; she tells me of their rides,
and of their games, and of the new planted trees;
of all their sunny days, and of their frolics on the
lawn; she tells me how Jamie is studying, and of
little Carry's beauty, growing every day, and of
rogueish Paulso like his father! And she sends
me a kiss from each of them; and bids me such adieu,
and such `God's blessing,' that it seems as if an
angel guarded me.
But this is not all; for Jamie has written a
postscript
:
Dear Father, he says, mother wishes me
to tell you how I am studying. What would you
think, father, to have me talk in French to you,
when you come back? I wish you would come back
though; the hawthorns are coming out, and the
apricot
under my window is all full of blossoms. If you
should bring me a present, as you almost always do,
I would like a fishing rod.
Your affectionate son,
Jamie
.
Home.
And little Carry has her fine, rambling characters
running into a second postscript.
Why don't you come, papa; you stay too long;
I have ridden the pony twice; once he most threw
me off. This is all from
Carry
.
Home.
And Paul has taken the pen too, and in his
extraordinary
effort to make a big P, has made a very big
blot. And Jamie writes under itThis is Paul's
work, Pa; but he says it's a love blot, only he loves
you ten hundred times more.
And after your return, Jamie will insist that you
should go with him to the brook, and sit down with
him upon a tuft of the brake, to fling off a line into
the eddies, though only the nibbling roach are
sporting
below. You have instructed the workmen to
spare the clumps of bank-willows, that the wood-duck
may have a covert in winter, and that the
Bob-o-Lincolns
may have a quiet nesting place in the spring.
Sometimes your wife,too kind to deny such favor
will stroll with you along the meadow banks, and
you pick meadow daisies in memory of the old time.
Little Carry weaves them into rude chaplets, to dress
the forehead of Paul, and they dance along the
green-sward
,
and switch off the daffodils, and blow away the
dandelion seeds, to see if their wishes are to come
true. Jamie holds a butter cup under Carry's chin,
to find if she loves gold; and Paul, the rogue, teases
them, by sticking a thistle into sister's curls.
The pony has hard work to do under Carry's swift
ridingbut he is fed by her own hand, with the cold
breakfast rolls. The nuts are gathered in time, and
stored for long winter evenings, when the fire is
burning
bright and cheerilya true, hickory blaze,
which sends its waving gleams over eager, smiling
faces, and over well-stored book shelves, and portraits
of dear, lost ones. While from time to time, that
wife, who is the soul of the scene, will break upon
the children's prattle, with the silver melody of her
voice, running softly and sweetly through the
couplets
of Crabbe's stories, or the witchery of the
Flodden
Tale.
Then the boys will guess conundrums, and play at fox
and geese; and Tray, cherished in his age, and old
Milo petted in his dotage, lie side by side, upon the
lion's skin, before the blazing hearth. Little
Tomtit
the goldfinch sits sleeping on his perch, or cocks
his eye at a sudden crackling of the fire, for a familiar
squint upon our family group.
But there is no future without its straggling clouds.
Even now a shadow is trailing along the landscape.
It is a soft and mild day of summer. The leaves
are at their fullest. A southern breeze has been
blowing up the valley all the morning, and the light,
smoky haze hangs in the distant mountain gaps, like
a veil on beauty. Jamie has been busy with his
lessons
,
and afterward playing with Milo upon the lawn.
Little Carry has come in from a long rideher face
blooming, and her eyes all smiles, and joy. The
mother has busied herself with those flowers she loves
so well. Little Paul, they say, has been playing in
the meadow, and old Tray has gone with him.
But at dinner time, Paul has not come back.
Paul ought not to ramble off so far, I say.
The mother says nothing; but there is a look of
anxiety upon her face, that disturbs me. Jamie
wonders where Paul can be, and he saves for him,
whatever he knows Paul will likea heaping
platefull
.
But the dinner hour passes, and Paul does not
come. Old Tray lies in the sun-shine by the porch.
Now the mother is indeed anxious. And I, though
I conceal this from her, find my fears strangely
active. Something like instinct guides me to the
meadow: I wander down the brook-side calling
Paul!Paul! But there is no answer.
All the afternoon we search, and the neighbors
search; but it is a fruitless toil. There is no joy
that evening: the meal passes in silence; only little
Carry with tears in her eyes, asks,if Paul will soon
come back? All the night we search and call:the
mother even braving the night air, and running here
and there, until the morning finds us sad, and
despairing
.
That daythe nextcleared up the mystery; but
cleared it up with darkness. Poor little Paul!he
has sunk under the murderous eddies of the brook!
His boyish prattle, his rosy smiles, his artless talk,
are lost to us forever!
I will not tell how nor when we found him: nor
will I tell of our desolate home, and of
her
griefthe
first crushing grief of her life.
The cottage is still. The servants glide noiseless,
as if they might startle the poor little sleeper. The
house seems coldvery cold. Yet it is summer
weather; and the south breeze plays softly along the
meadow, and softly over the murderous eddies of the
brook.
Then comes the hush of burial. The kind
mourners
are there:it is easy for them to mourn!
The good clergyman prays by the bier:`Oh,
Thou, who did'st take upon thyself human woe, and
drank deep of every pang in life, let thy spirit come
and heal this grief, and guide toward that Better
Land, where justice and love shall reign, and hearts
laden with anguish, shall rest forevermore!'
Weeks roll on; and a smile of resignation lights up
the saddened features of the mother. Those dark
mourning robes speak to the heart deeper, and more
tenderly, than ever the bridal costume. She lightens
the weight of your grief by her sweet words of
resignation
:Paul,
she says, God has taken our
boy!
Other weeks roll on. Joys are still leftgreat and
ripe joys. The cottage smiling in the autumn
sumshine
is there: the birds are in the forest boughs:
Jamie and little Carry are there; and she, who is
more than them all, is cheerful, and content.
Heaven has taught us that the brightest future has
its clouds;that this life is a motley of lights and
shadows. And as we look upon the world around us,
and upon the thousand forms of human misery, there
is a gladness in our deep thanksgiving.
A year goes by; but it leaves no added shadow on
our hearth-stone. The vines clamber, and flourish:
the oaks are winning age and grandeur: little Carry
is blooming into the pretty coyness of girlhood; and
Jamie with his dark hair, and flashing eyes, is the
pride of his mother.
There is no alloy to pleasure, but the remembrance
of poor little Paul. And even that, chastened as it
is with years, is rather a grateful memorial that our
life is not all here, than a grief that weighs upon our
hearts.
Sometimes, leaving little Carry and Jamie to their
play, we wander at twilight to the willow tree,
beneath
which our drowned boy sleeps calmly, for the
Great Awaking. It is a Sunday, in the week-day of
our life, to linger by the little grave,to hang
flowers upon the head-stone, and to breathe a prayer
that our little Paul may sleep well, in the arms of
Him who loveth children!
And her heart, and my heart, knit together by
sorrow
,
as they had been knit by joya silver thread
mingled with the goldfollow the dead one to the
Land that is before us; until at last we come to
reckon the boy, as living in the new home, which
when this is old, shall be ours also. And my spirit,
speaking to his spirit, in the evening watches, seems
to say joyfullyso joyfully that the tears half choke
the utterancePaul, my boy, we will be
there!
And the mother, turning her face to mine, so that
I see the moisture in her eye, and catch its heavenly
look, whispers softlyso softly, that an angel might
have said it,Yes, dear, we will be THERE!
The night had now come, and my day under the
oaks was ended. But a crimson belt yet lingered
over the horizon, though the stars were out.
A line of shaggy mist lay along the surface of the
brook. I took my gun from beside the tree, and my
shot-pouch from its limb, and whistling for Carloas
if it had been TrayI strolled over the bridge, and
down the lane, to the old house under the elms.
I dreamed pleasant dreams that night;for
I dreamed that my Reverie was real.
The End
.